Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Study published by IVA [Engineering Science Academy] in the </F>
series STUDIE, DEBATT, ANALYS: "Energy for Future Generations: 
Successful Development of Energy Technology; partial study 2"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Foreword </H5>
  IVA's Energy Council was formed in 1988 as a committee 
consisting of about 10 members from various departments within 
the academy. Its purpose it to assist the presidium and 
leadership of the academy with know-how and proposals for 
studies and other IVA activities, as well as with materials and 
advice for working out comments on legislation and other 
expressions of IVA's opinion on central issues with connections 
to energy. 
  Against the background of the then Swedish energy policy 
situation, the Energy Council's first two years in operation 
were primarily devoted to issues involving Sweden's future power 
supply in the short and medium term. In the fall of 1990, a few 
months before the so-called three-party agreement on energy 
policy was made public, the Energy Council decided to develop 
foundations for a new study. 
  The council wanted to raise the importance of energy 
research 
for the environmentally adapted energy system of the future from 
a longer perspective. The council regarded cooperation with 
players within the private and public sectors to be of vital 
importance in carrying out the study. Extensive informal 
discussions with representatives of companies and government 
organs were part of the preparations. The actual work on the 
study was begun after the summer of 1991. 
  The following organizations have supported the project 
financially: Asea Brown Boveri AB, the Building Research Council 
(BFR), the Development Foundation of the Power Plant 
Association- -VAST, the Ministry of Commerce, the Commerce and 
Technology Development Agency--NUTEK, Sydkraft AB, Vattenfall AB 
[formerly National Waterfall Agency] and the Research Foundation 
of the Steam Users' Association--AFORSK. 
  "Energy for Future Generations" had the Energy Council as a 
control group and was undertaken as three basic, partial 
studies, each with its own working group. All the studies have 
been published out as separate documents headed by the 
respective working group. 
  "Partial Study 1, Energy Research 1975-1992--Government 
Efforts, Ambitions and Results," analyzed the extent, 
orientation and results of Swedish publicly financed energy 
research. 
  "Partial Study 2, Successful Development of Energy 
Technology," analyzed preconditions for successful technical 
development and society's--primarily the government's--role. 
  "Partial Study 3, Energy Research: Options for the 2000s" 
analyzed technical possibilities, key technologies and 
development needs related to the energy field. 
  Further, the Energy Council worked out a summary with 
conclusions and proposals. This represents the council's 
accounting to the academy but it is also aimed at 
decision-makers within the public and private sectors. 
  This partial study was undertaken by Working Group 2, 
consisting of Lars Astrand, (chairman), Gunnar Engman, Lars 
Gustafsson, Per Hedvall, Sven-Erik Malmeblad, Professor Lars 
Nabseth, Jan Nordling and Dr. Engr. Hans Sandberg. 
  The secretary for the working group was Per Lekander, M. 
Engr. 
Stockholm in November 1992 
  Hans G. Forsberg, managing director; Gunnar Engstrom, 
chairman, IVA Energy Council 
Contents 
  1. Content and Organization 
  2. What Characterizes Successful Energy Technology? 
  2.1 What Characterizes Successful Technical Development 
Projects? 
  2.2 Spreading New Technology in the Market 
  2.3 Distinguishing Factors for Developing Energy Technology 
  3. The Technical Development Within the Energy Industry 
  3.1 The Structure of the Energy Industry 
  3.2 What Characterizes the Swedish Development of Energy 
Technology? 
  3.3 Why Did the Development Turn Out This Way? 
  3.4 Development Trends for the Future 
  4. Society and the Development of Energy Technology 
  4.1 The Climate for Technical Development 
  4.2 Motives and Means of Innovation Support 
  4.3 Experience of Swedish and Foreign Support for Energy 
Innovations 
  4.4 The Principal Problems of Energy Innovation Support 
  4.5 Is Continued Economic Support for Commercial Development 
of Technology Necessary? 
  5. Recommendations Regarding Society's Role in Commercial 
Development of Energy Technology 
  Bibliography 
  Participants in the project 
  Supplement 1; Seven case studies of new industrial research 
projects 
  Supplement 2; Seven case studies which exemplify various 
types of public means of control and their influence of 
technical development 
  Endnotes 
<H5>  Summary </H5>
  Summarized Recommendation--see also Chapter 5: 
  Enterprises should not receive direct financial support for 
development of energy technology or investments in new energy 
technology. The subsidies which are granted in this direction 
should thus be abolished. On the other hand, society should 
stimulate continued basic R&amp;D cooperations and rapid 
spreading 
of R&amp;D results among enterprises. This can best be done 
through 
a certain increase in government support for jointly owned 
R&amp;D 
projects and development companies. 
  Society's most important task, however, is to create a 
climate for industrial activity which creates development power. 
The individually most important application area for improving 
the climate within the energy field is a more consistent, 
durable and in the long term credible fiscal and fee policy. 
Beyond this, it is essential, in order to improve the companies' 
supply of know-how, significantly to reinforce academic research 
within a few selective areas of technology, as well as in 
general to increase the opportunities of research to participate 
in international cooperation. 
<H3>  The Characteristics of Commercial Development of Energy 
Technology--see also Chapter 2: </H3>
  1. New technology affects society through its application. 
Ever so good technology which is not being used is therefore of 
limited value. 
  2. The company's incentive to carry out technical 
development 
is financial profitability. Since various R&amp;D projects fail, 
successful R&amp;D projects are characterized by very high 
profitability. 
  3. The time from project start to commercial introduction of 
new technology often turns out to be 10 years or more, after 
which it often takes another 10 years for projects to start 
paying off. Successful development projects therefore require 
patient financial involvement by the parties involved. 
  4. Successful product development projects are marked by the 
fact that early assessments and high-quality evaluations lead to 
a clear and early picture of the market and the properties of 
the product, which leads to the development of an effective 
product and market successes. Failed development projects are 
often due to the first assessments having been unclear. 
  5. New energy technology is mainly introduced in connection 
with new investments. Technology, particularly that which does 
not fit into existing systems, therefore achieves more rapid 
distribution during strong market growth, during structural 
changes or in industries where for other reasons there is a 
great deal of new investment. 
  6. On the customer side there is sound caution toward 
untested solutions. For large systems a commercially purchased 
reference facility of reasonable size is therefore crucial for 
further commercialization. 
  7. Well developed cooperation with the customer means that 
the necessary market orientation of the development work is 
facilitated and thus that the preconditions for success 
increase. This applies to both the development and the 
distribution phase. For development of large systems, 
cooperation with the customer is a prerequisite for success. 
  8. Energy technology is marked by high investment costs, 
long 
lifetime and high demands for accessibility of the systems. This 
leads to a certain inertia toward radical changes, and these 
take longer than in many other fields. 
<H3>  The Swedish Development of Energy Technology--see also 
Chapter 3: </H3>
  9. The Swedish energy technology development has largely 
been 
concentrated to a "technology triangle" consisting of the 
electricity-intensive basic industry, the power industry and the 
electrical engineering industry. A strong power industry and 
electrical engineering industry grew up in order to supply the 
growing basic industry, among others. A strong development need 
gradually emerged for being able to utilize the unique 
opportunities found in hydroelectric power, which was located at 
places other than the utilization centers. This led to expansion 
opportunities for the electrical engineering industry. It has 
been possible to apply the basic expertise that was created to 
other areas of technology, such as the field of nuclear 
technology. 
  10. The development usually took place in the form of 
development blocks, in which technology developers and 
technology buyers cooperated under business-like forms and with 
a distinct internal allocation of roles. 
  11. The Swedish development of energy technology appears 
unique from an international perspective. The development was 
facilitated by rapid market growth which made it easier to 
spread the technology, by successful sharing of risk between 
various players, by a stable surrounding world and, particularly 
during the post-war era, by a favorable financial situation. 
  12. Today, the development of energy technology in many ways 
faces a more difficult situation. The greater pace of changes in 
the rest of the world has led to higher concentration on short- 
term issues, the growth in energy use has decreased and the 
capital costs have increased. On the other hand, the more 
intense competition leads to more pressure on the companies to 
use their resources in the most efficient way, and the 
internationalized financial market makes financing of large 
projects easier, factors which stimulate technical development. 
  13. Within the power sector there is no longer any specific 
Swedish development of energy technology. As a result of growing 
development costs and reduced Swedish investment volume, the 
development costs must be spread over a larger market volume 
than the Swedish one. 
  14. Within the heating sector, a Swedish development course 
has a somewhat greater importance as a result of a larger 
domestic market, special needs by the customers and often lower 
development costs. In this field as well there is a growing 
internationalization, and here as well it is becoming less 
important to talk about a Swedish development course. 
  15. The deregulation and internationalization of the energy 
markets is putting the energy companies on a more equal footing 
with other industrial activity. This could possibly, primarily 
during the adjustment phase, lead to a certain reduced interest 
in sharing development risks. Just as for other capital- 
intensive processing industries, however, competitive advantages 
are to a major degree created by forward-looking investments in 
new technology, which is why the principal orientation will 
remain. 
<H3>  Society's Influence on Commercial Development of Energy 
Technology--see also Chapter 4: </H3>
  16. Society influences the technical development indirectly 
by changing the market conditions for technical development, 
here called climate factors, and by direct means of control 
aimed at the technology development or technology application, 
here called innovation support. In all, the climate for 
technical development has much greater significance for the 
technical renewal. 
  17. The long-range stability in government regulations, the 
interest rate level and the taxation and fee policy are three 
areas of particular importance for the climate of technical 
development in the energy field. It is further essential--which 
does not distinguish the energy field from other fields of 
technology--that there is a great deal of expertise in basic 
research and education and an economic policy which stimulates 
industrial activity. 
  18. Innovation support for companies has been given in three 
forms: regulation, financial means of control, and information. 
Regulations have been the traditional method to reduce the 
environmental consequences of technology application. In some 
cases taxes and other fees have been used for this purpose. 
Financial contributions have been the most common method for 
supporting certain technology developments. Tax relief has 
sometimes been used. Information has been sparingly used as 
innovation support. 
  19. Financial contributions for development projects have 
possibly in some cases accelerated an ongoing development 
process. In all, however, this support has not had any 
appreciable effects, neither positive nor negative, on the 
activity of the companies. 
  20. Taxes and fees, as well as regulations, have in general 
had much greater effect, but not always of the kind intended. 
  21. There are three main types of principal difficulties 
involving social support for the development of energy 
technology. The project selection fails for reasons of expertise 
and politics, the support is often not sufficiently 
long-lasting, or it has a negative impact on the natural 
innovation tendency in the companies. 
  22. By tradition, R&amp;D results have rapidly spread 
between the 
energy companies. The "marketization" which is under way could 
lead to a slower distribution of results and to more parallel 
work among enterprises. This should be opposed by reinforcing 
joint industry research. 
  23. Historically, the energy companies, and particularly the 
players in the "technology triangle," have been marked by a 
willingness to take technical risks when this was in line with 
the companies' strategic considerations. In principle this still 
applies. The sector is characterized by large companies with 
good opportunities for financing R&amp;D efforts. There is 
therefore 
no reason to assume that the energy companies in general are 
underinvesting in R&amp;D. 
  24. Steering the use of technology toward increasingly 
environmentally adapted technology is an essential social task. 
For that reason it is important that the environmental cost 
aspect is incorporated into the thinking. Regulations have often 
been more effective than environmental fees, which is likely to 
be due mostly to the fees having been exploited as an 
opportunity for taxation. These efforts must be credible, stable 
and as far as possible, undertaken in international cooperation. 
<H5>  1. Content and Organization </H5>
  This study analyzes how society should act in order to 
stimulate commercial development of energy technology. By 
commercial technical development is meant development, which 
from a shorter or longer perspective is aimed at methods, 
products or processes used in the market. 
  In Chapter 2 the technical development process, the forces 
behind it and the factors for success are analyzed. The 
objective is to answer the question: What determines the success 
for technical development projects and new technology, and to 
what extent is energy technology and the development of energy 
technology different from other technology development? 
  Technical development is also affected by factors of the 
surrounding world such as the companies' historical decisions, 
market development, competitors' actions, etc. In Chapter 3 the 
question is therefore asked: What has governed the orientation 
of energy technology development, and what are the effects of 
the structure and organization of the energy sector on this 
technical development? Also discussed in the chapter are ongoing 
and anticipated changes and their possible impact on the future 
development of energy technology. 
  Chapter 4 discusses society's role in the development of 
energy technology and the historical experience from government 
measures in Sweden and abroad. The main question is to what 
extent and in which ways society can influence the development 
of energy technology, and what the experiences of these measures 
are. 
  In Chapter 5, in conclusion, proposals are stated for the 
way 
society can stimulate commercial development of energy 
technology. The organization of the study is shown by the figure 
below [not included]: 
  In addition to the working group's own experience and 
evaluations, the study is based on three specialist seminars 
with about 15 invited theoreticians and practitioners. The 
seminars dealt with the issues discussed in Chapters 2, 3 and 4, 
respectively. 
  For each of these seminars a foundation report was worked 
out 
as supporting material. The reports from the first and third 
seminar, respectively, are given in Supplements 1 and 2 to this 
partial study, while the foundation for the second seminar forms 
its own report (AF, 1991). 
<H5>  2. What Characterizes Successful Energy Technology? </H5>
  In this chapter will be discussed future factors of success 
for technical development projects, factors which affect the 
speed of distribution for a new technology, as well as what 
distinguishes development of energy technology from other 
technical development. 
<H3>  2.1 What Characterizes Successful Technical Development 
Projects? </H3>
  By technical development projects is meant the entire 
process 
from idea to commercial product, by way of R&amp;D, product 
development, product adaptation, etc. A successful project is a 
project which leads to a product that sooner or later will 
generate profit. 
  Technical development is usually divided into basic 
research, 
applied research, production, demonstration and the distribution 
of the technology in the market. One often talks about the so- 
called development chain. The goal of basic research is internal 
scientific theory formation, and basic research has an intrinsic 
value, while other R&amp;D activities, in the shorter or longer 
term, are aimed at producing methods, products or production 
processes. It is often taken for granted that all the phases in 
the "development chain" must be passed through for technical 
development. This is not the case. Research is not a necessary 
first step for product development. Not even production 
development is always necessary for technical development. 
Learning effects which lead to technical development also occur 
in connection with undertaking other work. The last step, 
introducing the technology to the market, however, is a 
condition for the technology having an impact on society and 
thus leading to technical development in the actual sense. Thus, 
successful product development must lead to market-tested 
products and processes from which the technology developer as 
well as the buyer makes money. 
  The orientation toward results in product development leads 
to a difference in how research and development work. In 
commercial development work the effort is rapidly and 
effectively to achieve results. It may be said that research 
strives to talk about how something works. In product 
development, it is enough to know that it works, without for 
that reason having complete knowledge of why it happens this 
way. If difficulties occur in product development, there are two 
possibilities: "going around" the problems or compromising the 
performance characteristics of the product. Many elegant 
technical solutions involve precisely "going around" the 
difficulties. A good example of this from the case studies (see 
Supplement 1) is the HVDC [High Voltage-Direct Current] case, in 
which one actually never succeeded in solving the problem of the 
"backfiring" of the gas-filled rectifiers but it was still 
possible to use them as rectifiers by creating enough 
redundance. It is not very common that one succeeds by doing so, 
of course. Most usual is that one is forced to compromise with 
the performance of the product. 
  Often, it also turns out that in a certain phase it is not 
enough to know that the product works, but one has to know the 
physical foundations in greater detail in order to continue. 
This requires research and means that the course of development 
comes to a halt while waiting for these findings. 
  In principle, development projects can be divided into 
development of new generations of existing products and 
genuinely new development products of strategic importance for 
the future. A generational change is aimed at retaining 
positions in the marketplace and is the company's way of 
increasing competitive strength and profitability in the short 
run. Often, it turns out that by changing generations it is 
possible to reduce manufacturing costs or increase performance 
by up to 20 percent. New development projects mean strategic 
investments for the future, and it takes time before these 
investments become profitable. 
  In the meantime it is necessary for established products to 
generate profits ("cash cows") which can be used for the new 
development. Consequently, both types of projects must exist 
simultaneously, and a successful company thus works for both the 
long term and the short term at the same time. 
  The following section deals mainly with new development 
projects, although part of the reasoning can be applied to 
generational change projects. 
  Financial volume and development times vary greatly between 
various projects, product fields and types of technology. In the 
energy sector, as in other sectors of infrastructure character, 
the development is dominated by large projects and facilities 
with long technical and economic life. 
  The development costs for new technology are difficult to 
indicate precisely. Figures often include a great deal more than 
direct development costs and must always be treated with 
caution. The type of development processes which are described 
in Supplement 1, however, often involve direct development costs 
in the range of several hundred million kronor and up, usually 
followed by even higher costs for the first reference facility. 
  Figure 2.1 [not included] shows the time from idea to 
commercial product for 45 important innovations in Sweden during 
the postwar era. As can be seen in the figure, the times vary 
greatly around an average number of about eight years. Energy 
innovations are among the areas marked by long development 
times. Hence, it is not unusual to have development times of 
more than 10 years. 
  Distributing the technology in the market also proceeds 
relatively slowly, and perhaps for that reason it takes another 
approximately 10 years before the product has paid off its 
development costs. Such development courses naturally pose major 
demands for long-term involvement and financial stamina by the 
companies and, accordingly, require financially strong 
businesses. 
  Since the ultimate evaluation of whether the project was 
actually successful or not often cannot be undertaken until 
close to 20 years after the project idea, it is necessary when 
starting a development project to be assured that in the future 
the project will lead to financial and competitive advantages 
for the company. 
  The combination of high costs and long time frames have the 
result that the future profitability of the projects must be 
very high. Covering the cost of the project is therefore not 
enough of an incentive for the company to put its best 
development resources into a project. 
  The product development process can be divided into two 
phases: The search phase, in which a rather free search of 
alternative methods is made in order to solve problems and the 
product specification developed. In all, the search phase can 
consume up to 10 percent of the total development resources. 
After that, the development project itself ends. 
  The success factors[.sup]1[/] for a technical development 
project are many and the interplay between them is not always 
simple. Often it turns out, however, that successful technical 
development projects are marked by a chain of successes 
consisting of: 


    -  Early evaluations and high-quality assessments, which 
leads to 
  -  a clear and early picture of the market and the product's 
properties, which leads to 
  -  a strong product, which leads to 
  -  good market penetration. 

    One usually talks about "protocol" in the development work. 
With the "protocol" concept the entire development work is aimed 
correctly from the beginning, and this usually leads to a strong 
product. 
  All projects always include knowledge from outside. In 
Figure 
2.2 [not included] is shown a typology of various such methods 
for acquiring ideas and knowledge. It is thus not possible, 
necessary or desirable always to generate all knowledge oneself. 
Many insist that Swedish companies and Sweden on the whole have 
been particularly successful as regards acquiring knowledge from 
the surrounding world and converting it into new products and 
processes of their own. something which is particularly 
important for a small country. 
  The key to a successful development project is therefore to 
make the correct evaluations immediately in the initial phase. 
In order to do so, it is necessary to have a good and early 
product and system specification, which properly points out what 
market there is or can be expected and how to deal with it. The 
basic question is "When and how will the product be 
competitive?". On those occasions when the problem description 
(or problem definition) was lacking, was insufficient or even 
wrong, the projects usually failed. 
  The most common reason for such failure is that the market 
connection has been too weak. Experience from similar product 
development work provides better opportunities. Of course, the 
preconditions for successful evaluations increase if one has 
good knowledge of the customer of his needs. 
  A generally accepted truth is that new customers (new 
markets) are more difficult than new products (new technology) 
and the combination of new products and new customers is close 
to hopelessly difficult. This is because coupling the 
development to the market becomes considerably more difficult in 
this case. Well developed cooperation with the customer, with a 
knowledgeable potential customer, automatically leads to being 
able to enter marketing aspects into the development work and 
thus to being able to position the development work correctly 
from the beginning and increasing the opportunities for a good 
product. 
  At the same time as we earlier concluded that it is 
essential 
to have sufficient resources for development work, it is often 
not an advantage to have too many resources. Particularly not in 
the initial phase of development projects. This could lead to 
becoming careless with identifying the goal of the development 
work, which means that the development project is less well 
positioned and therefore leads to a poorer result. Once the 
search phase is concluded and the development project itself 
starts, it is often a major advantage to have large resources. 
Particularly for products with short production lives, the 
product must be quickly developed. This is facilitated by being 
able to pursue the development with parallel development paths, 
something which requires major resources. 
  As was stated above, successful development projects are 
often marked by close cooperation between the developer of the 
technology and an early, potential customer. In several of the 
case studies in Supplement 1, it is striking that there was 
considerable willingness to take risks by someone or both 
parties in the development work. Even in very large development 
projects this willingness to take risk can often be traced to 
some person or a small group of persons in leading positions. 
Without these "entrepreneurs" or "fiery souls," technical 
innovations do not proceed. It is essential to note, which can 
also be seen in the case studies, that the entrepreneur does not 
intrinsically need to be directly involved in the development 
work, but can very well be an early customer. 
  The incentive for the entrepreneur is usually the hope for 
financial profit, of course, and for that reason it is important 
for tax regulations, etc. to be designed in such a way that the 
entrepreneur has a clear financial incentive. 
<H5>  2.2 Spreading New Technology in the Market </H5>
  One proven experience is that Sweden has been successful not 
only in gathering R&amp;D experience from the rest of the world 
but 
also regarding rapid spreading of technology. This applies to 
the energy sector as well. 
  The factors which affect the success of a technology in the 
market naturally depend to a large extent on what leads to a 
successful development project. Well-developed, early 
cooperation with the customer appears to be the most important 
individual factor in this case as well. This means that many 
difficulties are automatically avoided. At the same time, the 
lack of such early customer cooperation means that so many 
difficulties accumulate that the product will scarcely succeed 
in the market. 
  New technology is often introduced in connection with new 
investments. If new technology is to achieve good distribution, 
it must therefore be available when the customer group has a 
need for new investments. This is particularly important for 
technology that cannot be applied to existing facilities, which 
is often the case for process technology. 
  In a growing market capacity must be expanded, while with 
zero growth new investments need only to be undertaken at the 
rate old facilities are taken out of operation. That makes 
spreading new technology much more rapid during strong market 
growth. The fact that nuclear power was able to achieve such 
rapid distribution in the Swedish energy system was made easier, 
for example, because the penetration took place in a market 
under rapid growth. Correspondingly, a strong structural 
reorganization leads to major opportunities for new technology. 
The rapid distribution processes which are provided in the case 
descriptions for the TMP [Thermo-Mechanical Pulp] process and 
the steel development in Supplement 1 should at least in part be 
seen in the light of the rapid structural change which occurred 
within these industries at the same time. These two sample cases 
also show that even in capital-intensive, mature, industries new 
technology can spread remarkably quickly, if suitable conditions 
prevail. 
  If investment willingness is low, the speed of distribution 
for new technology is usually slow. This will be the case during 
slow market growth, for example. This slow distribution is 
particularly striking in connection with a transition from a 
growth situation to a non-growth situation, when for a period 
replacement investments will be particularly small as a result 
of a relatively modern physical plant structure. 
  The most important individual property for the market 
penetration of the product, given that a need for the product 
exists, is the advantages offered by the product relative to 
previous products. Since business activity imposes demands for 
"measurability," the improvement, at least as regards producer 
goods, must be financially or technically measurable in the form 
of improved product performance or lower costs. Thus, it is not 
enough for the product to "be perceived" as better. 
  The course of the distribution is also affected by the 
product's compatibility with existing norms, standards and 
technical environment. Market penetration takes longer for 
technology which does not fit existing systems, technically or 
organizationally, or which, by being radically different or 
complex, are perceived as foreign by the customers. 
  The opportunity to test the technology on a reasonable scale 
also affects the course of the distribution. Technology 
involving technical risks which must be taken in facilities 
which are felt to be large by those involved have greater 
difficulties than where the technical risk has been dealt with 
in a comparatively small pilot facility. 
  One factor which in the case studies appears important for 
spreading the technology is the reference facility. Very high 
demands for accessibility of the products are often placed on 
process technology. At the same time, new investment has 
consequences far into the future. The result of this is that a 
buyer of such technology feels healthy caution toward untested 
technical solutions. It is therefore essential for distribution 
to build an initial, moderately large reference facility on a 
commercial basis, bought by a respected customer, known for 
being a good purchaser. Such a facility is important for the 
continued technical evaluation but still more important for 
making commercial evaluation easier for new customers. A 
demonstration facility not built on a commercial basis is of 
limited value, however. Although it could possibly show that the 
technology works, it does not facilitate the customers' 
commercial assessment in the same way. 
<H5>  2.3 Distinguishing Factors for Developing Energy Technology </H5>
  The factors of success in the previous section are mainly 
general, independent of the technical field. In this section is 
discussed to what extent the development of energy technology 
differs from other technical development. After that, the 
characteristics for cable-transmitted energy technology and the 
special consequences for those development patterns are 
discussed. This is because the development of energy technology 
in Sweden to a large extent involved cable-transmitted 
technology and technical components or systems which operated 
within the framework of cable grids. 
  What Characterizes the Development of Energy 
Technology? 
  Energy technology has many similarities with other process 
industry: 


    -  it requires large, initial investments 
  -  it leads to strong relationships of dependence between the 
energy supplier and the energy user 
  -  it poses special demands for careful production planning 
since 
the maximum production capacity is greatly limited, and 
  -  it poses particularly great demands on accessibility in the 
systems. 

    All in all, this results in the energy system having a 
considerable, built-in "inertia" against technical changes. 
Radical change of the architecture of the energy system is a 
process which ranges of several decades, while such a 
development in some other fields can be considerably faster. The 
development times for producing new technologies and processes 
are also comparatively long, which further reinforces the "long 
perspective" in energy technology development. 
  The special market structure with a few equipment 
manufacturers and energy suppliers is to some extent a result of 
the chosen technology. Only strong companies with considerable 
financial stamina and extensive technical know-how can cope with 
large, long-term projects of high technical complexity and large 
financial scope. This structure, in turn, has created special 
preconditions for long-range, close cooperation. The customers 
have known that there were supplier companies with a great deal 
of ability to satisfy their wishes. At the same time the 
supplier companies have met strong customers, often with stable 
social support, who have been able to risk a failed project 
without too much problem. The energy companies, between 
themselves, have also been marked by a striking openness, which 
is facilitated, of course, by the fact that there was no 
competitive situation. Historically, the development of energy 
technology is therefore characterized by having been conducted 
in an unusually cooperative environment and by market relations 
of a particularly lasting nature. 
  Something which distinguishes the energy field from several 
other fields with correspondingly high proportions of capital 
costs, such as the telecommunications field, is that the 
development of the operating costs, in this case the development 
of fuel costs, has turned out to be of decisive importance for 
the profitability of the investments. This is due to the very 
large fluctuations in raw material prices and taxes. 
  Of course, the energy field also differs because both 
technology and marketing questions have been affected by 
political decisions to a greater extent than in other areas of 
technology. This is true both in Sweden and in several other 
countries. It is also connected with the fact that society has 
quite favorable opportunities for influencing the development 
because of the close involvement of the energy sector with 
environmental and resource issues, and because society in 
several countries has been directly involved as owner in one or 
more of the energy companies, as well as the importance of this 
for the social development. 
  The Effects of Cable-Transmitted Technology on 
Development Patterns 
  A cable-transmitted energy system poses particularly high 
demands on the development in a number of respects. 
  A cable-transmitted system creates an even stronger 
dependence between supplier and customer. The customer has 
become dependent on an energy-supplying link and cannot easily 
change supplier if he is not satisfied. The supplier is also 
greatly dependent on his customers, since the investment made 
cannot be changed with ease. The customers are not quite as 
dependent on just one supplier, but can change to someone else 
if the cooperation is not working. The suppliers can also change 
the circle of customers during the lifetime of the investment. 
  Since the investment in a cable grid has a very long life 
and 
has the character of a "sunk cost" when it is completed, it has 
impact far into the future. The investment will thus affect the 
future scope of action. 
  In a cable-transmitted system it is not only on the 
production side that it is very important to have even 
utilization. It is just as important for utilization in the 
distribution system to be even, partly because the large amount 
of capital invested should be efficiently utilized, and partly 
because the maximum transmission capability is more limited than 
in a non-cable- conducted system. After all, there are 
ordinarily no possibilities of employing extra transmission 
capacity, as in the case of a non-cable-transmitted system. 
  Furthermore, there is usually not any storage possibility 
corresponding to the one in non-cable-transmitted systems. 
Production must take place at the same time as consumption, 
which is in some contrast to the effort for even utilization of 
the system and makes optimization extra difficult. This leads to 
cable-transmitted energy systems being marked by particularly 
large advantages of scale. By building large systems and 
coupling together production units and users with different 
characteristics, it is possible to achieve the desired balance 
at the same time as variations on both the production and the 
utilization side can be dealt with. 
  In sum, the factors mentioned above have the effect that the 
energy technology which is part of cable-transmitted 
distribution systems operates under special development 
circumstances. 
  At the same time it must be stated that there are 
differences 
in degree between cable-transmitted systems which are due to the 
fundamental architecture of the systems. In this case it is 
possible to distinguish between cable-transmitted systems on the 
one hand, which are first established locally in order later to 
be coupled into an integrated grid, and, on the other hand, 
entirely new structures which can be directly combined into an 
integrated grid. A system which is built locally and then 
integrated involves fewer initial investments but often, in the 
long run, poorer development possibilities than a system 
established from the beginning. 
<H5>  3. The Technical Development Within the Energy Industry </H5>
  The following chapter analyzes development patterns for the 
Swedish energy system. 
  After a brief description of the power and heating industry 
and its supplying industry and its structure, in section 3.2 we 
will discuss development patterns for the Swedish energy system 
and the development of the Swedish energy technology. In the 
concluding section we will analyze certain current development 
patterns as well as important future questions for the 
development of energy technology. 
<H5>  3.1 The Structure of the Energy Industry </H5>
  An energy system includes three principal types of players. 
Energy suppliers, energy users and equipment manufacturers, who 
deliver technical equipment to suppliers and users. While the 
energy suppliers and equipment manufacturers are clearly 
identifiable groups, the energy users are a heterogeneous crowd, 
which includes everything from very large customers, such as a 
steel mill, down to private persons. In the following 
description, interest is focused partly on the supplying 
industry and equipment manufacturers, and partly on the heating 
and electric power industry. 
  Producers of power and heat (meaning the power companies and 
the municipal power plants) in 1990 had a turnover of about 65 
billion kronor and employed about 20,000 persons (AF, 1991). 
This is somewhat less than the pulp and paper industry (73 
billion kronor) and automobile industry (77 billion kronor), but 
is, for example, more than three times more than the turnover in 
the telecommunications industry (23 billion kronor) and seven 
times more than the pharmaceutical industry (9.3 billion kronor). 
  Judged by the number of employees, the automobile industry 
is 
nearly three times larger, the pulp and paper industry twice as 
large and the telecommunications industry approximately the same 
size as the power and heating industry. The pharmaceutical 
industry has about one-third as many employees. The turnover per 
employee is therefore more than twice as high among power and 
heat producers as in the already very capital-intensive pulp and 
paper industry and nearly four times higher than in the 
telecommunications industry. A distinctive feature of the energy 
industry is thus an almost extremely high capital intensity. 
  Of the Swedish power production capacity Vattenfall owns 50 
percent, the industry 25 percent, the municipalities 19 percent 
and others six percent (applies to 1991). In comparison with 
other countries the ownership of the electric power production 
is well balanced between government, municipal and private 
interests. The power industry, and of course the municipal power 
plants as well, have traditionally been of an almost totally 
national character with a low degree of internationalization. 
Traditionally, there also has never been any extensive foreign 
ownership interest. A certain internationalization and greater 
international ownership has taken place in the last few years. 
The obstacles to entering the industry are high. Traditionally, 
legislation and concessions have in many cases made starting new 
businesses impossible. Although this is not the case, the 
opportunities for new establishment are comparatively small as a 
result of the very large investments required in many areas. 
  There are about 300 companies which distribute electric 
power 
in the country. The 10 largest power distributors have 37 
percent of Sweden's total subscribers. The largest distributors 
are Sydkraft, Stockholm Energi, Vattenfall and Goteborg Energi. 
  During the period 1970-1990 power consumption more than 
doubled in Sweden, from 63 Twh/year to 140 Twh/year (including 
transmission losses). This means an average rate of increase of 
more than 4 percent per year. Distributed over the period, the 
increase from 1970 to 1975 was a total of 26 percent, 1975-1980 
a total of 18 percent, 1980-1985 a total of 39 percent and 1985- 
1990 a total of seven percent. At present the growth is lower. 
  Just as the electric power industry, the district heating 
industry can be divided into a production segment and a 
distribution segment. In most cases a vertical integration 
exists between producer and distributor, which is why that 
division is not as obvious. District heat is delivered from hot 
water centers and thermal power plants. Characteristic of the 
industry is that there is major variation in size. The 10 
largest plants are responsible for about 50 percent of the 
district heat deliveries. The 100 smallest plants (about 
two-thirds of the number of plants) only represent about 15 
percent. The typical owner of a district heating grid and 
production facility is a municipality or a municipally-owned 
corporation. The largest suppliers of district heat in Sweden 
are Stockholm Energi, Goteborg Energi, Malmo Energi, Vasteras 
Tekniska Verken and Uppsala Energi. 
  District heat was expanded quite rapidly during the 1970's 
and the first half of the 1980's. No significant market growth 
can be foreseen at present outside the larger cities, since most 
areas suitable for district heating grids have already been 
utilized. 
  Several Swedish companies in the heavy mechanical 
engineering 
and electrical engineering industry have established their 
strength on the basis of delivering equipment to energy 
facilities. The dominant company, particularly in electrical 
engineering, has of course been ASEA/ABB. ABB companies 
operating in Sweden are big on light-water reactors, steam 
turbines, generators, high-voltage transmission equipment, 
switching gear, transformers, electric motors, control 
equipment, stack gas purification equipment, in order just to 
mention some of the most important product fields. 
  For delivery of large energy production components, such as 
furnaces or turbines, there are only a few suppliers in Sweden. 
When it comes to traditional steam boilers for power plants, 
there are no longer any manufacturers under Swedish ownership in 
Sweden. Suppliers for the Swedish market are, among others, ABB, 
AEG, Ahlstrom, Kvaerner and Siemens. 
  For smaller equipment details within the energy industry, 
such as transformers, switching equipment, valves, pumps, etc. 
there are several suppliers, of whom a few foreign ones, such as 
Siemens, also have a small production in Sweden. 
<H3>  3.2 What Characterizes the Swedish Development of Energy 
Technology? </H3>
  The development of energy technology in Sweden in several 
respects equals the technical development in the electric power 
sector. By that is not meant that the development has solely 
involved electrical engineering, but that the development was 
undertaken with a view toward the needs of the electrical 
sector. This emphasis can be traced to the establishment of the 
energy system and to the composition of Swedish industry. 
  For a long time Swedish industrial development was mostly 
equivalent to the development of basic industry. The principal 
task of the energy sector became to supply this trade of such 
vital importance to Sweden with sufficient quantities of 
sufficiently cheap energy. Gradually, a considerable mechanical 
engineering industry also appeared, which, to be sure, did not 
require large amounts of energy but nevertheless depended on an 
assured supply primarily of electric power. Guaranteed 
deliveries of sufficient amounts of electric power at 
competitive prices thus quickly became a condition for the 
ability of the initially strongly export-oriented Swedish 
industry to compete. This required a strong power industry. 
  At the beginning of the century the supply and use of 
electricity was local. With increasing demand greater capacity 
was needed. The power industry realized at an early stage that 
the special Swedish situation with major natural resources, 
located in completely different places than the consumption 
centers, would be able to provide unique opportunities for 
solving the electric power supply in a rational and 
cost-effective way. There was talk during this period of "the 
white coal" (that is to say hydroelectric power) and how it 
could be utilized. 
  The technology to do so was not available, however. The 
powerful need for development created expansion opportunities 
for the Swedish electrical engineering industry headed by ASEA. 
This development provided basic technical know-how and player 
relationships which could be used as a foundation when the 
expansion of hydroelectric power was completed and other 
technical systems were needed to meet the constantly growing 
need for electricity. The establishment of the nuclear power 
industry, above all, is an example of this. 
  The typical pattern for the development of the Swedish 
energy 
technology has therefore been that technology was developed in 
order to meet needs within the Swedish energy system. These 
products, and the knowledge and expertise which have accumulated 
in the tracks of this development, have then in several cases 
become internationally successful products. Some outstanding 
examples of this are, for example, ASEA's high-voltage 
transmission equipment, for alternating current as well as for 
direct current, turbines, primarily from ASEA STAL, and ASEA 
ATOM's nuclear reactors. 
  One may speak about there being a "technology triangle" 
between ASEA/ABB and the power companies (primarily Sydkraft and 
Vattenfall) and the electricity-intensive industry (chiefly the 
pulp and paper industry and the iron and steel industry). It is 
in the interface between these industries that development needs 
and technical know-how have been found, so that meaningful 
development cooperations could be established. Large projects 
which involve long-term commitments and have long repayment 
periods pose major demands on careful coordination. The result 
of this is that technology development is made easier by a 
guarantor, who assures the long-range involvement of the 
parties. Several of the development projects are marked by the 
existence of such a guarantor. The relationships are explained 
by the figure below [not included]. 
  The development has often assumed the character of 
development cooperations and has often taken place under 
businesslike forms, in which the roles of the various players 
were clear and expressed. The fact that precisely Swedish 
players cooperated therefore is not due to any forced Swedish 
protectionism, but to the fact that it was actually more 
rational. 
  There are several examples of this type of development 
cooperation in Sweden, even outside the field of 
energy[.sup]2[/], and Dahmen has coined the expression 
development blocks to describe similar processes in his study of 
the Swedish industrial development during the period between the 
wars (Dahmen, 1950). 
  In certain cases these development blocks consisted directly 
of cooperation between a couple of companies. The cooperation 
between ASEA and Vattenfall regarding high-voltage technology 
represents such an example. An important and well-known example 
in which a guarantor facilitated the development is Stockholms 
Enskilda Bank's activity at the beginning of the century, when 
the bank through favorable credits facilitated the expansion of 
hydroelectric power and greatly participated in establishing 
ASEA as a company (Gasslander, 1956). Nuclear power represents a 
clear example of a development block in which close cooperation 
between several players, different ones at different times, 
brought the development forward. For nuclear power the state 
assumed an essential role as a guarantor in order to make the 
development easier. Even in recent times there are examples that 
such development blocks have originated. The foremost example is 
the development of large heat pumps, in which ASEA STAL and the 
municipal thermal power plants, by acting with foresight, were 
rapidly able to preserve the potential of the heat pump in the 
district heating grids. 
  The development of new technology has not been wholly 
concentrated to the technology triangle, of course. But the 
Swedish energy sector must still be said to be characterized by 
the fact that it includes strong and weak partial sectors from 
the aspect of development. By developmentally weak partial 
industries we mean that they tends to underinvest in technical 
development as a result of a lack of incentive. The usual 
opinion is that primarily the construction sector and the 
municipal energy plants represent these developmentally weak 
sectors. 
  In the construction sector these problems are on the product 
side. The problem has not been general, but was mainly linked to 
the multi-family dwelling sector. Technical development was 
undertaken in order to meet stiff and rigid product standards 
rather than actual product development needs. In combination 
with a nearly insatiable demand for the products, the 
development pressure was thus very low. The reduced regulatory 
control which now marks the construction sector, in combination 
with a more normalized demand which leads to greater 
competition, can be expected to increase the incentives for 
development in the future. This is demonstrated above all by the 
experience in the small housing sector, where competitive 
pressure has been higher and development more favorable. New 
building standards resulted in electrical power during the past 
10 years being the only financially justifiable alternative in 
small houses. The fact that electric heat was installed in turn 
resulted in the market having introduced an insulating standard 
at a higher level than prescribed by the standards. The 
development in the small housing sector shows that the market 
functions even as regards more efficient energy if provided with 
favorable opportunities. Not even in the construction process 
itself have there been any corresponding tendencies toward 
underinvestment. On the contrary; Swedish companies were 
responsible for a considerable part of the international 
technical development involving the construction process. 
  That the municipal power plants represented a 
developmentally 
weak industry is primarily explained by the fact that there were 
weak owners. The owners were influenced by interest groups which 
wanted the municipal energy plant to keep the rates as low as 
possible in the short run, which necessarily created 
difficulties for the companies in undertaking projects of an 
R&amp;D 
nature, which in the short term predominantly mean higher costs 
for the company. This tendency was reinforced by the ample 
support which was given. The investment patterns have changed, 
so that the government had to put up a significant part of the 
costs. Without the subsidies the owners would most likely have 
had to assume greater responsibility for the companies' 
development, so that the presence of financial development 
subsidies contributed to a poorer development than what would 
otherwise have been the case. 
<H5>  3.3 Why Did the Development Turn Out This Way? </H5>
  A few factors seem particularly important in order to 
explain 
the development: 


    -  The development of the market 
  -  the interplay and relationships between the various players 
  -  the conditions of the surrounding world. 

    It is in this connection essential to distinguish between 
the 
earlier development, up to the mid-1970's, and the changes which 
have occurred since then. 
  The Earlier Development 
  The lasting, strong growth in energy, and particularly 
electricity, consumption created a powerful need for new 
capacity. This opened up major market opportunities for 
innovative companies. The rapid growth also reduced the 
investment risk for the power companies. In that strong growth 
situation it was not a direct catastrophe for a company in a 
monopolistic situation if capacity "happened" to be expanded 
somewhat to quickly. After only a few years new demand 
developed, which caused the facility to be needed. 
  Regarding the player structure, it can be noted that 
cooperation has taken place between quite large companies and 
that there have been close relationships and major confidence in 
one another's capability. Accordingly, one has been convinced 
that the problems could actually be solved, and if any project 
were to fail, contrary to expectations, the parties would manage 
to accept financial failure without insurmountable difficulties. 
At the same time it was obvious that the buyer side would assume 
some of the risks with the development work.[.sup]3[/] 
  It should also be noted that there was strong government 
involvement as support for this development. Other than in 
exceptional cases, the support did not affect technical or 
commercial questions but meant that the players could anticipate 
that the rules of the game in the cooperation would not 
drastically change during the course of the work. The companies 
could thus use long depreciation periods for new investments, 
since one was acting in a politically and market-wise very 
stable environment. The government also influenced the 
development through the heavily regulated credit market, since 
there were low nominal interest rates and there was plenty of 
capital because of the extensive public savings, for example. 
  The Later Development 
  During the most recent 20-year period, the conditions for 
energy technology have gradually changed. Market opportunities 
have changed both for the industrial and the energy companies. 
The costs of technical development have also risen. 
  An often represented view is that Swedish industry has 
become 
more short-sighted during the 1970's and 1980's. It is quite 
clear that over the more recent 25-year period the majority of 
industrial companies has encountered a faster pace of change in 
the surrounding world, including, for example, more rapid market 
changes and greater international competition. As a reaction to 
this greater pace of change in the rest of the world, in the 
late 1960's an altered leadership philosophy emerged within the 
manufacturing industry. Quarterly balance sheets, 
divisionalization and profit units created more pressure on 
company managements always to show a good result. The trend was 
reinforced by the wave of incorporations and dispersions of 
ownership during the 1980's. In all, this development has been 
favorable by creating greater pressure on company managements to 
work more actively with the firms' development, but at the same 
time it has, of course, heightened interest in the company's 
short-term goals. Greater concentration on short-term issues 
does not, however, as has sometimes been indicated, necessarily 
mean lower efficiency in the long term. If the surrounding world 
has changed, it is necessary to undertake measures against or 
adjust to these changes. At the same time there is obviously 
risk that focusing on the long term, which is also necessary for 
the company's long-range success, may be neglected in this 
process. 
  The energy companies also faced a less predictable future 
during this period. The energy price fluctuations had been a 
constant problem since the beginning of the 1970's. The price 
fluctuations were reinforced by the effects caused by varying 
taxes and environmental fees. Often there were also subsidies 
available for new investments, which further increased the 
uncertainty about the cost of various alternatives. Add to this 
the political uncertainty about the future of nuclear power, 
which meant that there was some risk that 50 percent of the 
electric power production capacity would need replacement in the 
short term. 
  As for the market development, the 1970's represented a 
clearly lower rate of growth. According to the official energy 
statistics, the energy consumption even decreased.[.sup]4[/] 
In the early 1980's the simultaneous economic boom, conversion 
to electric heat, and the expansion of the district heating 
grids led to rapid market growth in both the electric power and 
heating sector. On the electric power side, this development 
was, of course, facilitated by the fact that new nuclear power 
plants rapidly entered the system in the late 1970's and early 
1980's. The rate of growth in recent years, even regardless of 
the effect of the economic conditions, has decreased as a result 
of greater energy efficiency and the fact that conversion to 
electric and district heating has halted. This limited growth 
has not required new production capacity to any major extent, 
and new investments during the second half of the 1980's have 
been very limited, in the area of power as well as of heating. 
  The higher interest rate situation has also had a major 
impact in the direction of projects with a short period of 
repayment. This applies to both industrial and energy companies. 
  The opportunities for technology development have also 
changed. Swedish reference facilities and operating experience 
have been very important for the further commercialization of 
new technology. A certain change has occurred, however, which 
can be exemplified by the dominant company in the field in 
Sweden, ABB. Sweden is still an important domestic market for 
the majority of ABB companies active in Sweden, of course. 
However, during the 1970's and 1980's an internationalization of 
the electrical engineering industry took place, which resulted 
in Sweden no longer having the same character of "springboard to 
the world" for ABB as was the case for ASEA. Previously, the 
company essentially searched out development problems in Sweden 
and developed products for the Swedish market, which were then 
adapted for other markets. Nowadays, the technical development 
in the electrical engineering industry takes place for the 
international market, and the Swedish market no longer occupies 
the same special position. The corresponding development also 
applies to many other companies, small as well as large, which 
are active in the infrastructure field.[.sup]5[/] 
  One driving force behind this development has been higher 
development costs as a result of increasingly advanced and 
complex technical systems, which means that the development 
costs must be distributed over a larger market. That provides 
increasingly fewer opportunities for special national solutions 
in markets which are comparatively small, such as the Swedish 
one. Another important driving force in Sweden is that the 
combination of lower market growth and a modern establishment 
structure has meant that there was no need for new facilities 
after the introduction of nuclear power. This forced the 
industrial companies to direct their eyes even more toward the 
needs of the surrounding world. Altogether, this has the result 
that there is increasingly less relevance in speaking of 
specifically Swedish technology development in the energy field. 
It applies to a particularly high degree in the electric power 
sector. The same development trends can also be noticed in the 
heating sector, however, although this development is somewhat 
later in time as a result of generally lower development costs 
and a larger domestic market. 
  All the factors given above contributed to the generation of 
fewer long-range development projects in Sweden in the energy 
field over the past 10-15 years, compared to what was previously 
the case. 
<H5>  3.4 Development Trends for the Future </H5>
  In this section will be discussed development trends and 
their potential effects on the technical development. Just as 
all other predictions for the future, these must be treated with 
caution. 
  There are a number of indications that both the electric 
power and the heating market in Sweden and in our immediate 
environment face a historical break with the trend. Even if 
industrial growth during the 1990's will be good, which is 
desirable, it is likely that the growth in energy consumption 
will be of limited extent. At the same time the physical plant 
structure is relatively modern and, particularly in the area of 
electric power, a certain increase in demand could be met by 
increasing output from existing facilities. The greater European 
integration of electricity systems simultaneously leads to more 
efficient utilization of existing reserves and for that reason 
they can be shrunk from an overall point of view. In general, 
this argues for a limited need for new construction of power and 
thermal facilities for quite a long time, at least 10 years, 
which has a considerable impact on the penetration of new 
technology, especially against the background of the modern 
facility structure. Remodeling, for example as a result of 
stricter environmental requirements, and current maintenance and 
modernizations will take place, but these are measures of 
comparatively limited extent. 
  New investments could, of course, occur even over a shorter 
time frame, in that case probably for reasons of competition in 
the wake of the now ongoing regulation. If a more extensive 
export market for electric power should develop, this could also 
lead to new investments. 
  Nuclear power still represents an uncertainty factor, of 
course, with considerable consequences for the plans by the 
energy companies, since it will affect the time at which new 
production capacity will be needed. If nuclear power is to be 
abolished by the year 2010, very extensive new construction will 
have to be started within a 10-year period, while more extensive 
replacement investments can otherwise wait. Since new technology 
is introduced in connection with new investments, and nuclear 
power abolition will lead to a forced investment wave, the 
opportunities for rapid spreading of new technology will be 
greater if nuclear power is abolished. That this is the case 
should not be interpreted as this report advocating such 
abolition. Spreading new technology is not an end in itself. 
  Even the continued development of scientific knowledge in 
the 
area of climate could lead to continued political uncertainty 
for a long time. 
  An interesting development with potential consequences for 
technical development is the deregulation of certain energy 
markets which is under way. This "market-liberal" wave, which is 
an international phenomenon and includes, among other things, 
greater private ownership of energy companies, leads to a 
gradual transition from an express social service role in the 
direction of greater similarity with other industrial activity, 
including the same demands for financial profit for the owners 
and with a position that is tangibly more exposed to 
competition. Express social responsibility, for example in the 
form of delivery obligation and cost-based pricing, is beginning 
to dissolve. The role more similar to other industrial activity 
also includes introducing competition for customers. Previously, 
the energy companies had an assured customer base. Other 
companies were excluded through the concession. When the market 
is opened up, the producer does not sit as securely in his 
market, which introduces an additional element of risk into the 
commercial evaluation of new investment projects. 
  Against the background of the factors mentioned above, it 
appears likely that the companies' orientation to some extent 
will be guided toward activities that pay off more rapidly. This 
could have the consequence of reduced willingness to assume 
risks for long-range and uncertain technical development 
projects. 
  At the same time, experience in other areas indicates that 
competition stimulates technical development by increasing 
pressure on the organizations to use their resources in the most 
efficient manner. Experience from other technically similar 
industries, such as the chemical engineering industry or the 
forest industry, indicates that there is no conflict between 
short-term economic profitability and investments in long-term 
technical development and new technology; rather, the opposite. 
In a market exposed to competition, short-term profitability is 
a precondition for companies investing sufficiently much in 
R&amp;D 
and daring to undertake purchases of previously untested 
technology. Naturally, it is necessary to have the simultaneous 
capability and resources to do this. 
  Accordingly, the reduced risktaking indicated above is 
likely 
to be primarily a temporary phenomenon, which will mark the 
energy industry in the restructuring phase now under way. In the 
long run, competitive ability is created in this industry, just 
as in most other types of industrial activity, largely by 
investment in new technology. When the companies have found 
their new positions, the view of new technology will not be 
fundamentally different from what has traditionally been the 
case. 
  As was previously mentioned, we in Sweden used to have a low 
real interest rate for energy investments, that is to say the 
energy price increase was close to the nominal interest rates 
which favored major investments. Today, we have a deregulated 
credit market with high interest rates. There is much indication 
that the tendency of comparatively high interest rates and low 
inflation will continue for the future. This could affect the 
development in the direction of less investment-heavy technology 
and toward technology which involves shorter repayment periods. 
As a counterbalance to this tendency, there is now at the same 
time an internationalized credit market. This results in an 
equalization of the financial terms, and the internationalized 
capital market is likely in the long run to lead to more 
effective financial markets and thus to a certain downward 
pressure on interest rates. 
  One question for the future is whether today there is any 
relevance whatsoever in the technology triangle earlier 
described. As was mentioned in the previous section, the ties 
between the electrical engineering industry and the power 
industry have weakened, primarily as a result of the 
globalization of the supplying industry. The now ongoing 
deregulation of the electric power markets is likely to mean 
that the relationship between the power industry and the 
electricity-intensive industry will be affected. To a certain 
extent the power industry can be expected to focus a greater 
part of its interest on higher-paying customers in other 
countries. Society's role of stronger emphasis on market 
solutions, which is supported by the present EEA [European 
Economic Area]/EC adjustment, will further weaken the technology 
triangle, and for the future one might thus question whether it 
is not more or less in the process of dissolving. 
  With the greater internationalization in the wake of the 
EC's 
internal market, major changes are under way with general impact 
on society. The change in the financial markets and the 
transportation market will be especially great, of course. In 
the energy sector as well the consequences will be significant, 
although it is difficult to predict exactly what these changes 
will be. However, this increased internationalization further 
accentuates the need for acquiring knowledge and technology from 
the surrounding world. 
<H5>  4. Society and the Development of Energy Technology </H5>
  The following chapter discusses society's opportunities to 
influence commercial development of energy technology. The 
discussion is supplemented by the case study material which is 
given in Supplement 2. Society's impact on technical development 
can in principle be divided into two categories: 


    -  Efforts which influence the climate for technical 
development in society 
  -  efforts which are more directly aimed at stimulating all or 
certain innovation activity ("innovation support"). 

    The main purpose of this chapter is to discuss the latter 
activity. Since, during the course of the work, it has become 
increasingly clear that a favorable climate for technical 
development generally speaking is of much greater significance 
for the firms' development strength, we will begin by taking a 
closer look at climate factors of particular importance 
precisely for the development of energy technology. 
<H5>  4.1 The Climate for Technical Development </H5>
  The development which was described in the previous section, 
with more international competition and weaker national 
networks, further accentuates, if that is possible, the 
importance of the innovation climate for development. In order 
to be competitive, it is probably not enough for Sweden to have 
an innovation climate that is as good as in other countries. 
Sweden, with a small domestic market, large distances to 
customer markets, a minor language, etc., must, in order to 
compete, have a more favorable climate for industrial activity 
compared to those countries which have better preconditions 
because of size and geographic location. Five especially 
important climate factors for the development of energy 
technology have been identified: 


    -  Basic research and education 
  -  long-range stability in government regulations 
  -  the interest rate level 
  -  energy taxes and fees 
  -  general economic policy (inflation, tax burden) 

    Of these, the first and last ones are likely to be important 
in general, while the three in the middle are of special 
significance for the energy sector. This is due to the 
dependence on the long perspective in investments and the high 
capital intensity. 
  A great deal of know-how in basic research and education is 
essential, partly because of the research results as such, but 
perhaps to at least as large a degree as a source of good 
personnel for the companies. Competency in academic institutions 
is satisfactory in principle. However, there are areas in which 
society should try to strengthen the expertise. The fields most 
important to industry to which this applies is electric power 
technology and nuclear technology, fields which tend to be 
neglected in the government's major concentration on energy 
research. Previously, commerce and industry to some extent tried 
to compensate for this through its own efforts in academic 
institutions, which turned out not to be easy, in part because 
of the management forms of the institutions. 
  It is necessary for the political decisions of importance 
for 
the industry to be stable and have long-range credibility. In a 
situation where decisive factors affecting decisions cannot be 
predicted at all, the companies increase their concentration on 
the short-term perspective. Measures which offer extremely high 
flexibility will also be prioritized. Overall, these flexible 
solutions are not always the ones which would be most rational 
in a more stable environment. Long-range activities, 
particularly those which involve considerable commitments for 
the future, are shelved while waiting for the ability to have a 
better overview of the conditions. 
  As was mentioned in Chapter 2, the development of operating 
costs has often turned out to have a fundamental effect on 
profitability, because of the price development for energy raw 
materials and for the fiscal and fee policy. The market 
fluctuations in the raw material markets have been difficult to 
predict, particularly since 1973. By introducing yet another 
uncertainty in the form of variations in taxes and fees, the 
problems have become nearly insurmountable. During the 1980's 
the municipal energy companies, above all, operated in a very 
difficult environment in this respect, and the investments made 
in coal technology, for instance, during the first half of the 
1980's, supported by the government, turned out to be less 
successful after the state, within the course of a few years, 
raised the coal tax from zero to a level approximately three 
times higher than the coal price. 
  In one important respect, tax changes introduce an even 
greater assessment difficulty than normal market changes. Market 
changes are cyclical in nature. At the same time, investment 
decisions often have a lifetime spanning several market cycles. 
The result is that investment decisions contrary to the market 
development, if one succeeds in "overwintering" the downturn 
phase, often still turn out to be fortunate in the long term. 
Government regulations do not have this cyclical nature, which 
is why a decision that is "wrong," because future changes in 
government regulations were misjudged, rarely turn out to be 
fortunate. 
  The varying taxes on energy have not only increased market 
uncertainty, but have also had an immediate negative impact on 
the technical development by reducing the incentives for 
technical development. This effect can also be exemplified with 
the situation regarding the tax on coal. The proportion of tax 
of the total cost for coal mentioned above has varied greatly 
over a short time period. I today's situation coal can be 
converted to electric power using the most efficient and best 
environmentally adapted technology, with an efficiency of more 
than 40 percent. The hope for the new coal gasification 
technology is to be able to achieve an increase in efficiency of 
about 5-7 percent over a 10-20-year time frame. No matter how 
essential this improvement is, it is insignificant compared to 
the tax changes. Incentives to start a lengthy R&amp;D project to 
improve a process by some percentage point, while the rules may 
suddenly alter the cost by perhaps 10-20 percent, will be 
extremely limited. Instead, the businessman is likely to 
perceive that resources should be concentrated either to getting 
the decision pointed in a direction which favors his own 
interests, or not to do anything at all, while waiting and 
hoping for the situation to be clarified. 
  As was mentioned earlier, the interest level is of crucial 
importance for the profitability of the energy project, and thus 
for the opportunities for bringing about technical development. 
This applies especially to development of capital-intensive 
systems. The development under way in EEA/EC agreements has 
already resulted in an equalization of the interest level in 
various countries, a tendency which can be expected to continue. 
The interest level can thus not be influenced nationally as much 
as before, but in a small country such as Sweden it is primarily 
internationally determined and only slightly affected by the 
general economic climate. 
<H5>  4.2 Motives and Means of Innovation Support </H5>
[.sup]6[/] 
  Society's interest in the development of energy technology, 
just as in all other technical development, is, of course, to 
see to it that technical development progresses with good speed 
and that it gets an orientation which coincides with the general 
good. Doing so potentially involves three different types of 
influence: 


    -  Accelerating technical development 
  -  limiting the use of technology with consequences negative for 
society 
  -  guiding technical development toward the direction desirable 
for society. 

    In most areas of technology, society's interest has mainly 
involved the first aspect. In areas of technology where the 
activity has potentially negative consequences for people and 
environment, which concerns many types of processing industries 
including energy, society also has an interest in reducing or 
completely eliminating the use of certain types of technology. 
In the field of energy, the third type of influence has also 
been of significance, for example in the form of society's 
selectively having tried to stimulate certain technology such as 
wind power, bioenergy, etc. 
  It is not obvious that society needs to take any 
responsibility for technology development by businesses. In a 
functioning market, the technology needed will be produced and 
is economically defensible. The fundamental reason why society 
really has to stimulate technical development is therefore that 
there are said to be "market failures," which makes the motive 
for technical development by private organizations too weak from 
a socioeconomic aspect. Below, we list four arguments which have 
been brought up as to why this should be the case. 
  1. "R&amp;D results are of a collective nature, which is 
why the 
social benefits are greater than that of the individual company. 
Thus, projects exist which should be undertaken from a 
socioeconomic aspect, but which have no business-economic 
profitability and should therefore not be undertaken without 
subsidies." 
  2. "Companies and financiers avoid particularly risky 
activities if they can. It is usually said that they have a high 
aversion to risk. Since R&amp;D projects often carry unusually 
high 
risk, this results in few R&amp;D projects being started. This 
risk 
profile of technical development projects further causes the 
capital market to be unwilling to provide resources for this 
type of project. If it does, it is on particularly unfavorable 
terms." 
  3. "The costs of developing and, above all, investing in new 
technology of an infrastructure character are often of such 
extent that the capital market cannot cope with such large 
projects. If it does manage it, the terms will be particularly 
unfavorable, so the government must help." 
  4. "The assessment by the market of the usefulness and costs 
of technology can differ from that of society, for example by 
not fully including the environmental hazards from various types 
of technology in the companies' financial evaluation. Technology 
of major benefit to society must therefore be stimulated so that 
it becomes competitive." 
  These are thus fundamental reasons and, as is shown in 
sections 4.4 and 4.5, there is no lack of arguments against 
several of the reasons given above. 
  Means of Supporting Innovation 
  In principle there are three basic methods to formulate the 
means of controlling innovation: 


    -  Regulation 
  -  financial means of control 
  -  education and information 

    Regulation has traditionally been society's most important 
method for limiting negative environmental effects[.sup]7[/] 
in the energy sector. 
  The financial means of control can be of many kinds and 
include "carrots" (subsidies) and "whips" (fees) for 
development. Various categories of financial means of control 
are shown below. 
  Figure 4.1. Financial Means of Control in the Innovation 
Field 


    -  Subsidies (see below) 
  -  Taxes and fees 
  -  Government purchasing of technology 
  -  R&amp;D carried out or purchased by the state Source: 
According to 
Folster (1991) 

    Subsidies, in turn, can be provided in a number of different 
ways, according to the table below. 
  Figure 4.2. Innovation-Supporting Subsidies 


    -  General subsidies 
  -  R&amp;D tax deductions 
  -  General support for R&amp;D in specific industries 



      -  Selective Subsidies 
  -  Direct project grants 
  -  Subsidized loans 
  -  Loans with favorable terms 
  -  Loan guarantees 
  -  Honors Source: According to Folster (1991) 

    In order to accelerate the development, direct project 
grants 
to the energy field has been the principal method, while taxes 
and fees have obviously been the method for reducing the 
negative effects of technology application.[.sup]8[/] 
  Education and information are a third type of 
control.[.sup]9[/] By providing information about what is 
possible and how to go about it, a response is expected from the 
users. In general, information has not been used as much as a 
means of controlling innovation as the other two methods. That 
is because it is not known in advance to the same extent what 
the result of this type of measure will be. From this 
perspective, regulations are the most appealing, of course. 
<H3>  4.3 Experience of Swedish and Foreign Support for Energy 
Innovations </H3>
  In this section certain observations are made regarding the 
effects of supporting innovation. The material is based on both 
Swedish and foreign experiences, with a certain dominance for 
Swedish experiences. It is, of course, extremely difficult 
unambiguously to comment on the overall effects of a number of 
different measures. However, we outline a few principal 
directions regarding the experience. 
  The most successful role of Swedish society as a developer 
of 
new energy technology has been as owner of the former National 
Waterfall Agency, which, within the framework of the owner's 
political priorities, acted with integrity based on relevant 
technical and economic principles, and in this way greatly 
contributed to the development of energy technology in the 
country. Several of the most significant new products which 
originated in Sweden were developed for the needs of the 
Waterfall Agency. This has been a consequence of the 
enterprise's business activity and is therefore something 
different than government innovation support. It is thus not 
possible to draw any conclusions about the form of support which 
involves government technology purchasing based on the results 
achieved by the government's public service enterprises, a 
generalization which is sometimes done. 
  As for the innovation support, society's environmental 
regulations appear to be the most successful area. The measures 
have often led to the intended result. This is true in Sweden as 
well as abroad. In general, the support for innovation in order 
to guide the use of technology toward more environmentally 
friendly technology seems to be more or less without objection. 
However, in some cases application of these regulations has 
represented an obstacle to new technology. New technology always 
leads to certain breakin problems. The fact that in some cases 
temporary exemptions for emission regulations were not granted 
has caused the choice of more traditional solutions, which in 
the long run were probably poorer. 
  In several cases it is obvious that the financial support 
moved up the projects somewhat, which was not always good for 
the development process but led to the results having been 
forced out and immature products being presented to the market. 
  Among equipment manufacturers it is most striking how small 
the effect of the support has been for the companies' activity, 
and it is rarely that the support measures in themselves have 
initiated new projects. This relative disinterest should be 
viewed in the light of the R&amp;D function's strategic character 
for the long-term survival of the industrial enterprise. It is 
through the results for which the development function is 
responsible that survival is assured. The fact that the 
development costs are paid for is not enough of an incentive to 
put the company's best resources into development, but it 
requires a firm conviction that the projects will lead to 
products which in turn can generate a profit in a commercial 
market. 
  That does not always mean, however, that the companies are 
disinterested in support if such is available. Given that it has 
been decided to invest in a certain development, all 
opportunities for financing are welcome. This means that as long 
as economic support in various forms is given to companies, the 
companies will concentrate on obtaining these funds for projects 
which the company wants to undertake. The company will also, as 
long as it has a chance of getting the funds, stubbornly insist 
that the support is needed. 
  Among energy enterprises it has been more common that the 
opportunities for getting support have also affected the choice 
of which projects to carry out. This is probably because the 
development function is not the company's life blood in the same 
sense, and that covering the costs is therefore a stronger 
incentive. Another reason is that since support in various forms 
has been given for such a long time, the companies and their 
owners have in some cases "gotten used to" the fact that 
technical development is undertaken with partial government 
funding, and a lack of support means that the projects will not 
be undertaken. 
<H5>  4.4 The Principal Problems of Energy Innovation Support </H5>
  The following section deals with the problems which have 
emerged regarding financial innovation support, in particular, 
in which we also include subsidies such as taxation, aimed at 
prioritizing certain technology. These difficulties have 
primarily been of three kinds: social time frames, opportunities 
for successful project selection and the negative effects which 
can ensue from support. Experiences are based mainly on Swedish 
innovation support during the 1970's and 1980's. 
  The Project Selection 
  One reason for the problem with development support is that 
the government has had a difficult time making early, good 
assessments of development projects, which is why the very 
important project start rarely becomes very effective. The 
reasons for these problems are, in part, that it is complex to 
select the "right" projects to support, and partly that 
innovation programs must also take various political 
considerations, for example regional and energy-political ones, 
into account. 
  It is difficult to make a sensible choice of which 
technology 
to back. What is "a good project" signifies both that the 
project itself is promising and that it fits into the 
organization's overall strategy. It is thus difficult for an 
outsider to make these evaluations, even if he is professionally 
competent. 
  There are also reasons to assume that the selection will be 
"poorer" than would have been necessary, since an innovation 
support program is usually designed with regard for things other 
than finding "exactly the right" projects. Even if a political 
decision is right, there will soon be an election, which could 
mean that a new group with other priorities will come to power 
and that new projects will be given priority, before the old 
ones have "gotten there." Often, regional considerations are 
taken into account and other types of considerations, which in 
themselves could be justified, for example based on regional 
policy, but which could lead to certain other types of projects 
with less ability to compete being prioritized. 
  The Short Time Frames of Social Support 
  As was mentioned in Chapter 2, commercial technical 
development usually has a time frame of perhaps 10 years from 
idea to marketing. During this entire period the financial 
backers must, if needed, be prepared to come up with new 
resources in order to bring the project forward. Direct 
financial social support for the development of energy 
technology has been paid over an entirely different time scale, 
often encompassing no more than a three-year-period. A 
development project which stands and falls with the granting of 
a lot of support throughout the entire development period, is 
thus running a very large risk of failure. 
  The fact that funding is available for a normally limited 
period of time risks increasing the companies' shortsightedness 
and increase the market uncertainty. When support is given as a 
one-time contribution, for example in the form of an investment 
subsidy for a demonstration facility, it risks leading to an 
investment hump, followed by a drop when the support disappears. 
When the support is given in the form of running subsidies, the 
additional cost must be calculated over the relatively short 
period which the support can be assumed to span. During the 
1980's several companies made dubious investment decisions, in 
retrospect, as a result of not having anticipated that the 
regulations would change so quickly. Today, the enterprises have 
learned from this and in general practice greater caution in 
undertaking investments which depend on long-term contributions 
and subsidies for their profitability. 
  The awareness of the need for stable rules for industrial 
development has increased in society in recent years. To a 
certain extent this is a result of experiences in the field of 
energy technology in particular. The greater 
internationalization also has the result that more stability can 
be predicted for the future. At the same time, it must be 
concluded that there are hardly any chances of getting back to 
the stability which marked the development of the postwar 
period, because of an increasingly turbulent world. 
  Negative Effects of the Innovation Support 
  One motive for society's innovation support is also to 
influence the market-based incentives for development and 
application of technology. Of course, there are certain risks 
that the natural tendency toward innovation may be affected. In 
the energy field the following negative effects have been 
observed. 
  By "forcing" a development, for instance through a 
combination of development and introduction supports, one risks 
bringing a product to market which is actually not finished. 
This results in the early customers getting a negative view of 
the technology, which leads to a cool reception for mature 
products that have been further developed. 
  The most negative effect is of a psychological nature. The 
long-term subsidies have led to a not uncommon view among owners 
of energy companies that technical development should take place 
with society's support. This results in projects sometimes 
tending to be ranked according to wherever support is available, 
and that intrinsically promising projects are not followed up 
because no support can be obtained. 
<H3>  4.5 Is Continued Economic Support for Commercial Development 
of Technology Necessary? </H3>
  The motives for society to provide support for energy 
innovations have been of four different types, as was mentioned: 


    -  that R&amp;D is a collective product 
  -  that the companies have a high aversion to risk 
  -  that the capital market cannot cope with financing large 
projects, and 
  -  that negative environmental effects are not taken into 
consideration in the evaluation by the marketplace. 

    The Collective Nature of R&amp;D 
  On the average, R&amp;D projects undoubtedly provide a large 
amount of socioeconomic benefit. Within the energy sector, 
however, this is primarily due to a few projects which are very 
profitable both for the enterprise and for society. Few projects 
are not profitable from a business-economic point of view but 
should still be carried out from the aspect of society. In 
connection with the deregulation which is now under way in the 
energy markets, there is some risk that the great openness which 
has characterized the energy companies, with jointly owned 
development companies and projects, could decline somewhat. It 
is essential for the tradition of joint industrial projects and 
companies concerning research, education and evaluation of new 
technology to be able to continue, since these activities 
facilitate the spreading of knowledge within the industry, which 
ought possibly to be stimulated by a certain social support. 
  The Companies' Aversion to Risk 
  The companies within the energy sector have previously not 
generally avoided becoming involved in long-term development 
projects with technical and economic risks, if the potential 
gains from the development project were found to be sufficiently 
large. During the 1980's, tendencies toward a certain aversion 
to risk could be glimpsed. This is to some extent a result of 
the general economic development during the 1980's. But it is 
chiefly a result of the plentiful supply of government funding 
available for the "right" projects. Since the energy industry is 
marked by large, financially secure, companies, there are also 
no major financial difficulties in undertaking development 
projects. We thus looked only at the special need to support 
companies for energy technology development. To the extent 
general commercial subsidies are available, for instance in 
order to facilitate obtaining risk capital by small and 
medium-sized companies, energy companies should of course have 
the same opportunities as others. 
  The Capacity of the Capital Market 
  With the internationalized capital market, the financing of 
new energy technology infrastructures at reasonable cost is 
managed without direct government help. A reason for the 
government to support this can only occur as a result of rapid 
abolition of nuclear power. This could conceivably lead to a new 
wave of investments, which would have enormous consequences for 
the electric power market, unless a part of the financing is 
passed onto society. 
  External Market Factors 
  Reducing environmental effects by means of internalizing 
environmental costs will continue to be an important field for 
society, preferably in international cooperation. It should be 
noted in this connection that in the majority of cases 
regulations are the method which has been used for successful 
contributions, despite the fact that fees are regarded as 
preferable from a strictly economic aspect. This is because it 
is much easier to "know what you get" with a regulation, and 
that a regulation can be a clearer signal to the market about 
what is needed. Environmental fees have often turned out to be a 
blunt instrument. A contributing cause for this is that it can 
be easy to confuse fees as a means of stimulating technology 
development with the fiscal nature of fees. In principle, IVA is 
not opposed to economic means of control if handled correctly, 
that is to say as a means of control and not as a means of 
taxation, and if the field is suitable for this type of control. 
<H3>  5. Recommendations Regarding Society's Role in Commercial 
Development of Energy Technology </H3>
  In Chapter 2 the success factors for technical development 
projects were analyzed and the extent to which the energy field 
differs in this respect from other fields of technology. Chapter 
3 dealt with development patterns for technical development in 
the energy sector, and Chapter 4 analyzed society's means of 
influencing the companies' technical development, as well as 
Swedish and foreign experiences of the measures employed. 
  Society's most important task, in order to facilitate the 
development of energy technology, is to create an industrial and 
innovation climate which leads to good profitability development 
in the businesses and thus to investments in industrial activity 
being more profitable than investments in property, for example. 
  One condition for a well-functioning business community is a 
functioning research system, which is capable of supplying 
business and industry with new knowledge and new carriers of 
knowledge. This requires high-quality research at universities 
and academic institutions in fields of technology relevant to 
business and industry. In order to assure this relevance, 
expanded cooperation between business and academic institution 
is needed. This concerns above all the opportunities for 
universities and academic institutions to obtain stimuli and 
signals from business and industry regarding essential research 
fields. Within the framework for this, there should be much 
greater academic freedom regarding the research field. 
  A the same time society should bear primary responsibility 
for financing basic research and education. In today's situation 
society takes too little responsibility for this in some areas 
which are of major importance for the energy sector. In some 
cases the result was that industry had to come in and help 
finance such activity, for example regarding the Electric Power 
Center at the Royal Institute of Technology (KTH). In other 
cases, altogether too little activity is being carried out, for 
example in reactor technology. Simultaneously, the energy 
industry is facing major changes from having been a national 
industry with service character to greatly increased 
internationalization. Because we are a small country, it is 
particularly important that we are capable of participating in 
the international cooperation and exchange of experience. It is 
therefore essential for academic research to be given greater 
ability to exchange experiences and time for adjustment to the 
R&amp;D programs which exist within the EC, above all. 
  Society should therefore increase its funding of direct 
academic research within consumer-specific fields, help expand 
the contact surfaces between academic institutions and the 
business community, and create more resources for participating 
in international programs. One should also strive for more 
international exchanges and active participation in planning and 
undertaking international research cooperations, in order to 
increase international influence on Swedish energy research. 
  The energy sector has been characterized by major 
uncertainty 
during the 1970's and 1980's. This is in part a result of market 
fluctuations, in part a result of major turbulence regarding the 
fiscal and fee policy as well as regarding the future of nuclear 
power. Energy taxes are of fundamental importance for the 
profitability of investments. In the future, regulatory and fee 
systems must be designed in a more consistent, more credible and 
more durable way, so that preconditions are created for a stable 
market and, consequently, opportunities for the companies to 
develop and invest in new, more efficient and, for the 
environment, more acceptable products and systems. 
  Within the energy sector society not only has an interest in 
technical development proceeding rapidly, but also in the 
application of technology being shifted over toward technology 
which has minor, or preferably no, impact on the environment. In 
remarkably many instances the market forces have been able to 
produce this greater environmental adaptation. One example is 
the development of technology for bleaching cellulose. Society 
has a self-evident responsibility to monitor that this is the 
case, and, where that does not happen, society's largely 
successful work in the environmental sector must go on. 
  However, measures in this area must to an increasing degree 
be announced in advance or at least be foreseeable with a 
certain priority, since the measures could otherwise lead to 
reduced willingness to take risks. There must also be a certain 
flexibility in the regulations, so that during the introductory 
period there is some margin in the event the new technology 
cannot cope with the imposed standards. If not, the rules risk 
having a technology-preserving effect. To the extent economic 
means of control are used, they must be used as a means of 
improving the environment, for example, and not as a way to 
augment government revenue. Furthermore, economic means of 
control must not be used in combination with regulation, since 
they will then automatically get this fiscal character and not 
be technology-promoting. Measures should naturally be undertaken 
in such a manner and at such a pace that the opportunities for 
carrying out industrial activity in Sweden is not adversely 
affected. Measures should be undertaken in international 
cooperation or at least in coordination with the international 
development. 
  Other than means of control intended to internalize 
environmental costs, we believe that if the innovation climate 
for energy technology can be reinforced with the measures 
mentioned above there is no need for direct financial support 
for the development of energy technology directed toward 
individual companies or smaller groups of companies. New 
technology will mainly enter the energy system in connection 
with new investments. During the 1990's the need for new 
investments in the Swedish energy system appears to be of 
limited extent. The opportunities for broad distribution of new 
technology in Sweden in the short term is extremely limited, and 
contributions aimed at a rapid breakthrough of new supply 
technology will scarcely be successful. 
  Subsidies are also not the solution for supporting the 
technical development in the developmentally "weak" industries. 
A considerable portion of the subsidies have, particularly as 
regards multifamily dwellings and premises, been a poorly 
functioning market. Deregulation and increased competition can 
be expected to result in these markets functioning better in the 
future. This is indicated by the positive development involving 
energy management in small houses, a market which has worked 
much better as a result of tough competition and less extensive 
subsidies. 
  The situation among municipal energy plants is more 
difficult. The industry is developmentally weak, primarily as a 
result of its weak owners, who did not permit the companies to 
allocate resources for new technical development projects. The 
tendency has been reinforced by the ample support which has been 
given to this sector, since it permitted the strategy mentioned 
above. It is possible to speak of the development support having 
functioned as some sort of "drug" for the companies. If the 
support were not available it would be more obvious to owners 
that they have to make decisions to invest in technical 
development, and the incentives for development would thus be 
increased. 
  This negative view of the effectiveness of financial support 
also includes government purchasing of technology. To be sure, 
there are examples that the ongoing technology purchasing 
program has contributed to several successful development 
projects. IVA's assessment is, however, that these development 
processes would have come about anyway. Therefore, the program 
has instead been successful in catching on early to a 
development already established by the market, rather than 
establishing new development processes. It is also remarkable 
that in the area of making energy more efficient there have been 
several parallel activities initiated by various players, both 
government and private, something which may be questioned. 
  In sum, the conclusion of this reasoning is that direct 
government efforts directed toward supporting the companies' 
development of new energy technology will not be of decisive 
importance for the development of future energy 
technology.[.sup]10[/]. This applies to both support for new 
supply technology and new application technology. The more 
extensive subsidies for this orientation given at present are 
the Energy Technology Fund, the Experimental Construction 
Support and the Technology Purchasing Support for more efficient 
energy technology. We propose a cancellation of these subsidies. 
The Energy Technology Fund and the Technology Purchasing Program 
each have a budget of about 150-200 million kronor a year up to 
1996, and the Experimental Construction Program about 10 million 
a year. 
  In connection with the increased market orientation and 
internationalization which the energy industry is undergoing, it 
is particularly important to retain the valuable Swedish 
tradition of extensive cooperation within the energy industry. 
Joint research by a specific industry is an important method for 
this. It is reasonable that some of the funds released above 
should be shifted to stimulating these jointly owned development 
projects and development companies. It is essential for this 
activity to be managed under its own responsibility. With a view 
to the greater internationalization and the need for greater 
international influences within the sector, it would be 
especially desirable if society could also contribute to joint 
industrial research in which international players are 
participating and thus be able to share the results. 
Strengthening joint research in an industry need not mean 
establishing new institutes, which risk becoming rigid and in 
the long term less flexible, a problem often indicated for 
certain joint industrial research. The activity should therefore 
mainly be conducted by the member companies. 
Bibliography 
  Dahmen, E.: "Svensk industriell foretagarverksamhet. 
Kausalanalys av den industriella utvecklingen 1919-1939" 
[Swedish industrial entrepreneurial activity. Analysis of the 
reasons for the industrial development 1919 to 1939]. 
Industriens Utredningsinstitut, 1950. 
  Freeman, C.: "The Economics of Industrial Innovation," 
Cambridge, The MIT Press, 1982. 
  Folster, S.: "The Art of Encouraging Invention," Stockholm, 
Almqvist &amp; Wiksell International, 1991. 
  Gasslander, O.: "Bank och industriellt 
genombrott--Stockholms 
Enskilda Bank kring sekelskiftet 1900" [Banking and industrial 
breakthrough--Stockholms Enskilda Bank around the turn of the 
century 1900], Stockholm, ESSELTE, 1956. 
  Granstrand, O., Sjolander, S.: "Managing Innovation in 
Multi- 
Technology Corporations," RESEARCH POLICY, Vol 18, 1989. 
  Wallmark, T. &amp; McQueen, D.: "100 viktiga svenska 
innovationer 
under tiden 1945-1980" [100 important Swedish innovations during 
the period 1945-1980], Lund, Studentlitteratur, 1986. 
  AF: "Framgangsrik utveckling av energiteknik--studie av 
energiindustrin i Sverige" [Successful development of energy 
technology--Study of the energy industry in Sweden], AF- 
Energikonsult, Stockholm AB, 1991. 
<H5>  Participants in the Projects </H5>
  The following persons participated in "Energy for Future 
Generations:" 
- IVA Energy Council (steering group for the study) 
  Gunnar Engstrom, Dr. Engr. (chairman) IVA's Section II, 
Electrical Engineering 
  Lars Gustafsson IVA's Section II, Electrical Engineering 
  Lars Gunnar Larsson Swedish Industry Association 
  Yngve Larsson Sydkraft AB 
  Orvar Nyquist Jernkontoret [Ironmasters' Association] 
  Sixten Regestad, M. Engr. IVA's Section VIII, Forest 
Technology 
  Lars Astrand IVA's Section I, Mechanical Engineering 
  Per Lekander, M. Engr. (secretary) IVA, principal secretary 
for the study 
- Working Group 1 
  Gunnar Engstrom, Dr. Engr. (chairman) IVA's Section II, 
Electrical Engineering 
  Professor Harry Albinsson Swedish Industry Association 
  Lars Bern, Dr. Engr. ABB Environmental Control 
  Harald Haegermark VAST 
  Olof Hormander, Dr. Engr. IVA's Section IV, Chemical 
Engineering 
  Sixten Regestad, M. Engr. IVA's Section VIII, Forest 
Engineering 
  Gunnar Tedestal Sydkraft AB 
  Ingvar Wivstad, Dr. Engr. IVA's Section I, Mechanical 
Engineering 
  Per Lekander, M. Engr. (secretary) IVA 
- Working Group 2 
  Lars Astrand (chairman) IVA's Section I, Mechanical 
Engineering 
  Gunnar Engman Swedish Forest Industry Association 
  Lars Gustafsson IVA's Section II, Electrical Engineering 
  Per Hedvall Asea Brown Boveri AB 
  Sven-Erik Malmeblad Stora AB 
  Professor Lars Nabseth Stockholm School of Economics 
  Jan Nordling AF-Energikonsult Stockholm AB 
  Hans Sandberg, Dr. Engr. MEFOS 
  Per Lekander, M. Engr. (secretary) IVA 
- Working Group 3 
  Yngve Larsson (chairman) Sydkraft AB 
  Gunnar Agfors Neste Petroleum A/S, Lysaker 
  Bertil Agrenius Vattenfall AB 
  Harald Haegermark VAST 
  Jan Magnusson, director general Svenska Kraftnat 
  Jan Martinsson Asea Brown Boveri AB 
  Professor Lennart Schotte IVA's Section VIII, Forest 
Engineering 
  Professor Nils-Gosta Vannerberg Eka Nobel AB 
  Karin Annerwall, M. Engr. (assistant secretary) Vattenfall 
AB 
  Lena-Kajsa Siden, B. Engr. (secretary) IVA 
<H3>  Development and Distribution of New Energy Technology; 
Seven Case Studies of New Industrial Development Projects </H3>
  Contents: 
  1. Introduction and summary 
  2. Power transmission with high-voltage direct current 
(HVDC) 
  3. Thermo-mechanical pulp and energy recovery in thermo- 
mechanical pulp production 
  4. Casting technology in the steel industry 
  5. Pressurized Fluidized Bed Combustion (PFBC) of coal 
  6. The Stirling engine 
  7. Fiberoptic technology in the telecommunications network 
  8. Mobile telephones 
<H5>  1. Introduction and Summary </H5>
  The following represented the foundation material for a 
discussion meeting at IVA on 5 December 1991 on mechanisms for 
successful commercial technical development in the energy 
sector. The foundation material consists of seven case 
descriptions of technical development projects. The cases were 
chosen partly to illuminate development projects of major 
significance for Swedish industry, partly to illustrate various 
particularly important, critical factors in connection with 
commercial technology development. 
  The main question which is to be illustrated is what 
determines the direction and speed of technical development. The 
main issue can be divided into the following questions: 


    -  Where do ideas for new products and processes come from? 
  -  When does an idea become a major project? 
  -  What determines the resources and requirements allocated to a 
project? 
  -  What determines the buyer's choice of technology? 
  -  Why is spreading new technology time-consuming? 

    The following cases are described: 


    -  High-voltage direct current transmission, HVDC 
  -  Thermo-mechanical pulp production, TMP 
  -  Casting technology 
  -  Pressurized fluidized bed combustion of coal, PFBC 
  -  The Stirling engine 
  -  Fiberoptic technology 
  -  Mobile telephones 

    The HVDC case illustrates, among other things, the need for 
mutually trustful cooperation between seller and buyer of 
technology. The case also shows that successful 
commercialization of new technology, particularly the kind 
connected with very large investments, is also a result of 
"successful circumstances" which can be more or less influenced, 
in this case a reference facility of "suitable" size. 
  The TMP case shows, among other things, the effect of 
cooperation between research and industry in order achieve a 
joint goal. The project also demonstrates the complicated 
interplay when energy aspects are only one of a number of 
different considerations which are involved in a decision to 
invest in new process technology, but that new energy technology 
in a considerable way can further reinforce the breakthrough of 
the new technology in the market. 
  The "casting technology" case demonstrates that even mature 
industries can undergo rapid technical change when a number of 
different factors are present at the same time. The case also 
shows that such changes are often connected with major new 
investments and thus cannot be viewed independently from 
investment cycles. 
  The PFBC case stresses, among other things, the long run-in 
for many technical development projects, that several different 
interested parties can be present in a development project and 
how the direction of a large and complicated project can change 
over the course of the development process. 
  The Stirling engine case demonstrates how important and 
difficult the market evaluation for new technology is. 
Technology can be generally applicable while only being 
competitive within a narrow segment. Which these segments are 
can also change relatively rapidly. 
  Two of the cases, fiberoptic technology and mobile 
telephones, lie outside the energy sector, in order to provide 
an opportunity to compare the technical development processes in 
various fields of technology. These two technologies belong to a 
field which is normally regarded as less "mature," at the same 
time as it still involves technology of an infrastructure 
nature, which is why the differences are not judged to be as 
large and comparisons therefore become meaningful. 
  In principle, technical development projects can be 
classified at three different levels, and it is important to 
make this distinction clear: 
  1. Rationalizations 
  Rationalizations mean minor changes of an existing product. 
This type of product is often very important for raising the 
performance of a product or reducing its manufacturing cost. 
These projects are normally connected with small technical and 
commercial risks. 
  2. New Industrial Development 
  By this is meant projects of considerable size, aimed at 
developing a product based on new technology or fulfilling an 
entirely new market demand. This type of project is usually 
linked with extensive technical and commercial risks. 
  3. National Power Drive 
  This type of project, which is common in the defense sector, 
means that no individual group of commercial players is able to 
cope with the task as a result of its technical complexity and 
risks and because of the major economic efforts that are 
required. Instead, this type of project demands extensive 
government guarantees, and perhaps government founding of new 
organs such as new research institutions, in order to be carried 
out. This also applies if the greater part of the development 
work is carried out within the business sector. 
  These seven cases may chiefly be said to belong to the 
second 
category of projects, new industrial development projects. 
<H5>  2. Power Transmission With High-Voltage Direct Current (HVDC) </H5>
  The idea of using direct current for long power 
transmissions 
existed as early as the 1800s, in the infancy of electrical 
engineering. There are advantages of direct current systems for 
use with long power lines. 
  At the end of the 1800's the three-phase system arrived, in 
which Jonas Wenstrom, who founded ASEA, was one of the pioneers. 
The advantage with alternating current was that it was possible 
to raise the voltage and thus expand the distribution area. The 
first major power transmissions with alternating current in 
Sweden were introduced in the early 1900's and were at 30 to 50 
kV. 
  In the 1910's Vattenfall began to pose demands on the 
Swedish 
market for higher voltages and larger transformers, such as for 
the first 130-Kv Trollhattan-Vasteras-Alvkarleby trunk line. In 
the mid-1920's ASEA had also succeeded in its effort to raise 
transformer manufacture to an internationally competitive level. 
  In the 1920's the eyes once again turned toward high-voltage 
direct current transmission at ASEA. If the big problems around 
direct and alternating high-voltage current were to be solved, 
direct-current systems could become cheaper for large power 
transmissions over long distances and long-distance transmission 
under water could also be possible. 
  A quarter of a century of laborious technical development 
work was initiated at ASEA, with Vattenfall as a patient 
customer willing to assume the risk. 
  At ASEA Uno Lamm was given the task of beginning to study 
current direction principles and rectifier elements at the end 
of the 1920's. Both at ASEA and internationally the effort 
centered on a gas-filled rectifier with an arc burning in 
mercury vapor, with properties for letting the current flow in 
only one direction. Uno Lamm and his coworkers tested gas-filled 
rectifiers at low voltages, but thought they saw the principles 
for how to increase the voltages. 
  Each year Uno Lamm got new funds for continued development 
of 
the ideas from ASEA' management. There were no fat budgets for 
the project and it was difficult to make a profitability 
calculation. Nevertheless, Uno Lamm got new money each year. 
  During the 1920's and 1930's Vattenfall was in a very 
expansive phase. The total electricity consumption in Sweden 
doubled every 10 years. Between 1923 and 1955 the use of 
electric power in industry increased about 7.5 times, within the 
transportation sector more than 20 times and in retail 
consumption 18 times. At Vattenfall, mainly represented by the 
technical manager Waldemar Borgquist, later director general, 
one realized that high-voltage direct current transmission would 
offer advantages for the Swedish electric power grid, in which 
the principal energy resources in the form of hydroelectric 
power resources were found in the thinly populated northern 
parts, while the center of consumption lay in the southern parts 
of the country. Large quantities of energy would soon need to be 
transported across approximately 1,000 kilometers. The cost of 
the power line in a high-voltage direct current system is lower 
than in a conventional alternating current system. The costs for 
end stations is higher for direct current, however. In order to 
offer an economically competitive alternative, the transmission 
distances must therefore be long for the direct current 
alternative, which what was also the case in the country. 
  Borgquist's strongly expressed interest in an introduction 
of 
high-voltage direct current is likely to have contributed to 
ASEA's decision to continue to expand the long-range and costly 
development work, which included a large proportion of basic 
physical and electrical research and development. 
  The contacts between Uno Lamm and Waldemar Borgquist go back 
to the end of the 1930's and their relationship was good. In 
1943 ASEA and Vattenfall agreed on a test facility for 
high-voltage direct current. In Trollhattan a so-called ion 
valve laboratory was built, where ASEA constructed, manufactured 
and delivered experimental rectifiers with associated equipment 
and measurement devices. Vattenfall also made available a 55-Kv 
line between Trollhattan and Mellerud. Tests continued for 
several years, up to the early 1960's. Since the physical and 
electrical principles for a rectifier could not entirely be 
mathematically described, the testing of various constructions 
was of decisive importance. Long-term testing under realistic 
conditions also provided experience with the wear of the 
rectifiers. Studies of the power line between the conversion 
stations were undertaken. 
  In the 1940's Vattenfall resumed projections for Harspranget 
which had been initiated during the 1910's. The original 
intention was to use high-voltage direct current for 
transmission of energy from Harspranget to Hallsberg. Waldemar 
Borgquist was passionate about it. At ASEA one was more unsure. 
The project was too big to dare invest in the technology, since 
the voltages were high. Tests carried out at Vattenfall showed 
that the direct current alternative was a passable route, but 
too risk-filled. 
  Since the power production from Harspranget would be of 
crucial importance for the total power production in the 
country, one did not dare take the step. It was necessary for 
Harspranget not to be delayed. Harspranget was readied for 
direct current, however; the generators, for example, were 
prepared for alternative use of both alternating and direct 
current. 
  For Harspranget a 400-Kv alternating current transmission 
was 
chosen, the highest voltage at that time for long distances. 
Even this solution was risk-filled, to be sure. Harspranget was 
put into operation in 1951. 
  In 1950 the Riksdag decided to use high-voltage direct 
current transmission for an underwater cable between the 
mainland and Gotland. Waldemar Borgquist personally had a major 
part in the decision. On Gotland electric power was generated by 
small diesel turbines and steam turbines. Electric power 
production on Gotland was twice as expensive as hydroelectric 
power. Transmitting power from the mainland was a way to lower 
the cost of power for Gotland. The state contributed with 
investment and projection costs for the transmission links. 
  The project was ideal for ASEA, since it was of a relatively 
modest size. ASEA would be able manage without major problems 
even if the project failed; all the problems had not been solved 
at that time, but the opportunities for solving them within the 
delivery period were judged favorable. Gotland would also not be 
without electricity, since some power production existed on the 
island. 
  Operation began in 1954 and, after some initial problems, 
Vattenfall was able to take over the facility before the end of 
the test operation period written in the contract. The world's 
first HVDC link (High Voltage Direct Current) had been 
installed. Its length was 100 kilometers and it carried 20 MW at 
100 Kv. 
  The costs for Gotland's power subscribers were 
simultaneously 
cut in half. 
  The Gotland link provided evidence that the technology was 
feasible. Further, it was an important demonstration facility, 
which in the long term would make a commercial breakthrough 
possible. 
  After the project, however, ASEA demobilized large parts of 
the project group. 
  The system had been under development for about 25 years. 
Among other things, 140 different variants of gas rectifiers had 
been tested. The system technology, combination of tubes and 
more conventional components for entire static converters must 
be stressed as advanced new design. 
  During the spring of 1957 the British Central Electricity 
Generating Board and the French Electricite de France ordered 
tubes, control equipment, etc. from ASEA for an HVDC 
transmission across the English Channel. The power was 160 MW at 
200 kV. ASEA took responsibility for the technical coordination. 
The facility began operation in 1961. 
  During 1965 other HVDC links were put into operation: New 
Zealand, Japan and between Sweden and Denmark. The commercial 
breakthrough had occurred. 
  ASEA had become a world leader in this technology. Licenses 
were sold to manufacturers in both Great Britain and the United 
States. 
  In 1959 ASEA signed a licensing agreement with U.S. General 
Electric, which provided patent rights regarding semiconductors 
and thyristors. However, ASEA's goal was quickly to disengage 
from the licensing agreement, at which it also succeeded by 
means of a major internal development effort. 
  When the thyristors came, people at ASEA were relatively 
doubtful of the thyristor technology for HVDC and they did not 
believe that the technology would break through as quickly as 
some other competitors. ASEA did not dare do anything other than 
invest in thyristors for HVDC, however. 
  In 1965 ASEA began the construction and calculation 
principles for HVDC equipped with thyristors. The development 
was headed by Gunnar Engstrom. Vattenfall was a partner in this 
development phase as well. The goal of the project was to have a 
test rectifier in operation within two years in the Gotland 
transmission. Experiences from this project lead to the first 
commercial thyristor rectifiers for HVDC being installed in 
1970, when the Gotland transmission was supplemented by a full 
set of rectifiers and the voltage raised to 150 kV and the 
transmitted power to 30 MW. 
  At the end of the 1960's ASEA was forced for political 
reasons to withdraw from the Cabora Bassa project in Mozambique, 
where ASEA had offered an gas rectifier solution. The order went 
to the AEG, BBC and Siemens consortium, which offered a 
thyristor alternative. The competitors therefore obtained a 
valuable reference object for their thyristor technology: 
  ASEA, which worked with both technologies, could see that 
the 
thyristor alternative gradually strengthened its competitive 
ability. In 1971 the decision was made to close down all 
development of gas-filled rectifiers and concentrate on the 
thyristor alternative. 
  ASEA has created and retained a leading position in the 
world 
even with the thyristor alternative. One example of a large and 
important order was Itaipu in Brazil, 1983-85, where the 
transmission power is 6,300 MW over a distance of 900 kilometers. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  The theoretical and economic advantages of high-voltage 
direct current transmission for certain types of transmission 
were known early on. One therefore had a goal, but in some 
periods it appeared distant. 
  In the early part of the development ASEA's management 
showed 
great determination and daring by its support for such a 
long-range and economically risky project. In certain parts the 
results obtained were not regarded as passable routes for future 
commercialization. 
  A financier/customer willing to take risks appeared at one 
point, Vattenfall, which also turned out to be long-lasting. No 
immediate results were demanded. They also saw the long-range 
economy of the HVDC solution. The extensive technical 
development primarily of gas-filled rectifiers required full- 
scale tests over long periods. 
  The relationship between seller and customer was 
long-lasting 
and very good. Individual persons must also be pointed out, 
although many persons and large organizations were involved. 
Waldemar Borgquist represents the technically competent 
customer/financier, willing to take risks, and Uno Lamm the 
indefatigable technician. 
  A potential reference project emerges (Harspranget). One 
believes in an HVDC solution, at least in the future, but the 
risks are deemed too great. Economic risks, but also a third 
partner, the country's power consumers, would have been affected 
in the event of failure. A short time afterwards a more 
appealing alternative was presented; a project of just the right 
size (the Gotland link). Certainly, a failure would have been 
felt from a purely financial point of view, but that would have 
been manageable. The third partner, the power consumers on 
Gotland, would also not have been affected, since power 
generation already existed on the island. 
  The reference project then provided a lead which could not 
be 
bridged by the competitors. Final commercialization did not 
occur until 10 years later, however. 
  A number of factors were required for cooperation, in which 
the various steps took place in the right order, in order for 
commercialization to become a fact. 
<H3>  3. Thermo-Mechanical Pulp and Energy Recovery in 
Thermo-Mechanical Pulp Production </H3>
  Wood consists basically of two different components. 
Cellulose and other carbohydrates, which are the essential 
components of the fiber, and lignin, which keeps the fiber 
together. In order to make paper, the fiber must be separated 
out. In principle, there are two different ways to create this 
separation, chemical or mechanical. 
  In a chemical pulp process the fiber is separated by 
dissolving the lignin by boiling in a boiling fluid consisting 
of a sulfate solution, the sulfate method, or of a sulfite 
solution, the sulfite method. Since the lignin represents a 
large part of the wood substance and this is dissolved together 
with a large part of the soluble carbohydrates, the pulp yield 
is only 45 percent for sulfate pulp and 55 percent for sulfite 
pulp, compared to 95 percent for mechanical pulps. In mechanical 
pulp production the fibers of the wood are released by using 
mechanical force to tear the components apart. In this procedure 
the lignin fragments remain on the fibers, which explains the 
considerably higher pulp yield. The fibers of the wood are 
released by grinding with a stone, stone groundwood (SGW), or by 
"milling" (refining) of wood chips between grinding disks, 
refiner mechanical pulp (RMP). 
  Chemical and mechanical pulp have widely different 
properties. The chemical pulp has great strength, because the 
fibers are relatively undamaged, and is therefore used for those 
types of paper where this is essential, for example in packaging 
paper. Chemical pulp is also very suitable for bleaching, which 
is why this type of pulp is also used for various types of fine 
paper. It also ages relatively well as regard light sensitivity 
and fragility. 
  Mechanical pulp, which is much cheaper to manufacture than 
chemical pulp, is weaker but provides a good foundation for 
printing. Paper from mechanical pulp also has a very low 
permeability for light, it is opaque, which is why the paper can 
be made thin and printed on both sides without it showing 
through. Mechanical pulp ages very quickly, however. As a result 
of the lower cost and the good printing properties, mechanical 
pulp is the only one used for newsprint production. Mechanical 
pulp is also an important component in cardboard and sanitary 
paper. 
  The grinding method was completely predominant until the 
early 1960s, when chip refining began to be used. The grinding 
method requires dry wood, in the Nordic countries in the form of 
spruce, of not too small dimensions. Refiners were able to use 
chips and therefore had greater freedom in selecting their 
assortment of wood. The development from stone groundwood to 
refiner mechanical pulp was a result of an abundance of saw mill 
chips in the majority of timber-producing nations, primarily in 
Canada. In order to utilize this surplus, it was desirable for 
the chips not just to be used for chemical pulp, but also for 
production of mechanical pulp. The principle involved pumping 
the wood chips through the refiner. In this way mechanical pulp 
of relatively low quality was obtained. With this process the 
fiber was damaged just as much as in the stone groundwood 
process. In addition, the pulp got darker and often more impure. 
  When releasing the fiber mechanically the fiber is more or 
less damaged, which is why the bond between the fibers is weaker 
than in chemical pulp. In order for the paper web to stay 
together on the machine and in the printing presses, it must be 
reinforced with chemical pulp. Previously, sulfite pulp was 
usually employed for this purpose. A common ratio for newsprint 
production was 75 percent groundwood and 25 percent sulfite 
pulp. Many newsprint mills thus had both a pulp grinding mill 
and a sulfite factory. 
  In paper manufacture there is a natural balance between 
increased strength on the one hand, in order to increase the 
speed of the paper machine and printing presses, which requires 
a higher proportion of chemical pulp, and the printing quality, 
which is improved by a high admixture of mechanical pulp. Since 
the birth of the industry, the width and speed of the paper 
machines have constantly increased, as shown in the table below 
[not included]. 
  At the North American mills, often using a poorer mechanical 
pulp than in the Nordic countries, the development led to such 
width and speed for the paper machine that the necessary 
admixture of chemical pulp increased considerably. In addition 
to higher costs, this larger proportion led to the printing 
quality becoming too poor. In many factories one therefore 
switched to the use of semi-bleached sulfate pulp, which was a 
stronger pulp than the sulfite pulp and which made it possible 
to reduce the admixture. But the sulfate pulp was even more 
expensive. 
  A supplementary reason for this transition was the difficult 
environmental problems which the sulfite factories often had, 
which resulted in demands that they be remodeled or closed. 
  At the same time there were wishes from the printing 
factories for better printing properties, as a result, for 
instance, of the introduction of four-color printing into the 
market. The paper producers therefore to some extent competed to 
offer as good a foundation for printing as possible. 
  Defibrator was founded by Arne Asplund partly to exploit his 
method for producing wood fiber boards by treating wood chips 
with steam at 170-190C and refining the chips in a 
defibrator at the same temperature under pressure. The coarse 
wood pulp was formed into boards. The apparatus became known as 
the Defibrator Boiler. 
  In the mid-1960's Asplund and the development engineers at 
Defibrator found that the Defibrator boiler could be used to 
modify the RMP process, so that the steam that formed during the 
chip refining could flow backward through the Defibrator boiler 
against the stream of chips being fed to the refiner. This made 
the lignin in the wood more plastic. The refining then became 
gentler, which resulted in a stronger pulp despite the 
considerably higher electric power consumption in comparison 
with to the groundwood process. Similar development work was 
under way more or less in parallel in several places, in North 
America, Sweden and in Finland. 
  Asplund succeeded in interesting Rockhammars Bruk in 
installing a large facility, which began operation in 1968. 
Rockhammars foremost reason for this cooperation was that it was 
looking for a niche for its plant. There was no future in being 
a mechanical pulp factory in the old-fashioned way. The pulp was 
sold in the market in competition with SGW and RMP. 
  The good properties of the pulp caused Holmens Bruk to 
install a large facility at Hallstavik in 1973. A strongly 
driving force behind this development was Einar Klinga, then 
technical director at Holmen. Tests of a newly built paper 
machine in Hallstavik showed that the pulp, which was called 
thermo-mechanical pulp (TMP), was of high quality. The first 
mill to be based completely on TMP was Braviken in 1977. 
  The competitor Bauer-Sunds modified its RMP method according 
to similar principles, but for several years Defibrator had a 
lead, principally because there were mechanical difficulties 
with the double-disc refiners. Several Bauer-Sunds facilities 
were installed, at SCA's paper mill Ortviken, for example. 
  Both Defibrator[.sup]11[/] and Sunds conducted intensive 
development work in order to produce TMP for paper qualities 
other than newsprint. Both parties found, however, that there 
was a lack of more basic research involving thermo-mechanical 
pulp. 
  The industry's research institute, STFI, in 1974 devoted 
itself to undertaking a broadly based research and development 
project which was called the T-pulp project. Participants in 
this were, in addition to STFI's and KTH's researchers, both 
Defibrator and Sunds, together with leading technicians from the 
Forest Industry. The project's final report was submitted in 
1977. 
  The project included, among others, full-scale tests 
undertaken at Hallstavik, Ortviken and Kvarnsveden. By 
connection to the system (reutilization of water), water 
consumption and emissions were reduced. The internal environment 
was radically improved by the disappearance of the steam 
emissions. One also studied modifications in which chemicals 
were added to the refining, so-called chemi-thermo-mechanical 
pulps (CTMP), which would gradually acquire major importance for 
sanitary papers and cardboard. 
  With the T-pulp projects a TMP knowledge base was developed, 
and the knowledge spread very rapidly within the industry. A 
large number of new plants were built at the paper mills as 
replacements for the grinding mills. 
  Mechanical pulp production is extremely power-intensive. 
Stone groundwood for newsprint requires 1,500-1,700 Kwh per ton 
of pulp and TMP about 2,500 kWh for Nordic spruce, which is a 
particularly suitable raw material for this purpose, 1,500-1,700 
kWh of which are for refining. In addition, steam is needed for 
drying the paper. 
  An obvious next step in the development was therefore a 
radical energy saving. In TMP refining a large amount of 
secondary heat is generated in the form of water vapor with low 
pressure. As long as the refining takes place under atmospheric 
pressure, the steam can only be used for heating hot water, or, 
alternatively, it must be compressed with a compressor. Both of 
these methods were tried. At the Braviken plant the hot water 
and the steam with atmospheric pressure were reserved, and at 
Hallstavik heat pumps were installed. 
  As an alternate method one had tried to put the whole 
process 
under pressure, the result of which would be that with the help 
of a pressure cyclone it would be possible to extract the steam 
under such pressure that it could be used as replacement for 
fresh steam in the drying portion of the paper machine. 
  The work with this process went on simultaneously in several 
different places. The first supplier who showed that this 
pressurized process functioned in a satisfactory way was 
Jylhavaara, which at its own mill in Jansenkoski operated a 
pilot facility where steam under three bars of pressure was 
extracted and at the same time a good TMP pulp was produced. It 
was also the first to offer such equipment on the market. The 
breakthrough into the market for this technology took place in 
approximately 1979-1980. Other equipment suppliers rapidly 
followed. The measure achieved a very rapid breakthrough and 
resulted in a dramatic reduction in the fuel requirements for 
drying paper pulp. 
  Today the technology is well developed and practiced at all 
mills of any significance. Up to 70 percent of the electrical 
energy added during refining is recycled and replaces new steam 
during paper drying which would otherwise have been generated 
with a suitable fuel. 
  Since the TMP pulp is considerably stronger than the 
groundwood, it is possible to make do with a considerably lower 
admixture of chemical pulp. Accordingly, today's "standard 
newsprint" (46 g/[.sup]2[/]) is run without any kind of 
chemical pulp for reinforcement, at speeds of 1,400 meters/min. 
Here, the TMP process has had enormous importance economically 
and from the aspect of energy, while the printing properties 
have also improved considerably. The work environment aspect is 
also an important advantage with this technology, since the 
grinding method required manual monitoring of the grinding 
equipment. 
  At a newsprint mill with TMP as its only pulp, it is 
possible 
in today's situation to meet nearly the entire need for heat by 
burning the bark and by using the steam as above. The amount of 
additional fuel is almost negligible, possibly about 10 percent. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  Over approximately a decade, the forest industry replaced 
centuries-old technology with a new one, TMP, which involved 
radical changes of technology, product quality, manufacturing 
economy, working environment and energy use.[.sup]12[/] 
  The case shows that technology sometimes takes a leap in 
development and that afterwards a continuous "maturity process" 
takes place, which cures the problems caused by the leap in 
technology. In this case the "leap" was a mixture of demand, the 
effects of productivity increases and demands for higher product 
quality. The case is also a fine example of the effect of 
cooperation between research and industry in order to reach a 
common goal. 
  In Sweden, Rockhammar was the first to install a TMP 
facility. The big industrial breakthrough came when the large 
paper mills, primarily Holmen/Hallsta, rapidly followed by its 
competitors SCA and STORA, built TMP facilities. The recycling 
of steam was important here in order to improve the economy of 
the process and was consequently an important factor in the 
rapid distribution of the technology. The development in Sweden 
occurred at approximately the same time as the corresponding 
development in the large competing countries. 
<H5>  4. Casting Technology in the Steel Industry </H5>
  Over the most recent 20-year period continuous casting has 
become an increasingly predominant casting process in the steel 
industry. As early as the mid-1980's, all commercial steel and 
about 40 percent of all special steel was continuous cast in 
Sweden. In tons, that means 85-90 percent of all steel in the 
country. The world development has also gone toward a higher 
proportion of continuous casting, although Sweden has a larger 
proportion of continuous casting than in other comparable 
countries. For the development of continuous casting in the 
world after 1980, see Figure 1 [not included]. 
  Henri Bessemer as early as 1856 demonstrated a continuous 
casting process for steel. Bessemer proposed casting molten 
metal between two water-cooled rollers. The process soon turned 
out to be difficult to control, however. At the beginning of the 
1900's Bessemer's ideas were again taken up. They were primarily 
applied to nonferrous metals. During the 1930's and 1940's 
continuous casting for nonferrous metals became an operational 
method. In the 1940's German Mannesmann Huettenwerke, among 
others, demonstrated a continuous casting process for steel. In 
the 1950's the industrial development of the continuous casting 
process then took place. The first Swedish continuous casting 
machine was put into operation at Nyby Bruk in 1954 and 
operational experiences were of significance in the work with 
continuous casting in Europe, where one was doubtful about the 
opportunities of the technology. Other than that, no major 
development of the technology took place in this country during 
this period. In the early 1960's the first prototypes of 
continuous casting facilities were built in Sweden. In 1966 the 
first large continuous casting facility in the country was put 
into operation, at the Domnarvet ironworks in Borlange. After 
that followed Oxelosunds ironworks. Up to the mid-1980's most 
block casting was done as continuous casting. 
  The driving forces for switching to continuous casting in 
the 
steel industry were primarily: 


    -  higher yield 
  -  energy savings 
  -  automation of the casting work/personnel savings 
  -  improvement of the material quality 
  -  the material was closer to the finished dimension. 

    The higher material yield, together with the energy savings, 
was the principal reason for the breakthrough. The material 
savings have increased by 10-15 percent with continuous casting. 
Due to the higher material yield, there was particular interest 
at the beginning of the method development in high-alloy 
materials, for which an increase in yield was economically 
significant. But the breakthrough came first on the commercial 
steel side, which was because the special steel manufacturers 
were more uncertain of the quality of the material. The total 
energy saving to produce a substance by continuous casting in 
comparison with block casting is also considerable. The energy 
consumption for block casting with subsequent heating and block 
rolling is about 1,500 kWh/ton. For continuous casting, about 
500 kWh/ton are needed. In continuous casting some processing 
steps, such as heating the ingot in a pit furnace (which is 
oil-fired), are eliminated. 
  Once the technology was well accepted the emphasis was also 
on improving the material quality. More even material 
composition is obtained both lengthwise and crosswise. At the 
beginning of the period there was uncertainty as to whether the 
material quality could be retained. It was not until it was 
possible to prove that the quality of the material could be 
kept, or even improved, that the real breakthrough came. Today, 
this improvement in quality is highly valued. 
  The oil crises of 1974 and 1979 accelerated the development 
of the continuous casting technology. The energy costs, 
primarily the cost of oil, increased their share of the total 
operating costs. It was necessary to save energy. The oil price 
increased by a factor of three in real terms from the early 
1970's to the early 1980's. Every cut in oil consumption was 
valuable. 
  The payoff time for a continuous casting facility could be 
as 
short as two years. For Sweden the structural rationalization in 
the Swedish steel industry, where action was taken early on, was 
a contributing reason for the rapid penetration of the 
technology; continuous casting achieved a more rapid 
breakthrough in Sweden than in many comparable countries. In 
connection with rationalizations, production was concentrated to 
fewer and bigger units. In many cases that meant new 
investments; some of them involved continuous casting facilities. 
  The following statistic [not included] shows the structural 
changes in the industry in Sweden between the years 1975 and 
1988. 
  The capacity for raw iron production dropped between 1975 
and 
1988 from about 4.1 million tons to 2.5 million tons/year. The 
capacity for raw steel production dropped from about 7.54 
million tons/year to 2.5 million tons/year during the same 
period of time. Production was concentrated to a few places. 
Instead, the units became larger. 
  The actual production of raw steel has remained at a stable 
level from 1975 until today. The annual production of raw steel 
lies between 4 and 5 million tons. 
  The next step in casting technology is thin "slabs," that is 
to say a nearly finished form, or direct casting of strips. With 
this the power consumption can be considerably reduced. A 
decrease of up to 50 percent in comparison with continuous 
casting can be achieved, but does not mean very much in absolute 
numbers, see Figure 2 [not included]. The energy aspects are 
also not the driving force. However, considerable cost savings 
can be achieved for investments (smaller plants, certain 
production steps are eliminated) and in production, in the form 
of reduced personnel requirements. 
  The technology is beginning to be commercialized. The first 
facility began operating in 1990 in the United States (Nucor). A 
plant is projected in Italy (Arweri). In Japan and Germany this 
technology is also regarded with major interest. 
  Other energy-saving projects in the steel industry are 
basically "warm flows," meaning minimization of the number of 
reheating steps of the substance until the finished product. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  It can be concluded that the period from the first major 
installation to nearly complete penetration was about 15 years, 
a relatively short period in this context. The technology had 
been known since the 1950's, that is to say about 20 years. In 
spite of that, the technology was not interesting from a 
commercial point of view. The reason was mainly that there was a 
lack of operating experience and full-scale experiments had to 
be done, which required reference objects. 
  That the yield would increase and the energy consumption 
drop 
was an accepted insight. On the other hand, there was doubt that 
the quality of the continuously cast material could be kept. 
  Beginning with the period of World War II and up to 1975 the 
steel industry had stable growth in the quantity of steel of 
about five percent a year. New production units could be made to 
pay off relatively quickly and investments were mainly made in 
conventional and proven technology, that is to say ingot 
casting. The real breakthrough came in connection with the 
necessary restructuring of the industry in the latter part of 
the 1970's. Fewer and larger production units required new 
investments. 
  During this period of the restructuring the continuous 
casting technology was relatively completed, and the advantages 
of the technology made it natural to introduce it on a large 
scale, which caused it to be installed over a rather short 
period of time. 
  It is possible to determine that stimulating programs, such 
as government ones, were largely absent in Sweden, as well as in 
the rest of the world. The continuous casting technique was 
developed on a strict commercial basis. This means that the 
introduction took place on its own technical and economic 
merits, which required a number of concurrent factors for the 
commercial breakthrough to occur. 
<H5>  5. Pressurized Fluidized Bed Combustion of Coal (PFBC) </H5>
  A fluidized bed is, simply stated, a bed of particles raised 
by a gas flowing through, which makes the bed behave as a fluid. 
  The fluidized bed began to be developed in the 1920's in 
Germany. In the 1940's the petroleum industry used fluidized 
beds to crack crude oil. During the 1960's, primarily in Great 
Britain, interest awakened in combustion of coal in pressurized 
fluidized beds (PFBC). Government funds had been invested in it, 
for example. There were few entrepreneurs who were interested in 
developing the idea industrially, however. 
  The ideas came to Stal Laval[.sup]13[/] in Finspang by way 
of Great Britain during the late 1960's. At Stal Laval this 
idea was being worked on. No major resources were invested, but 
the idea was brought forward to basic system concepts. 
  There were several reasons for the interest. 


    -  Coal had the future ahead of it: It has a more stable 
price picture than oil, and there will be enough for about 200 
years. But coal had the image of being dirty and obsolete. It 
was a matter of finding a modern way to burn coal. 
  -  Within the company, which at that time produced nuclear 
turbines and turbines and turbine systems for ships, for 
example, a change was seen in the market for these. The 
objective was to enter new markets, to some extent. 
  -  The environmental aspects of combustion, primarily the sulfur 
fallout, were beginning to be debated and this debate was likely 
to intensify. The pressurized fluidized bed could be a solution, 
environmentally speaking. 

    It was believed that there was a market, and the interest 
shown by potential customers was studied in the early 1970's. 
Both Vattenfall and Sydkraft, as well as some foreign companies 
were contacted. But in Sweden it was nuclear power as well as 
hydroelectric power that were being expanded, and no one saw any 
need to generate power with coal. Simultaneously, oil prices 
were low and the oil crises had not yet hit the western world. 
  The pressurized fluidized bed (PFBC) was known within the 
company and therefore by the management as well. 
  In 1976 Curt Nicolin, who was managing director of ASEA, of 
which Stal Laval was a subsidiary, dedicated a facility 
delivered to American Electric Power (AEP) by ASEA. In this 
connection the PFBC concept was discussed. AEP became 
interested. AEP is the largest coal-burning power company in the 
western world and produced as much power as is used in Sweden. 
Nearly all of AEP's production is based on coal and based on 
high-sulfuric (4-5 percent) coal in the Ohio region. One had 
begun to notice a certain criticism of coal burning, with the 
attendant pollution and sulfur emissions. The company was forced 
to alter the prevailing image of high-sulfur coal and its 
environmental effects or utilize low-sulfur coal, which was not 
available in the company's own mines. In broad outlines the PFBC 
concept met AEP's requirements for modern coal combustion. 
  The PFBC project at Stal Laval began in 1976. With AEP as a 
potential customer and partner, one dared invest on a large 
scale. 
  The first project was a feasibility study at AEP. One 
proceeded from there. Toward the end of the 1970's Stal Laval 
spent large resources on the PFBC project. In cooperation with 
AEP a major test program was carried out in Great Britain. In 
the early 1980's discussions were held regarding a full-scale 
facility in Ohio. AEP wanted additional tests, however, with 
their own coal, among other things. A 15-MW test plant was built 
at the Oresund plant in Malmo. The facility was ready in 1983 
and had in principle been financed by Stal Laval. The first 
tests with American coal were carried out in 1983/84. At the end 
of 1986 AEP received support from both the Department of Energy 
(DoE) and the State of Ohio Coal Development Office, which is 
likely to have been of significance for the order. The plant was 
put into operation in early 1991. 
  In connection with ASEA's 100th anniversary in 1983, 
lectures 
were given about PFBC. The technical director of the 
semi-state-owned Spanish energy producer Endesa who listened to 
one of these lectures became interested in the idea. The problem 
in Spain is that coal with a high ash content and extremely high 
sulfur content is burned, in short poor-quality coal. In order 
to compensate for this, the world's tallest chimneys until now 
had been built in Spain. But this method was no longer accepted 
in Spain or by the neighboring countries. A major need for 
expansion was anticipated in the 1990's. As early as 1984 the 
first Spanish coal was tested in the test facility in Malmo. The 
result was positive. In 1986 it was decided to build an 80-MW 
test facility. The Spanish project has received subsidies from 
the EC. But that was not the deciding factor in the choice of 
technology. The facility was put into operation in early 1991. 
  Within the ASEA group it was in the early 1980's believed 
that thee was a market in Sweden as well. Important factors were 
that one was being forced to replace the expensive oil and that 
the environmental demands for "pure" combustion technology had 
grown stronger. A political decision had been made to abolish 
nuclear power. It was not a powerful reason, but it was surely 
used as an argument in some circles. Vattenfall planned a 
coal-based power plant in Oxelosund, but that was too far into 
the future to be of any interest. 
  In 1982 Stockholm Energi began to work out a proposal for 
coal conversion at the Vartan facility. The alternative, which 
was developed within the energy company, involved using the 
existing turbine and the existing furnace. A covered coal depot 
was to be built, as well as a desulfurization facility. But the 
permit application was pulled back before it was considered by 
the Concession Board. It would probably not have passed because 
it would not have received a site permit for the facility. In 
order to burn coal, the "most recently available technology" was 
a requirement, which conventional coal conversion could not be 
said to equate. 
  At about the same time the Oil Replacement Delegation had 
begun to belabor the big cities on issues involving conversion 
from heating with oil to other fuels. There was pressure to 
shift to coal combustion, which could be utilized for marketing 
the PFBC. 
  The decision-making process, which lasted from 1983 to 1987 
when the management of Stockholm Energi decided to build a PFBC 
facility for 130 MW electricity and 210 MW heat, was long, and 
many alternatives were discussed. Discussions were also held at 
the ministerial level. The decision came to be regarded by many 
as a political decision. 
  The studies around a PFBC facility in Vartan or Hasselby 
were 
initiated in 1984. Various groups were appointed to oversee the 
technology and economy. Representatives of Stockholm Energi, 
ASEA, Vattenfall and Sydkraft, among others, participated in the 
groups. 
  Several different alternatives were brought up against each 
other: pulverized coal, CFB (circulating fluidized bed) and 
PFBC. The final choice was a PFBC facility at Vartan with two 
modules, each with 200 MW fuel effect. 
  However, Stockholm Energi and ASEA did not agree on a number 
of questions regarding the technology, which was untested on a 
large scale. During 1985/86 verifications were undertaken which 
provided answers to several of the questions about the 
technology. 
  In early 1986 ASEA proposed a turn-key solution, in which 
ASEA assumed the principal risks. The crucial decision in favor 
of a PFBC solution was then made at the beginning of 1987. 
  The dialogue in the technical development and projection 
phase has been relatively successful. There was not always 
agreement, but the problems were solved. 
  Today, availability and performance tests are under way at 
the facility. 
  Final payment has not yet been made. Today the costs, based 
on the cost of living, etc., amount to over 2 billion kronor. No 
development support has been given to the customer, except for a 
general environmental contribution. 
  In 1990 ABB Carbon signed an agreement with Japanese 
Ishikawajima Harima Heavy Industry (IHI), which includes the 
transfer of PFBC technology to Japan. IHI is one of Japan's 
largest energy producers. The Japanese cooperation is seen as 
very important today. A PFBC 200 is projected (the same as the 
one at Vartan, which is to be completed in 1993). 
  There have not yet been any additional contracts from AEP or 
Endesa. They are expected within one or a couple of years, 
however. Discussions concerning PFBC plants are under way with 
many potential customers today. After the mid-1990's and for the 
next 10 years facilities have been planned for coal technology 
with 360,000 MW output. The dominant portion is expected to 
involve "pure" coal technology. 
  Competitors in this field are Mitsubishi, Deutsche Babcock 
and, to some extent, Pyro Power, which is a subsidiary of 
Ahlstrom. But ABB is ahead of its competitors today, thanks to 
the pilot and reference facilities it has. 
  ABB has not yet received any major government contribution 
to 
develop the technology. About 50 million kronor were obtained in 
various development subsidies. The total development budget is 
on the order of 1 billion kronor. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  A system concept for the principle, based on a potential 
future technology, had been developed. The advantages of the 
system were: 


    -  high degree of efficiency and high electric power/heat 
ratio 
  -  environmentally friendly 
  -  the facilities are physically smaller than conventional 
pulverized coal facilities. 

    AEP and Endesa saw the advantages of the technology. Both 
had 
high-sulfur coal in their own region and this technology would 
enable continued utilization of these high-sulfur coals. 
  On the part of AEP, federal funds can have been significant 
in daring to invest in this new technology; in the United States 
funding of this type is very common. On the part of Endesa, the 
technology was viewed as having a future in Spain, where large 
amounts of low-quality coal are available. 
  Political control factors were of relatively major 
importance 
for the Vartan project. From an environmental point of view the 
framework conditions were fixed at an early stage. PFBC was 
represented as the alternative which would best meet the 
environmental requirements. If the plans for coal conversion at 
Vartan had been completed, and the permit obtained, and if no 
influence had been exerted from official authorities and organs 
regarding the environmental aspects, for example, which the 
energy producers in the early 1980's often viewed with less 
interest than today, it is likely that PFBC would not have been 
chosen. With conventional technology it is possible today to get 
just as "pure" technology as with PFBC. But PFBC has a higher 
degree of efficiency, which was not always evident in the 
process concerning Vartan. The PFBC alternative was probably 
also favored from the aspect of industrial policy, where the 
future export potentials were stressed. 
  Commercialization of the technology came with Vartan as a 
demonstration facility, and this is definitely of crucial 
importance for the continued success of the technology, but 
mainly outside Sweden. 
  Without a large reference facility, the technology would not 
have been commercialized this quickly. 
<H5>  6. The Stirling Engine </H5>
  The Stirling engine is not a new type of engine. It was 
invented by a Scottish priest, Robert Stirling, who in 1816 drew 
up the principles for a heat engine with combustion outside the 
cylinder. Stirling's engine was clumsy, however, and the 
development had a minor effect. 
  In 1938 Dutch Philips took up the idea of the Stirling 
engine. The reason for Philips' interest was that the engine 
could be used to generate electric power for radio and other 
electrical equipment in unexploited areas where kerosene and oil 
were available, primarily the Dutch colonies at that time in 
Asia. As a result of the development of the electronics, 
however, primarily the transistor, interest in the Stirling 
engine subsided. 
  At the end of the 1960's several Swedish companies were 
interested in the Stirling engine. This culminated in 1968 in 
the founding of United Stirling AB in Malmo. Owners of the 
company were FFV, Husqvarna and Kockums. A licensing agreement 
for the Philips- developed Stirling engine was bought, I-98, an 
engine which developed 10-20 KW power, varying somewhat 
depending on the version. This model represented the basis for 
the development at United Stirling. 
  FFV felt political pressure to begin looking at civilian 
applications; there were, for example, proposals for FFV to 
begin developing materials and systems for health care. The 
Stirling engine concept appeared to be a potential solution for 
the future. It was environmentally friendly, fuel-saving, could 
be used with many different fuels and the number of possible 
applications was large. 
  Husqvarna wanted to supplement its production of small 
engines and was interested in engines for electricity and heat 
generation in housing. The Stirling engine was regarded as 
interesting for the future. 
  Both FFV and Husqvarna had mechanical engineering plants 
which were potential units for large-scale industrial production 
of Stirling engines. Furthermore, FFV had materials laboratories 
where work on heat-resistant materials and processing of these 
was carried out. Know-how in this field is of significance for 
Stirling engines. 
  Kockums' idea was originally to utilize the Stirling engine 
in submarines. 
  The automobile industry had also participated in the 
discussion, but it was really not very interested. 
  United Stirling's first externally financed project started 
in 1968/69 and included a budget of 6 million kronor. The 
project involved Stirling engines in submarines. The customer 
was the Swedish Navy. 
  Since the potential applications for the Stirling engine 
were 
many and interest in this type of engine had begun to awaken, 
the technicians were to a large extent the ones who decided. 
They foresaw the following applications, for example: 


    -  in submarines 
  -  in cars, trucks and buses 
  -  for stationary power generation 
  -  for heat pumps. 

    Husqvarna pulled out before any actual development had 
begun, 
and that was chiefly for financial reasons. 
  Once the shipyard crisis occurred, United Stirling was 
transferred to Svenska Varv and later Celsius. In 1988 United 
Stirling merged with Kockums and became a part of Kockums. 
Kockums had been reorganized in the mid-1980's. In the 1970's 
FFV had its own unit for development of the Stirling engine in 
Linkoping, FFV Industriprodukter AB, which did not belong to 
United Stirling. At the end of the 1970's, this activity was 
absorbed into United Stirling, however. Certain parts of the FFV 
branch were sold in the mid-1980's to McDonnell Douglas. 
  After the first oil crisis in 1974, the Stirling projects 
were not affected to any major extent. The most tangible change 
was that the potential market, primarily the United States, for 
Stirling engines in motor homes for heat and power generation, 
disappeared. After the second oil crisis, 1978, however, the 
eyes turned to the Stirling engine. Large government subsidies 
were granted internationally for development of the concept. The 
U.S. Department of Energy (DoE) and NASA supported many Stirling 
projects. The total financial support amounted to hundreds of 
millions of dollars each year. Government subsidies were also 
provided in Great Britain, Germany, France, etc. 
  There were about 10 companies worldwide which developed 
Stirling engines for various applications. United Stirling was 
one of them. Most were found in the United States and Germany. 
  The end of the 1970's and early 1980's must be regarded as 
the days of glory for development of the Stirling engine for 
various applications. The public funds which had been allocated 
to the projects all over the world were beginning to show 
results. Many conferences and seminars were arranged about the 
Stirling engine and its various applications. The entire field 
was marked by openness and optimism for the future. 
  At the end of the 1970's and the early 1980's prototypes for 
Stirling applications in cars, buses, trucks, heat pumps, 
solar-powered systems, etc. were presented. The opinion was that 
some of these would become commercially viable within a 
five-year period. A world production of 50,000-100,000 units a 
year was discussed. 
  The prognoses were largely based on continued high fuel 
prices, chiefly diesel, but also gasoline, and generally high 
energy costs. 
  In principle, United Stirling had two large, international, 
development projects, both of which were financed with federal 
U.S. funds. 
  One involved a car concept (financed by DoE) and was aimed 
at 
transferring the technology of the Stirling engine to the United 
States and the development of prototypes. United Stirling's 
annual budgets for the project were 20 million kronor a year for 
nine years. The result of the project was that it was not 
possible to verify that operation of this type of engine was as 
reliable as that of an Otto engine. The tests with the 
prototypes yielded good results, to be sure, but had not been 
carried out for sufficiently long periods. The cost of gasoline 
was not decisive. 
  The second large project involved a solar concentrator, a 
Stirling engine and a generator. The system delivered a 28 
percent yield of produced electric power from incident solar 
energy, which was totally superior to competing solar energy 
converters. The project had a total budget of several hundred 
million kronor and was partly financed by DoE. In 1981 the first 
prototype was built in the Mojave desert in California. In 
1982/83 cooperation with McDonnell Douglas was initiated and the 
federal U.S. funding disappeared. McDonnell Douglas invested 
large amounts in additional development of the concept. A large 
number of units were distributed for testing in desert regions 
in the United States during the period 1983-1985. During this 
period of time the energy prices were so high that this concept, 
despite being relatively expensive to install, was a financially 
good alternative. 
  A market introduction of the solar concentrator in sunny 
regions was regarded as very likely within a few years. At 
United Stirling it was believed that there was a market for up 
to 100 units in the United States alone. When the price of oil 
dropped in 1985, there was no incentive to continue with the 
solar concentrator, and United Stirling sold its rights to the 
United States. 
  Volvo and Saab followed the development during the late 
1970's, above all for large Stirling engine concepts, primarily 
for trucks and buses. However, there were no major government 
subsidies in Sweden in order for Volvo and Saab to participate 
in the development projects. Volvo Penta also held discussions 
involving Stirling engines for use in boats, both as propulsion 
engines and as power and heat generators. But Volvo Penta was 
more interested in being a component supplier. 
  At the beginning of the 1980's, the Swedish Navy resumed its 
ideas about Stirling engines in submarines. The Stirling engine 
is nearly ideal for submarines: 


    -  Independent air supply; combustion of pure oxygen, 
which is stored in liquid form 
  -  combustion takes place at high pressure, with the result that 
emissions can be released without using additional energy 
  -  long operating life 
  -  quiet operation, low vibration level. 

    In 1988/89 Kockums tested a Stirling engine in a submarine, 
the Nacken. Today, the Nacken is in service. The Swedish Navy 
has ordered three submarines of the Gotland series, in which 
Stirling engines are to be used. 
  The Australian Navy has ordered six submarines from Kockums, 
with options for another two. The contract also includes options 
for Stirling engines, but these have not yet been utilized. A 
prototype Stirling engine has been ordered and delivered, 
however. 
  Discussions are now being held with Canada and Malaysia for 
submarines which also include the Stirling engine. Further, 
there are cooperation projects with Kawasaki Heavy Industries on 
Stirling engines for Japanese submarines. 
  Kockums is today the world leader in Stirling engines in 
submarines. 
  Kockums' submarine concept becomes more interesting when it 
is able to offer a solution (Stirling engine) which the 
competitors do not have. 
  The technical breakthrough for this very special application 
has taken more than 20 years and the development budget, at 
United Stirling alone, amounted to more than 1 billion kronor 
over the period at today's prices. Today, about 30 persons at 
Kockums work with Stirling engines. At the end of the 1970's it 
was about 140 persons. 
  United Stirling, together with FFV, has sold approximately 
190 engines up to and including 1991. These were mainly 
prototypes for cars, buses and diverse energy applications, such 
as engines for submarines, etc. 
  The intensive basic development carried out at United 
Stirling in the 1970's had major significance for the technical 
breakthrough for Stirling engines in submarines. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  Theoretically, the Stirling engine is a good concept. The 
number of potential applications are also many. With these 
starting points and with large development budgets, financed 
primarily with government funding, worldwide development was 
begun. Worldwide, nearly 10 billion kronor have been invested to 
try to commercialize the technology. When access to funding for 
development projects was good, increasingly more people became 
interested in the Stirling engine development and the quality of 
certain companies may be questioned. 
  The submarine concept was included early on, but other 
potential applications took over, primarily applications for 
vehicles and the generation of energy, because this was where 
the largest subsidies were. Few development projects were able 
to demonstrate technical-economic gains with the Stirling engine. 
  One potential commercial application existed in the energy 
field, the solar concentrator. Here there were financial 
incentives for continuation: a high degree of efficiency for the 
solar concentrator, combined with high energy costs. With 
continued high energy prices in the United States this system 
would likely have been commercialized on a large scale within a 
few years. Calculations showed that it was financially 
defensible if large-scale engine production were started. At 
this time there was also a certain market pressure in the United 
States. 
  As for submarines, the Stirling engine offers major 
advantages. In the large high-technology systems which 
submarines represent, cost is of lower-ranking importance. 
Kockums' interest in Stirling engines is principally in the 
opportunities to offer more unique solutions for submarines than 
those of its competitors. 
  The technical breakthrough for the Stirling engine within a 
very special field, submarines, has arrived. But to use this to 
state that the technology has been commercialized is going to 
far. 
  Commercial use of the technology for other applications is 
possible under very specific framework conditions, namely high 
energy prices or unique technical requirements/needs. It was 
these framework conditions which were not taken into account 
when the development was at its most intense, during the 1970's. 
Potential applications areas were envisioned and the idea of the 
technology was appealing. The framework conditions were 
relatively static and a change, such as the energy price level, 
altered the picture completely over a short period. 
  Marketing the concept on a large scale is likely to require 
the fulfillment of one or more of the following factors: 


    -  New production technology, which enables more rational 
and thus cheaper production 
  -  New, cheaper materials, which in a better way can cope with 
high temperatures and the complex transfer and conduction of heat 
  -  Large production volume, which in turn requires a market, of 
course. 

  7. Fiberoptic Technology in the Telecommunications 
Network 
  The principle for conducting light with fiberoptics was 
described as early as the beginning of the 1900's. However, the 
basis of fiberoptic communication is considered to be an article 
in the PROCEEDINGS OF IEE, 1966. Two British researchers, C. K. 
Kao and G. A. Hockham, both active at ITT, analyzed the reasons 
for the high attenuation at that time in optical fibers for 
image transmission, about 1,000 dB/km and predicted that one 
should be able to achieve a value of about 20 dB/km, if 
sufficiently pure glass could be produced. Fibers with 
attenuation values at this low level should then also become 
interesting for communication purposes. The U.S. fiberglass 
manufacturer Corning took up the idea, and in 1970 fibers with 
attenuation below 20 dB/km were produced. 
  Corning's successes were the beginning of fibers with ever 
decreasing attenuation. Today, normal attenuation values are 
below 0.25 dB/km with a wavelength of 1,550 nm. 
  There was relative agreement in the telecommunications 
industry in the early 1970's that this new technology would have 
the possibility of drastically changing the telecommunications 
of the future. It was believed that the technology had the 
following potential advantages, among others: 


    -  Large bandwidth and many channels per fiber 
  -  low transmission losses, which results in the possibility of 
bridging large distances without intermediate repeaters 
  -  lower weight and volume compared to other types of 
telecommunications cables, which results in easier installation 
  -  lower installation costs per kilometer, compared to other 
cable 
installation. 

    In the early 1970's it was still difficult to produce 
fiberoptics with low attenuation industrially. The development 
on the fiber side went relatively quickly, however. A few large 
companies such as AT&amp;T, Corning and ITT further developed and 
improved the production technology and the quality of the 
optical fiber. 
  At LM Ericsson activity was begun in the mid-1970's in the 
field of fiberoptics, partly in a group which worked with system 
studies, and partly in a group at the materials laboratory which 
developed the technology for manufacturing fiberoptics. Sieverts 
Kabelverk[.sup]14[/] began to produce optical cable during 
the late 1970's. 
  The Telecommunications Agency has monitored the field 
extensively since the early 1970's, and a large number of future 
possibilities for the technology were seen for Sweden and the 
Swedish telecommunications grid. Commercially, however, the 
technology was not mature. A relatively rapid development of 
fibers took place, and there was continuous improvement in the 
fiber development. Not until the end of the 1970's, however, was 
there a breakthrough for relatively cheap fibers with good 
quality. 
  In the mid-1970's Sweden was a world leader in the field of 
coaxial cable. At the end of the 1950's, as the first 
installation in the world, came a 12-MHz system (2,700 channels 
per coaxial pair) and in the early 1970's came the last analog 
system, 60 MHz (10,800 channels per coaxial pair), also the 
first in the world. The coaxial expansion, combined with 
supplementation by radio link, had provided a certain 
overcapacity in the network. 
  Traffic prognoses during the 1970's were also relatively 
uncertain, and the network was anticipated to grow at only a 
moderate pace. At the Telecommunications Agency no need was seen 
to introduce optical technology on a large scale, at least not 
within the near future. There was, however, long-range planning 
for modernization of the telecommunications network at the 
Telecommunications Agency. Investment plans up to the year 2010 
were available. These plans included optical installations. 
  Tests with optical technology were carried out for strategic 
reasons. Planning for the tests was undertaken as early as 1977 
and in 1979 the Telecommunications Agency carried out tests with 
fiberoptics between, for example, the telephone stations at 
Fredhall and Appelviken in Stockholm. Sieverts Kabelwerk was one 
of the suppliers of cable. At the system level, the 
Telecommunications Agency and Ericsson cooperated. The 
Telecommunications Agency itself took care of the installation. 
  Seen from an international perspective, Sweden was far from 
first. The first tests in the telecommunications field were done 
as early as 1976/77. 
  The Telecommunications Agency began installing optical cable 
in 1982. To begin with, fiberoptics of the "multimode" type were 
installed, with certain physical characteristics. It was 
principally the grids between the local stations in Stockholm, 
Goteborg and, to some extent, Malmo which were upgraded and 
modernized with fiberoptics. Since 1984/85, the 
Telecommunications Agency has installed about 2,500 kilometers 
of optical cable[.sup]15[/] per year. After 1984/85 the 
installations encompassed mainly the long-distance network. 
After 1985 only fibers of the "single mode" type were installed, 
with different physical characteristics than multimode fibers, 
among them higher signal transmission capability. 
  Today, in 1991, about 16,000 kilometers of fiberoptics have 
been installed in the Swedish grid. 
  The next step in the development will be optical cable in 
the 
local networks. Modernizations and upgrading of the local 
metropolitan grids today take place to a large extent using 
fiberoptics. 
  Fiberoptic systems for industrial applications have never 
attracted the same attention, however. The reason for this is 
that it is expensive. Sometimes it can be justified, however, 
for instance if unique requirements such as resistance to 
interference exist or if large volumes of data must be 
transmitted. 
  In the energy field, it may be mentioned that fiberoptics 
can 
be used in the ground lines in power cables. Fiberoptics can 
then be used for rapid transmission of information such as 
controlling the network. Such a power line has been installed in 
Sweden in the vicinity of Forsmark for an overhead cable portion 
of the power connection between Sweden and Finland. 
  Fiberoptic development has also been of importance for 
digitizing telecommunications systems. The introduction of 
digital transmission systems began in Sweden in the early 
1970's. This was also not a field in which Sweden was an 
international pioneer. Toward the end of the 1970's, digital 
switching equipment and stations were introduced, while the 
links were still largely analog. In the early 1980's the 
connections also began to be digitized, first by equipping free 
coaxial pairs in existing coaxial cables, then with newly 
installed optical cables. The Telecommunications Agency and 
Ericsson undertook partially joint development of the digital 
systems for public telecommunications, primarily in the 
switching area (the AXE development). The Telecommunications 
Agency and Ericsson cooperated intimately for a long time. Among 
other things, they jointly own the Ellemtel development 
corporation. 
  Around 1983/84 came a break in the trend in the 
telecommunications field in Sweden. From an annual growth in 
traffic of 1-2 percent, it increased to 5-6 percent. The reasons 
were many. 


    -  A strong increase in the data traffic. It grew by 30 
percent annually, which in turn was due to the definitive 
breakthrough of computers in business and administration. 
  -  The international and long-distance traffic increased. In the 
1980's business and industry became highly internationalized. 
The "service society" was also strengthened, which increases 
telephone traffic. 
  -  An altered attitude toward telephoning has been perceived 
during the 1980's. Younger generations regard the telephone as 
something natural and thus use the telephone to a larger extent. 
The rate of increase in telephone traffic has been about four 
percent a year after 1984/85, which represents a major increase 
in absolute numbers. 
  -  In recent years new telephone services, as well as the fax, 
have also undergone a strong expansion. 

    The break with the trend in 1983/84 was relatively 
unexpected. The prognoses indicated an increase, but not as fast 
and sudden. 
  At the same time demands were raised for more reliability 
and 
accessibility in the telecommunications systems, which resulted 
in reserve capacity having to be built into the system. It was 
realized quite soon that the overcapacity in the grid from the 
late 1970's had been used up. Plans were therefore made for 
continuing high traffic growth for the rest of the 1980's and in 
order to assure high accessibility and security in the network. 
  This had the result that the joint line grid was expanded by 
12-15 percent annually. Optical technology was economically 
superior to other technology in cost per channel. In the 
mid-1980's a digital channel with fiberoptics cost only 
one-fourth of what an analog coaxial channel cost in the 
mid-1970's. 
  The Telecommunications Agency began marketing the Digitalen 
87 project, which involved introduction of a nationwide digital 
network in 1987. It was inaugurated at the end of 1987, as the 
first in the world. Sums corresponding to 7-8 billion kronor a 
year at current prices were invested by the Telecommunications 
Agency in the network. Part of it was fiberoptic. 
  According to the Riksdag decision on new financial rules, 
etc. for the Telecommunications Agency and its subsidiaries, 
after 1985 all external capital acquisition by the group, 
exclusive of its broadcast activity, was financed through 
borrowing in the general credit market. This has also influenced 
the size of the investments, because it became easier for the 
agency to get financing. Investments could be undertaken at a 
more rapid pace. The large investments for a few years in the 
1980's, which involved digitizing the long-distance network, 
caused Sweden to have an early lead internationally. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  The theoretical insights that fiberoptic technology is a 
superior technology for telecommunications came late, not until 
the 1960's, with researchers at ITT and Corning, one of the 
major fiberglass manufacturers, that is to say a company which 
did not at that time have the profile of a telecommunications 
enterprise. 
  When fiber technology became commercially available, at the 
end of the 1970's, many communications administrations had 
"overinvested" and saw no need for new capacity in the near 
future. Test activity with fiberoptics was carried out on a 
small scale, however, as a kind of strategic monitoring. 
  During the 1970's the digitizing of the public 
telecommunications systems also began, on a relatively small 
scale, starting with the switching equipment and later with 
transmission as well. Digital technology was particularly suited 
for use in optical systems. 
  During the first half of the 1980's there occurred a change 
in the growth trend all over the world: Sweden, for example, had 
had growth of 1-2 percent a year, which grew to 5-6 percent a 
year. Major investments in the network were required in order to 
cope with this growth and to achieve a high level with regard to 
availability and operational reliability. 
  Digital technology and optical technology had become 
commercially available during that period. With these 
technologies it was possible to achieve higher capacity and 
quality per invested amount. 
  Digital technology and optical technology met the 
requirements of the market for modern telecommunications during 
a period when new investments in communications networks were 
necessary, which resulted in a rapid breakthrough. 
  Today, the optical technology represents the de facto 
standard for long-distance telecommunication. 
  The development of fiberoptics is taking place at the major 
cable and fiber manufacturers. There are only a few in the world 
today. Fiberoptics itself has become a "standard component." 
Today, it is more correct to regard fiberoptic technology as a 
complete systems technology, of which fiberoptics is only a part. 
  It may be noted that the ideas around fiberoptics are not 
Swedish, and that the early development of fiberoptics was not 
to any major extent done in Sweden. When the fiber became 
commercially available, a major effort was undertaken in this 
country, however, and Sweden became a leading nation as regards 
fiberoptics in the network. This shows that it is possible to 
adopt technology developed elsewhere and become a leader by 
means of major investments. 
<H5>  8. Mobile Telephones </H5>
  The development of mobile telephones, or more correctly 
cellular, analog mobile telephones, took place during the 1980's 
at a rate which exceeded all prognoses and caused a strong 
expansion of the capacity of the networks. At least from a 
historical perspective, mobile telephones will be regarded as 
"one of the most successful technologies of the 1980's." 
  Commercial cellular mobile telephone networks opened in 
Japan 
in 1979, in the Nordic countries in 1981, in Australia in 1981, 
in the United States in 1984 and in Great Britain in 1985. Today 
(August 1991) there are 13.3 million subscribers in the world, 
1.2 million of whom are in the Nordic countries and 550,000 in 
Sweden. 
  The Telecommunications Agency's prognoses for the 
penetration 
of mobile telephones in Sweden was 50,000 subscribers after 10 
years. Sweden and the Nordic countries are today world leaders 
in cellular mobile telephone technology, with players such as 
Ericsson and Nokia as system suppliers and terminal 
manufacturers, and the Telecommunications Agency and its Nordic 
counterparts as operators. 
  Tests of radio reception in cars were initiated as early as 
the 1920's. The police forces in the United States used this 
method to direct police cars. An accelerating factor is likely 
to have been the gangster chases of the 1920's. 
  In the 1930's tests with land-mobile radio began in Sweden 
as 
well. Here as well the police were the first. 
  During the years immediately after World War II, the use of 
land-mobile radio spread rapidly. This was to a large extent 
because of the technical development during the war. 
  At the end of the 1940's, the then Telegraph Administration 
decided to undertake test activity with car telephones. Some 
calculations showed that manual traffic involved considerable 
personnel costs, and the development work was aimed at an 
automatic network. This network came to be the first completely 
automated mobile telephone network in the world. The radio 
equipment was delivered by Svenska Radio AB, a subsidiary of LM 
Ericsson. The system stayed in service until 1969 and had 
slightly more than 100 subscribers at that time. It had local 
coverage in Stockholm and Goteborg. In the mid-1950's the 
development of yet another system began. The official start of 
this system was in 1965, but tests had been under way for some 
years. This system had coverage areas in Stockholm, Goteborg and 
Malmo. 
  In the 1950's and 1960's the know-how about radio telephones 
grew at the Telecommunications Agency and at the radio 
laboratory. 
  At the same rate as the increasing automobile traffic, a 
need 
was perceived in the late 1960's for a mobile telephone system 
with greater range, which even made communication possible 
between the Nordic countries. In 1969 the Telecommunications 
Agency informed its Nordic counterparts that it was beginning to 
work with the next generation of mobile telephone systems. It 
was long-range work, and a complete system could hardly be 
finished before the end of the 1970's. Further, it would be of 
major advantage if a similar service could be achieved in the 
other Nordic countries. A working group, with representatives of 
the telecommunications administrations of Sweden, Denmark, 
Finland and Norway, was appointed with the task of working out 
joint specifications for a future automated mobile telephone 
system. The working group was given the name of NMT, the Nordic 
Mobile Telephone group. The leading part of the NMT group was 
the Swedish Telecommunications Agency. The cost sharing by the 
NMT group was based on the number of telephones in each country, 
which caused the Telecommunications Agency to be responsible for 
half of the costs. Another aspect that should be mentioned is 
that the cost for specification and subsequent development could 
be reduced, if more parties were involved. This part was not 
insignificant. The NMT group began to specify an automatic 
mobile telephone system which was to operate in the 450 MHz band. 
  At the same time demands began to be raised for an interim 
solution, in the form of a manual system, before the automatic 
NMT system had been completely specified, developed and tested. 
In the early 1970's an interim, manual mobile telephone system 
was therefore put into operation. This system became known as 
MTD and also operated in the 450 MHz band. One reasons for this 
was that there was a certain amount of customer pressure for 
mobile telephones, primarily outside the large metropolitan 
regions. Another was that marketing the manual system was good 
for becoming accustomed to mobile telephones, which could 
provide the automatic system with a flying start. At its 
largest, the MTD system had 19,000 subscribers. The system was 
gradually abolished during the 1980's. 
  The NMT group was providing continuous information to the 
Nordic industry about its work. The industry also had 
opportunities to comment on the NMT group's work and to submit 
viewpoints. In 1975 a system specification draft was ready. That 
same year the Nordic telecommunications administrations decided 
to develop the system. By their work with the system, the NMT 
group had acquired detailed knowledge, which could be 
transferred, although not without considerable work, to the 
industry in the form of specifications. 
  The starting point for the construction was determined to be 
a number of basic requirements which were believed to meet the 
future subscribers' demands adequately, and the technical and 
economic preconditions. 
  The special function which permits calling up a mobile 
subscriber without the need to know where he is is called 
"roaming" and is made possible by the fact that a mobile station 
which leaves a covered area for a base radio station and enters 
a new one automatically reports this to the switching station. 
Further, during a conversation it may happen that a mobile 
subscriber gets outside the area of coverage for the base 
station in which the conversation is taking place. The move 
results in poorer conversation quality. The quality is checked 
by means of a monitoring signal. These special functions were 
technically complicated. 
  In the mid-1970's the AXE-13 exchange from LM Ericsson was a 
potential alternative. As early as a year or so later, the first 
AXE exchange was put into operation, and this type of exchange 
can be equipped with modules which can execute the exchange 
functions of the mobile telephone. The choice of exchange 
therefore fell to AXE. This exchange was not intended, in its 
original function, to be used for radio telephones. Because of 
the modular composition, it was possible to equip AXE with a 
radio portion with certain modifications. In 1977 a test system 
was installed in the Stockholm region in order to verify that 
the relatively complicated signalling functioned reliably. 
Extensive tests were carried out with this system for a few 
years. 
  The specifications were adjusted a number of times, and not 
until 1978 was the contract signed for purchase of exchanges and 
base radio stations. 
  The NMT system was put into service in the four Nordic 
countries in 1981. In Sweden NMT achieved more or less national 
coverage as early as the end of 1983. The same applies to 
Denmark. In Finland and Norway only the southern parts of the 
countries had been covered by the end of 1983, but on the other 
hand these parts are the most populated. 
  All development prognoses for the number of subscribers were 
exceeded, and as early as 1983/84 capacity problems began to 
occur in the major cities, primarily Stockholm. As a means of 
increasing the capacity, the introduction of small cellular 
technology began, which makes it possible for each frequency to 
be utilized more efficiently. In Stockholm such a system was put 
into operation in 1985. It was only a temporary solution, 
however. Capacity problems occurred relatively soon again. 
Small cellular technology was a part of the system description 
at an early stage, however. 
  At the end of 1986 a new system was put into operation, 
which 
was based on the same technical principles but worked in the 900 
MHz band, which meant shorter range but more channels per 
frequency compared to the NMT 450 system. Just a few years later 
the rate of increase was higher in NMT 900 than in NMT 450. The 
area of coverage for NMT 900 was limited to the major cities and 
principal roads. The area of coverage has gradually increased 
and today the greater part of Sweden is covered. NMT 900 has not 
received the same breakthrough in the other Nordic countries, 
however. 
  Up to 1988 most of the mobile telephones sold were mounted 
in 
vehicles. After 1988 more and more non-vehicle-mounted terminals 
have been sold, so-called pocket telephones, or more commonly 
"yuppie teddy bears." The real expansion came with the arrival 
of the pocket telephones. In 1990 more than 130,000 telephones 
were sold in Sweden, half of which were pocket telephones. The 
pocket telephones can only be used with NMT 900. The price for 
them has dropped from about 25,000 kronor in 1988 to 
12,000-15,000 kronor today and are still dropping. 
  The development of the number of mobile telephones in Sweden 
is shown in Figure 1 [not included]. 
  It should also be mentioned in this connection that 
Kinnevik-owned Comvik has been operating a cellular mobile 
telephone network in the 450-MHz band since 1981. Today it has 
about 15,000 subscribers in its system, which is the number for 
which there is space in the frequency range Comvik has been 
allocated. 
  Today, the mobile telephone systems are also in the 
beginnings of digitization. Agreement has been reached in Europe 
on a common standard, GSM (Groupe System Mobile). GSM operates 
in the 900 MHz band. Large development sums have been spent on 
GSM projects in Europe. Test activity is under way today in most 
European countries. Development of digital systems is also under 
way in the United States and Japan, but not according to the GSM 
standard. 
  As for GSM, the Nordic countries are not likely to become 
the 
leading ones. Large amounts are being invested in countries such 
as Germany, Great Britain and France, where there is a lack of 
well-developed analog systems. In the Nordic countries there are 
well-functioning analog systems and demands for digital systems 
will not be made by the market, at least not within the next few 
years. 
  On the supplier side, Ericsson is today the leader in the 
market, with about 40 percent of the world's subscribers using 
systems delivered by Ericsson. Throughout the 1980's Ericsson 
succeeded in holding on to this market share although the 
development has been explosive. Since the mid-1980's the number 
of subscribers has more or less doubled each year. It is even 
more remarkable that in the United States Ericsson is bigger 
than Motorola, if one counts the number of subscribers coupled 
to the respective suppliers' systems. 
  The know-how in the radio field existed early on at Svenska 
Radio AB, which at that time was a subsidiary of LM Ericsson. 
  The NMT group's choice of LM Ericsson as a supplier of 
exchanges for the NMT system gave the company a few years' lead 
over its competitors and is likely to have been a contributing 
factor for Ericsson's position as world leader today. Some 
development of the radio modules for AXE also took place at the 
development corporation Ellemtel, jointly owned by Ericsson and 
the Telecommunications Agency. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  From the aspect of the future system, there was a customer 
willing to take risks, the Telecommunications Agency, which 
started a large project with a relatively poor foundation for 
the way the future market might develop. The agency's prognoses 
for the NMT system were not made until the early 1980's and 
indicated 50,000 subscribers after 10 years, which turned out to 
be a major prognosis failure. These prognoses were based on the 
increase, when it was as it largest, of the MTD system, and no 
in-depth analyses of market demands were made. 
  There were ideas about how it would function technically. It 
should be pointed out here that the expertise at the radio 
laboratory was the foundation for the technical principles. A 
well-developed technical specification was then worked out, in 
which several parties participated. 
  There was, further, at least one major supplier which 
dominated both the radio and telephone technology of the 
country, Ericsson. The cooperation between the 
Telecommunications Agency and Ericsson goes far back in time and 
has been good. 
  The extensive activity involving the specification and 
development of the systems during the 1970's then gave the 
Nordic countries advantages and the Nordic companies, above all, 
a lead in comparison with their competitors, and this is one of 
the reasons for Ericsson's successes in the field. 
  It turned out that there was clearly a need for mobile 
telephones in the country. The reasons for this are many, but 
the ones to be stressed are that the system was user-friendly 
and that it could largely be used the same way as ordinary 
telephones. In addition, access is increased with mobile 
telephone, which is also shown in that most mobile telephones 
are found among small and medium-sized enterprises. It may be 
mentioned that mechanics, repairmen, electricians, etc. are a 
major user group. Seen from an international perspective, this 
is likely to be quite unique. In other countries the mobile 
telephone has mostly, at least so far, been used at the 
"executive" level in companies and organizations. 
  The fact that the system is national and not local, as most 
of the systems in the United States, makes it possible further 
to increase access. There is no need to worry about where the 
subscriber is. 
  In the late 1980's the number of subscribers grew sharply, 
although the increase was higher in percent during the first 
years of the 1980's. Factors which might have affected the 
increase have been that the personal cost to the individual has 
been so low and to some extent could be regarded as a wage 
benefit. Owning a pocket telephone in the late 1980's may also 
have been regarded as a status symbol, in many cases. 
  The increase in the number of new subscribers dropped at the 
end of 1990 and 1991. The decrease has not been as sharp as 
other activity in the country. From 12,000-15,000 new 
subscribers a month at the end of 1989 and early 1990, a 
decrease has occurred to about 10,000 new subscribers each 
month. The reasons for this are partly the economy, partly that 
the market is beginning to be saturated. Telecommunications in 
general turn out to be less sensitive to economic fluctuations 
than other activities, which is also demonstrated by the mobile 
telephone development over the most recent year. 
  Finally, the price of services has been stable. Connection 
fees, subscriber charges and rates have dropped in real terms 
over the 10 years the systems have been in operation. The cost 
of terminals has also declined sharply, from about 25,000 kronor 
for an NMT 450 terminal in the early 1980's to about 5,000-8,000 
kronor today at current prices. As for pocket telephones, they 
have dropped from about 25,000 kronor in 1988 to 12,000-15,000 
kronor today at current prices. Although the cost sensitivity is 
relatively low, it is likely to have influenced the development 
in a positive manner. 
<H5>  Supplement 2: Public Influence on Technical Development </H5>
  Seven case studies, which exemplify various types of public 
means of control, and their influence on technical development. 
  Contents: 
  1. Introduction and summary 
  2. The adjustment of the German power industry to new 
regulations for SO[.sup]x[/]/NO[.sub]x[/] emissions 
  3. Bioenergy in Sweden 
  4. Swedish nuclear waste technology 
  5. The heat pump development in Sweden 
  6. Energy consulting at the regional development funds 
  7. Effective use of electric power in the United States 
  8. Adjustment by the pulp and paper industry to AOX rules 
for 
organochlorine compounds 
  9. Bibliography 
<H5>  1. Introduction and Summary </H5>
  The following represented foundation material for a 
discussion meeting at IVA on 11 February 1992 on mechanisms for 
successful, commercially operated, technical development in the 
energy sector, Energy for Future Generations. 
  The foundation material consists of seven case descriptions 
of mainly technical development projects, in which public 
influence in some form governed the direction and volume of the 
development. 
  The principal question which will be discussed is what 
opportunities the state, or public organs, have of influencing 
and facilitating commercial technical development. The main 
question can then be broken down into the following questions: 


    -  What technology-driving effect do various types of 
means of control have? 
  -  What impact on investment decisions do these means of control 
have? 
  -  Which parts of the innovation process should the state 
support? 
  -  What are the limitations and problems with government 
intervention? 

    One possible breakdown of public means of control which can 
be used for achieving specific goals is: 


    -  Legislation and regulation 
  -  Financing 
  -  Education and information 
  -  Taxes and fees 
  -  Government purchasing 
  -  Government-financed companies and government-financed R&amp;D 

    The usefulness and purpose of these means vary. Within the 
field of energy technology, in which the state has a major 
influence and investments are extensive, the processes are 
likely to be particularly large and several of the above means 
of control could be usable. 
  In the following, several of the means of control mentioned 
above are exemplified. Two of the cases refer to descriptions of 
developments in countries other than Sweden. 
  The following cases are described: 


    -  The adjustment of the German power industry to new 
regulations for SO[.sup]x[/]/NO[.sub]x[/]emissions 
  -  Bioenergy in Sweden 
  -  Swedish nuclear waste technology 
  -  The heat pump development in Sweden 
  -  Energy consulting by the regional development funds 
  -  Efficient use of electric power in the United States 
  -  The adjustment of the pulp and paper industry to AOX 
regulations for organochlorine compounds. 

    The case of the "German power industry" deals with 
tightening 
the legislation for SO[.sup]2[/] and NO[.sub]x[/] emission 
which have taken place during the 1980's. This resulted in the 
undertaking of a gigantic investment program, which has cost on 
the order of 75 billion kronor. Over the 1980's the 
SO[.sup]2[/] and NO[.sub]x[/] emissions have dropped by 80 
and 75 percent, respectively. 
  The "bioenergy" case exemplifies government steering of 
economic parameters. The rapid expansion of the bioenergy 
industry in the early 1980's was based on, among other things, 
calculations in which certain parts could be regarded as 
"political promises." These "political promises" could not be 
kept, and many calculations failed. 
  The "nuclear waste technology" case shows the linkage 
between 
the strict legislation in the waste area and the massive 
development effort undertaken in the late 1970's and early 
1980's. The powerful effort was of major importance for the 
continued development of waste treatment technology both in 
Sweden and abroad. 
  The "heat pump" case describes how government measures, 
primarily in the form of investment support and higher taxes on 
oil, strengthened the competitive ability of the heat pump, and 
a strong market growth occurred. When the price of oil then 
dropped sharply in 1985-86, the market nearly collapsed in some 
segments. 
  The "energy consulting" case exemplifies information as a 
means of control. The case also shows the difficulties of 
measuring the effects of contributions of this type. 
  The "efficient power use" case describes the efforts made by 
the U.S. power companies to reduce energy use and peak 
consumption and the results achieved. The costs to reduce energy 
consumption and peak use have been high, although in percent the 
cuts have been modest. It has often been possible to justify the 
reduction by using a "least cost planning" model, meaning how 
much the power saved would have cost if one were forced to 
invest in the corresponding amount of new power. 
  The "adjustment to AOX regulations" case demonstrates how 
the 
Swedish forest industry introduced known technology, although 
untested on a full scale, in order to achieve the government's 
strict environmental goals. By so doing it has also been 
possible to acquire market advantages quite rapidly. 
<H5>  2. The Adjustment of the German </H5>
[.sup]16[/] Power Industry 
to New Regulations for SO[.sup]x[/]/NO[.sub]x[/] Emissions 
  The Energy Situation 
  The western German gross production of electric power in 
1989 
amounted to 440 TWh, in which nuclear power produced 34 percent 
and hard coal and soft coal nearly 50 percent. Oil and natural 
gas account for another few percent of the power production. The 
total western German fossil-fuelled power capacity is about 
38,000 MW. 
  In the 1960's the share of oil in the production of electric 
power grew. After the first oil crisis in 1973-74, however, the 
proportion of oil decreased. In the 1970's nuclear power was 
also introduced, and today it produces a considerable part of 
the power. Natural gas also began to be used for electricity 
production during the 1970's; natural gas is mainly used for 
heating, however. Power production based on hard coal has also 
grown since the 1970's, which was chiefly due to the means of 
control utilized by the state. 
  The domestic hard coal is expensive to mine. One way of 
protecting the domestic hard coal industry has been for the 
power producers to receive cash compensation for their higher 
costs when using domestic hard coal. The cash is taken from 
special funds which have been established by adding a certain 
percentage to the cost of electricity, called "Kohlepfennig" 
[coal pfennig], which represents an average of eight percent of 
the price of power; the size of the surcharge varies somewhat 
between the various laender. 
  In 1980 the power producers[.sup]17[/] and the hard coal 
industry signed a 15-year business agreement which is known as 
the "Jahrhundertvertrag" [century agreement]. In practice, the 
result of the agreement has been that further expansion of all 
other types of power production has ceased at the expense of 
power production based on hard coal. In the latter part of the 
1980's, the installed capacity of the hard coal plants has been 
expanded, or is expected to expand in the next few years, by 
about 5,000 MW. 
  When the agreement was made, the annual increase in gross 
electric power consumption was 3-5 percent, while the increase 
in the late 1980's was about one percent a year and is expected 
to stay at an average of one percent a year until the year 2000. 
Today there is no room for either oil- or gas-fired power 
plants, the construction of which furthermore requires special 
permission in accordance with the law on electric power 
production. Nuclear power is not going to be added to, either. 
There is also some doubt about nuclear power. For example, the 
Social Democratic party congress (SPD) in 1986 decided to 
abolish nuclear power within 10 years if the party comes into 
power. 
  The importance of coal, in particular hard coal, for the 
energy system is important to stress. 
  The Entry of the Environmental Issues and the 
Environmental Legislation 
  The environmental debate got under way in earnest at the end 
of the 1970's. In a relatively short time it achieved a firm 
anchoring in the country. The Greens (die Gruenen) entered 
several of the laender parliaments as well as the Bundestag in 
1983. Increasingly more frequent and threatening reports about 
the increasing "forest death" were presented. The principal 
blame was initially laid on sulfur emissions and "acid rain." 
Somewhat later the nitrogen oxides (NO[.sup]x[/]) became the 
object of debate, which has caused automobile traffic to be 
criticized as well. What triggered the tightening and revisions 
of the federal laws that has taken place in the 1980's was 
mainly the debate about forest damage. In the early 1980's 
studies were undertaken which showed that up to 50 percent of 
the forest was damaged and about half of the damaged forest 
displayed serious damage. Although there was a lack of strict 
scientific proof in some situations, most experts agreed that 
the emissions did play a major role. 
  In western Germany all air quality issues are regulated by a 
framework law called the Bundes-Immissions-Schutzgesetz 
(BImSchG) of 1974. The framework law then includes a number of 
ordinances (Verordnungen) which have been continuously expanded, 
tightened and revised during the 1970's and 1980's. Furthermore, 
there are additional directives and recommendations at the 
laender level, which in many cases involve further tightening of 
the federal legislation. In North Rhine-Westphalia, for example, 
air quality matters are regulated in a considerably stricter 
manner than in other laender. The articles which regulate 
emissions into the air include hundreds of pages, and even 
experts believe that it is difficult to acquire complete 
understanding of the entire system. 
  The ordinance which has been of major importance for the 
development during the 1980's is GFAVO 
(Grossfeueranlagenverordnung) or 13. BImSchV, originally from 
1983, but further tightened after 1983. This ordinance regulates 
limits[.sup]18[/] for emissions of SO[.sup]2[/] and 
NO[.sup]x[/] from combustion in facilities with more than 50 
MW thermal output. 
  After July 1983 the standards for SO[.sup]2[/] emissions 
were set at 400 mg per m[.sup]3[/] dry stack gas volume at 5 
percent O[.sup]2[/] content for a coal-fired facility with 
300 MW thermal output. In addition, measures must have been 
undertaken for a stack gas desulfurization of at least 85 
percent. The standards for NO[.sup]x[/] emissions were set in 
July 1983 at 800 mg per m[.sup]3[/] for facilities in 
operation. In November 1983 the NO[.sup]x[/] levels were 
reduced to 400 mg per m[.sup]3[/] and in April 1984 to 200 mg 
per m[.sup]3[/] for all facilities. The reason for this sharp 
cutback was primarily that there were functioning techniques in 
Japan which could work at these levels. 
  Yet another ordinance which has been revised in the 1980's 
and has influenced the situation is TA Luft (Technische 
Anleitung zur Reinhaltung der Luft) or a supplement to 1. 
BImSchV, from 1986. It regulates emissions of NO[.sup]x[/] 
from combustion in plants with an output of between 1 and 50 MW. 
The standards are between 300 and 500 mg per m[.sup]3[/]. 
Ordinances also exist which regulate emissions from facilities 
up to 1 MW. 
  A gradual plan for meeting the limits according to GFAVO and 
its supplements was also established. The limits for 
SO[.sup]2[/] and NO[.sub]x[/] were to be met no later than 
1 July 1988. After possibilities of exemption, all power plants 
must meet the demands no later than 1 April 1993 or be closed 
down. 
  The environmental goals of the Umweltbundesamt (UBA), the 
German equivalent of the Nature Conservancy Board, were that 
between the years 1982 and 1993 the SO[.sup]2[/] emissions 
from power plants should be reduced by 75 percent, and 
NO[.sup]x[/] emissions should have dropped by 70 percent by 
the early 1990's. 
  Furthermore, western Germany was one of the members of the 
so-called "30-percent club," meaning the nations which signed a 
convention involving a cutback of SO[.sup]2[/] emissions by 
30 percent by 1993. The reference year was 1980. Western Germany 
went further than that, however, and promised a reduction of 60 
percent. 
  GFAVO regulates emission levels for a total of about 1,500 
furnaces (both thermal and electric power) and TA Luft regulates 
emission levels for a total of 50,000 furnaces (mainly heat). 
  The Technology Development of Gas Purification 
  In general may be said that publicly funded research and 
development in this field has been considerable. The organ which 
early on supported research and development of desulfurization 
was the UBA. Publicly funded pilot facilities for partial 
desulfurization had already been built in the late 1960's. 
  Investment-supporting measures have also been utilized. 
Since 
1975 it has been possible to write off "environmental 
investments" more advantageously than other investments. In the 
late 1970's investment support programs for modernizing old 
plants were also initiated (Altanlagensanierungsprogram). The 
program had a budget of 560 billion German marks [DM] from 
1979-87 and a large part of allocated funds were used for 
SO[.sup]2[/]purification. The burners were also further 
developed in the 1970's, and lower emission values could be 
achieved, primarily for NO[.sup]x[/], with modification of 
the burners. 
  In the following it is important to distinguish between the 
development of SO[.sup]2[/] purification and NO[.sub]x[/] 
purification, since their technological development has been 
different. 
<H5>  SO </H5>
[.sup]2[/] 
  The original techniques for SO[.sup]2[/] purification are 
both German and foreign, primarily U.S., but the techniques have 
been further developed in western Germany. Public funding was 
clearly of significance. 
  In the legislation the concept "Stand der Technik" is used. 
By that is meant that the technology available at each point in 
time is to be used. 
  It takes more than five years from receipt of an order by a 
supplier until the facility is in operation, approved and 
transferred. After that time, the "Stand der Technik" is at a 
different level. This has had the result, for example, that 
since the 1970's the power plant industry has required the 
suppliers of new or added facilities not to emit more than half 
the amount of SO[.sup]2[/] prescribed in the permit agreement. 
  The result of applying the "Stand der Technik" was that the 
reference facilities built in West Germany in the 1970's met the 
GFAVO's 1983 standards for SO[.sup]2[/] even when put into 
service. The technology for SO[.sup]2[/]was largely developed 
even when the GFAVO's regulations began to take effect. This is 
shown in Figure 1 [not included]. About 15 percent of the 
capacity of fossil-fuelled plants in fact had desulfurization 
devices as early as the end of 1983. 
  By the end of 1988 165 stack gas desulfurization facilities 
had been installed and put into operation at 72 different power 
plants. 
  Nearly 90 percent of the facilities are a type of wet 
scrubber with lime or limestone as absorbent and with gypsum as 
end product. About seven percent are of the dry type or 
spray-absorption type, which produce calcium sulfate, sulfite or 
other substances. The others, that is to say a very small 
proportion, operate with regenerative processes. 
  The fact that wet scrubbers dominate is because the 
technology is well developed, operation reliable and the degree 
of efficiency high. Absorbency is cheap, and the byproduct 
gypsum has many areas of application. At present about 3 million 
tons of gypsum a year are produced, which corresponds roughly to 
the annual consumption in western Germany. The gypsum is largely 
exported, however, primarily to Poland. The power companies and 
the gypsum industry cooperate regarding the gypsum production by 
the power plants and sales are normally regulated in contracts. 
  During the 1983-88 period, the emission level for generating 
power with respect to SO[.sup]2[/] declined by 80 percent to 
400,000 tons/year. 
<H5>  NO </H5>
[.sup]x[/] 
  As for techniques to purify NO[.sup]x[/], these were 
further developed from licensing agreements acquired from Japan 
in 1983, as a direct result of GFAVO. The first reference 
facilities were put into operation in 1985-86, their number 
being about 15. The technological development and verification 
took place mainly in 1985 and 1986. The technological 
development and the strong expansion (see Figure 2 [not 
included]) thus occurred mostly in parallel. Operational 
experience over longer time frames were lacking when the 
technology was introduced on a large scale. 
  After 1986 the expansion went rapidly, and at the turn of 
the 
year 1989/90 more than 20,000 MW were equipped with de- 
NO[.sup]x[/] equipment for stack gas cleaning. In 1991 the 
retrofitting program was concluded and today it encompasses 
33,000 MW[.sup]e[/] which translated to more than 130 
facilities at 60 power plants. The emission requirements for 
existing, larger facilities are 200 mg 
NO[.sup]x[/]/m[.sup]3[/] for coal-fired, 150 mg 
NO[.sup]x[/]/m[.sup]3[/] for oil-fired and 100 mg 
NO[.sup]x[/]/m[.sup]3[/] for gas-fired plants. 
  Selective catalytic reduction (SCR) with ammonia is the most 
common method. The equipment can be placed either directly after 
the furnace (so-called high-dust system) or after the equipment 
for stack gas desulfurization (tail-gas system). 
  During the period from 1985 to 1991 the emission level for 
NO[.sup]x[/] in power production dropped by 75 percent to 
250,000 tons/year. 
  Achieved Results and Costs 
  A common statement regarding West Germany's environmental 
investments in the 1980's was that no country has over such a 
short time accomplished such major environmental improvements. 
On the other hand, no country has invested so much in 
environmental improvement measures as West Germany. 
  Investments for SO[.sup]2[/] purification between the 
years 1983 and 1988 amounted to DM 14 billion at current prices 
and for NO[.sup]x[/] purification between 1985 and 1991 to DM 
7 billion at current prices. The total investments converted 
into Swedish currency, at an exchange rate of 3.6 kronor, are 75 
billion kronor. The cost for the desulfurization program 
totalled the equivalent of 1.3 million kronor per installed MW 
and the de-NO[.sup]x[/] program has cost the equivalent of 
0.8 million kronor per installed MW. 
  From 1983 to 1988, SO[.sup]2[/] emissions from power 
plants dropped by 80 percent and from 1985 to 1991 
NO[.sup]x[/] emissions fell 75 percent, which must be 
regarded as very remarkable cuts. 
  Since government investment contributions have been given to 
a relatively minor extent, the German power consumers have 
mostly had to pay for these environmental improvements by way of 
their electric bills. 
  According to a study conducted by the VDEW (Vereinigte 
Deutsche Elektrizitaets Werke) organization, the specific cost 


    -  of SO[.sup]2[/] purification is 1.3 Pf[ennigs]/kWh 
(4.7 ore/kWh), 
  -  of NO[.sup]x[/] purification 0.8 Pf/kWh (2.9 ore/kWh), 
  -  of dust cleaning 0.4 Pf/kWh (1.4 ore/kWh) and 
  -  of other cleaning 0.4 Pf/kWh (1.4 ore/kWh). 

    The total production cost, according to the example in 
Figure 
3 [not included] (550 MWe, 4,500 h/year) is 13 Pf/kWh (47 
ore/kWh). The total cost for purification, in the above example, 
is 2.9 Pf/kWh (10.4 ore/kWh), but in practice it varies between 
1.5 and 3.5 Pf/kWh (5.4 -12.6 ore/kWh). 
  Since up to 60 percent of the country's production of 
electric power is based on fossil fuels, the additional cost for 
power can be estimated at between 1 and 2 Pf/kWh (3/6-7.2 
ore/kWh). 
  The cost of electricity in western Germany was considerably 
higher than in Sweden even before the strict emission 
regulations were introduced. Today, the households pay 27 Pf/kWh 
(98 ore/kWh) for household electricity and 14 Pf/kWh (50 
ore/kWh) for industrial power, including value-added tax. 
However, the power-intensive industry has special, non-public, 
agreements with a long period of validity. The cost of electric 
power in such agreements is on the order of 10-11 Pf/kWh (35-40 
ore/kWh). (Compare with the price of household electricity in 
Stockholm, which in 1992 is not quite 60 ore/kWh, including 
value-added tax but exclusive of fixed surcharges.) 
  In Western Germany the additional cost for an improved 
environment approaches 10 percent of the cost of electric power 
for ordinary consumers. The "Kohlepfenning" is about eight 
percent of the price of electricity. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  From 1983 to 1991 the equivalent of 75 billion kronor were 
invested in desulfurization and de-NO[.sup]x[/] equipment. 
Over the same period the SO[.sup]2[/] emissions dropped by 80 
percent and NO[.sup]x[/] emissions by 75 percent. The results 
achieved exceeded even the goals established by the authorities. 
This gigantic investment program was controlled by tightening 
the legislation, principally the GFAVO ordinance, which took 
effect in 1983-84. 
  Even before GFAVO took effect, about 15 percent of the 
fossil-fuelled power production had modern desulfurization 
technology, however. The technological development of 
desulfurization technology occurred largely in the 1970's, 
partly with government funding. The technology was therefore up 
to date and there was also no lack of reference facilities. 
Then, when the desulfurization program was initiated on a large 
scale, already known technology was utilized. 
  The development of NO[.sup]x[/] purification looked 
different. NO[.sup]x[/] entered the environmental debate 
later and its introduction has been much more rapid. The first 
reference facilities were put into operation in 1985-86. Over 
this period the technology was further developed and verified. 
During the period 1988-89 NO[.sup]x[/] purification 
facilities corresponding to 14,000 MW[.sup]e[/] were 
installed. Japanese licensing agreements were used. The 
development of and investments in the technology have been quite 
parallel processes. In principle, the technology existed but was 
untested on a large scale. 
  The investments were mainly financed through higher 
electricity prices. Up to 10 percent of the price of electricity 
is related to the environment. The ordinary citizens have 
accepted this, partly because the environmental awareness in 
country grew during the 1980's, and partly because the prices 
for electricity, despite being high, nevertheless represent a 
small part of the total household costs. Electricity prices in 
Germany have further, seen from a historical perspective, always 
been higher than in the rest of the world. 
  Industry has not be hit as hard, perhaps. The 
electricity-intensive industry has special agreements valid for 
long periods and the electricity tariffs have probably not been 
influenced to any major extent by this. The large German 
mechanical engineering industry is also not particularly 
sensitive to the price level for electric power, since it only 
amounts to a few percent of the processing value. 
  It should also be added that the requirement by the 
authorities have been strict and that industry has had to adapt. 
  The public influence during the 1980's, in this case by way 
of legislation, did not bring the technology much further as 
regards desulfurization technology. The techniques were known 
and verified. The legislation forced the investments, however. 
  As for de-NO[.sup]x[/] techniques, there were Japanese 
licensing agreements which had been bought, to be sure, but 
verification of the technology on a large scale (30,000 
MW[.sup]e[/]) was certainly filled with risk. The legislation 
must be regarded as having accelerated the technology of de- 
NO[.sup]x[/] techniques. 
  This case shows a targeted steering which has turned out to 
be very successful. The goals that were established were 
achieved and even exceeded. 
  In some situations the legislation had the opposite effect, 
however, meaning it was an obstacle to new energy technology. 
The legislation, which implies that the "best possible 
technique" must be used, means that one is forced to install the 
new technology in several places. This could in some situations 
have inhibited the development. The German model has also to a 
major extent been to "attach" purification equipment, not to 
improve the combustion process. 
  But one should bear in mind the serious environmental 
situation in which West Germany found itself in the early 
1980's. The strong measures ultimately taken by the government 
were perhaps the only correct way to deal with, or at least 
improve, a serious environmental situation over a relatively 
short period. 
<H5>  3. Bioenergy in Sweden </H5>
  Background 
  In 1973 dramatic price increases and disturbances of the 
international oil trade occurred. The situation was felt in 
Sweden as well, because of the country's major dependence on oil 
and because rationing was undertaken. The first oil crisis was a 
fact. 
  The oil crisis became the starting point for an extensive 
energy research program which was begun in 1975. When the second 
oil crisis occurred, in 1979, the allocation of funds to the 
energy program was intensified. Financial subsidies of 
investments in energy technology aimed at rapidly reducing the 
dependence on oil were introduced. The Oil Replacement Fund, 
established in 1981, acquired a central role. 
  Part of the oil replacement program was the intention to 
convert from oil to biofuels[.sup]19[/]. 
  The oil replacement policy with special emphasis on 
biofuels: 
  In 1974 the Energy Program Committee (EPK) was of the 
opinion 
that biofuels would play a very limited role in the future. Its 
position was that wood and timber waste products are not an 
attractive fuel under normal conditions, since forest products 
have a far higher value as a raw material for fiber. Energy 
forest cultivation could be undertaken on a limited scale, 
however, so that the interests of the forest industry would not 
be threatened. The need for research was evaluated as minor and 
research in the field was given 3 million kronor annually over a 
three-year period. 
  In the first energy policy program of 1975, bioenergy is 
regarded as one alternative among many in the new energy sector. 
Here as well it was believed that bioenergy would have little 
significance. 
  After the nonsocialist government came to power in 1976, the 
importance of bioenergy was clearly marked. Bioenergy was given 
greater importance in the 1977/78 energy draft bill, and the 
funds allocated for research were more than doubled. Then Energy 
Minister Olof Johansson said at the time: "Biomass is, in my 
opinion, one of the most interesting alternatives. Against that 
background, I believe that considerable research and development 
efforts involving energy extraction from biomass are justified. 
The goal of these efforts should be to develop foundations for 
evaluating the opportunities to increase the proportion of 
biomass in the Swedish energy system, and for supporting the 
development of such new technology as is necessary in order to 
utilize the energy content of biomass." It was not only the 
replacement of oil which was the reason for this major interest 
in biofuels. It was also important for the Center Party to find 
credible alternatives to nuclear power. 
  In the 1978/79 energy bill, submitted by the Liberal 
minority 
government, but generally based on the nonsocialist three-party 
government's foundation materials, new guidelines for the energy 
policy are presented. It says here: "Forest waste and hardwood 
qualities which are not needed for the forest industry are a 
domestic and renewable source of energy, which should be 
seriously taken into account when planning the future energy 
supply. It should be possible to introduce the technology on a 
large scale even during the 1980s." 
  New guidelines for energy policy were presented in the 
1980/81 energy bill. There was still major uncertainty about the 
bioenergy field, but the goals/prognoses had been adjusted 
upward compared to earlier prognoses and corresponded to 25-30 
TWh per year for forest fuels, exclusive of forest energy use of 
lyes, bark, etc. Additional increases were expected after 1990, 
when the energy forest program would begin to take effect. A 
large number of efforts were aimed at the development of methods 
and technology for the production and use of biofuels. The 
energy policy did not take just oil replacement into account, 
however. The decision to abolish nuclear power by 2010 was also 
included. 
  One of the preconditions for the 1980/81 energy policy 
decision was the assumption that oil prices would continue to 
climb in real terms by two percent a year for all of the 1980's. 
This could be perceived as a prognosis for the most likely 
development of the oil price, which in turn generates a certain 
volume for the oil replacement. It could also be seen as a 
necessary price development for the oil replacement to achieve 
the planned volume. The assumption of increasing oil prices in 
real terms had the result that comparative calculations for 
various fuels favored the latter. 
  An additional measure which reinforced the introduction of 
biofuels was the solid fuel law, which meant that facilities 
that burned the equivalent of 5,000 m[.sup]3[/] of thick fuel 
oil annually, must be designed so that without major remodeling 
work or supplementation they can burn domestic solid fuel (does 
not apply to areas where distribution of natural gas was 
planned, however). 
  Subsidies for investments in oil-replacement technology were 
provided through the Oil Replacement Fund. Subsidies could also 
be given for establishing marketing organizations for domestic 
fuels. The fund was financed by a surcharge on oil and had about 
600 million kronor a year available. Between 1981 and 1984 the 
fund in various forms subsidized oil replacement at a cost of 
about 1.7 billion kronor. 
  The financial need for expansion of solid-fuel-fired plants 
was also met by the so-called district heating loans. An 
expansion of the district heating grid was expected to take 
place at the rate of 1,000 MW a year throughout the 1980's. 
  Projects Within the Bioenergy Field 
  During the period from 1974 to 1977 the "Whole Tree 
Utilization" project was carried out. Its purpose was to develop 
methods for using weak trees, waste from cutting and stumps. The 
focus was both on greater utilization of forest raw material and 
opportunities to use the forest raw materials in energy 
production. A certain rivalry thus existed between the forest 
industry on the one hand, and those who wanted to use the forest 
as raw material for energy on the other. The contribution from 
research during this period was considerable with regard to 
forest maintenance and cutting, but more limited with regard to 
refining fuel. The project had a budget of about 20 million 
kronor, half of which was government funding and half from the 
forest industry. 
  When the second oil crisis occurred in 1979, the price 
relationship changed rapidly in favor of domestic fuels, not 
just by calculation but also in real terms. There was also no 
conflict with the forest industry concerning raw material, 
partly due to the fact that it was mostly forest waste that was 
to be utilized, and partly because the forest industry had been 
hit by a slump. That the government was more interested in 
establishing a market, among other things, therefore came to be 
an accelerating factor. 
  The view of biofuels, particularly forest fuels, as an 
economically reasonable alternative and supplement became more 
favorable and the use of biofuels for heating purposes increased 
rapidly. However, no commercial link had had time to develop, 
and the use of forest fuels outside the forest industry was thus 
limited up to this period. 
  When the appropriations for bioenergy increased after the 
nonsocialist three-party government came to power, a base of 
knowledge had accumulated with the "Whole Tree Utilization" 
project. Further, resources were available for research and 
study. The appropriations received for the period 1978/79 - 
1980/81 were the equivalent for forest fuels (exclusive of 
energy forest) of about 75 million kronor[.sup]20[/]. A 
number of projects were initiated over the period. They were 
often of a production and development nature. A relatively large 
part of the government support was used to develop organizations 
for production, distribution and commerce with biofuels. 
  In 1976 certain research efforts for an energy forest were 
also initiated. The result of the early efforts indicated a 
considerable cultivation potential for energy forest. In 1978 a 
program was formulated with the goal of having developed 
sufficient knowledge by 1985 to evaluate the production 
capability, economics and possibilities of introduction. The 
costs amounted to 120 million kronor at current prices up to 
1985. Evaluations available in 1985 indicated that the potential 
surface area for energy forest cultivation totals not quite 1 
million hectares. Cultivation tests showed that a production of 
about 15 tons of dry substance per hectare and year would be 
possible in southern Sweden, which would be the equivalent of 
six tons of oil per hectare and year. Since 1985, when the oil 
prices fell, no major efforts have been made in the field of 
energy forest, and commercial introduction has not yet taken 
place. Today there are about 700 hectares of energy forest in 
the country which are still at the experimental stage. 
  In the period 1981/82 to 1983/84, the forest fuel area 
(exclusive of energy forest) was given 145 million kronor, 40 
million kronor of which were for large-scale experiments and 
another 40 million kronor for combustion technology, which also 
included burning other solid fuels (peat, waste, etc.). The 
objective of this program was to eliminate the obstacles which 
existed for the introduction of forest fuels on a large scale. 
What was seen was a beginning "commercialization" of biofuels. 
  The goal of the oil replacement program which was 
established 
in the early 1980s was for coal, domestic fuels and conversion 
to electricity to be responsible for replacing about 9 MToe [not 
further identified] in 1990. As early as 1985 the oil 
replacement would amount to 3.5 Mtoe. 
  During the period 1981-84 the Oil Replacement Fund granted 
investment support, in the form of subsidies for various types 
of loans, for combustion facilities for solid fuel and fuel 
production and refining of biofuels, of approximately 400 
million kronor. The total investment costs in these projects 
were about 1.2 billion kronor. The number of projects amounted 
to nearly 100, of which about half involved "prototype and 
demonstration facilities." As early as the 1970's, however, 
investment funding was provided for biofuel facilities. The 
activity was financed by SIND [State Industry Administration]. 
It merged with the Oil Replacement Fund in 1981. 
  During this period a number of companies and projects were 
established. Some examples are pellets production in Mora, Nydo, 
originally owned by Nynas (later by the Swedish Forest Service) 
and whose purpose was to establish a commercial link for 
biofuels, and Ebenol in Vastergotland, which produced pulverized 
wood. The forest industry was also involved in projects. SCA 
built a forest fuel terminal in Hissmofors and Sodra Skogsagarna 
built one in Vaxjo. During that period furnaces were also 
constructed which could easily be converted to various fuels. In 
1983 about 60 major forest-fuel-fired group centers or 
facilities for district heat production were in existence. About 
15 of them utilized refined forest fuels, such as pulverized 
wood, pellets or briquettes. 
  During that period the Swedish Biofuel Association (SVEBIO) 
was also founded, which has exercised pressure to promote the 
development of the bioenergy field. 
  When the oil price dropped sharply in 1985, despite an 
increase in taxes and surcharges on oil, the previously made 
calculations were complete failures. Many of the "new" companies 
did not have established markets and were not sufficiently 
strong financially to cope with the new situation. What at one 
moment appeared to be foresighted and innovative, appeared to be 
the most expensive alternative the next. 
  The industry's development has definitely been affected by 
the energy policy, not merely by the oil price prognoses but 
also by competition from other forms of energy which were 
government-supported. Electric conversion is one of them and 
other solid fuels, primarily coal, is another. Yet another is 
large heat pumps. 
  One more aspect, which in some cases may have been 
inhibiting 
for the biofuel development, but which should not be unduly 
stressed, is the wood fiber law from the early 1970's. According 
to it, a large combustion plant for wood fuels must be specially 
examined before receiving permission for establishment. The wood 
fiber law ceases to apply in 1993, however. 
  It is interesting to note that the bioenergy industry has 
recovered after the oil price drop and has even grown for heat 
production in municipal thermal power plants. The reason for 
this is that the solid fuel furnaces which were installed in 
recent years have mostly been used for biofuels or were 
converted from other solid fuels to biofuels. The government's 
investment support for the facilities has decreased since 1985, 
however. 
  Biofuels are likely to be the object of debate in the future 
as well, however. Today, a government "biostudy" is under way, 
whose task is to see how the application of biofuels can be 
increased and their competitive ability strengthened without 
conflicting with the forest industry. The study is to be 
completed on 1 July 1991. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  The Swedish energy programs from 1975 to 1985 must be 
regarded as integrated. Bioenergy was only one of several "new" 
sources of energy under consideration. It appeared suitable from 
a political point of view, however, since it was both domestic 
and renewable. 
  When the oil price increased sharply in 1979 and 1980, the 
oil replacement program became the dominant one. The Oil 
Replacement Fund, which began its activity in 1981 facilitated 
the financing of introducing solid fuels, among them biofuels, 
and acquired a central role in biofuel use. 
  At the same time as biofuels became interesting primarily 
from the aspect of replacing oil, the forest industry met with 
worse economic conditions. This had the result that the forest 
industry was more able to accept the use of forest raw materials 
as fuel. In addition, the material removed, at least to begin 
with, involved mainly forest waste, shavings, etc. At the end of 
the 1980's a conflict between the forest industry and the 
biofuel industry once again developed regarding the raw 
material. It should be clear, however, that the material removed 
from the forest which is to be "burned up" is relatively 
limited. The annual growth of the Swedish forest is much greater 
than the annually removed substance, and in the past 20 years 
the biofuel industry has in fact not competed with the forest 
industry for the raw material. 
  A very important component in oil replacement was the 
government's prognoses for the future development of oil prices. 
The assumption was that the oil prices would grow by two percent 
a year in real terms for all of the 1980's. These prognoses were 
produced and, accordingly, interpreted, as political promises. 
The calculations made were based on these "political promises," 
which said that converting from oil to solid fuels, among them 
biofuels, would be profitable within a period of 5-6 years, with 
expectations for a commercial link for biofuels when they were 
established. 
  When the oil price fell sharply in 1985, despite an increase 
in taxes and surcharges on oil, the previously made calculations 
collapsed completely. The price sensitivity of the fuels was too 
great. 
  This case shows that political steering of economic 
parameters can have tremendous consequences if the "free market" 
goes in the direction opposite to the political-economic 
steering. 
  Other aspects which have made introduction of biofuels more 
difficult have been the competition from other forms of energy 
which were also subsidized. For large facilities conversion to 
coal has been an alternative. Another competitor was electric 
conversion, particularly of electricity that could be switched 
off. In absolute numbers, conversion to electricity that could 
be switched off was relatively moderate, but it was concentrated 
to the size of facilities where biofuels are common. 
  The government's efforts in this field, including subsidies 
and financial support for facilities, have totalled 875 million 
kronor at current prices for the period 1975-90, about 700 
million kronor of which was for the period 1975-85. Whether 
these sums are justified or not cannot be unequivocally 
answered. It is likely that a development of know-how took place 
in the field of forest research and in the field of combustion, 
which is worth something. On the other hand, the subsidies for 
"prototype and demonstration facilities" were often based on 
calculations of higher oil prices in real terms and a 
well-functioning market and would probably not have been built 
if the "calculations" had looked different. 
  It is interesting to note that the use of biofuels for heat 
production in municipal thermal power plants grew in the late 
1980's, despite the industry losing strength in the mid-1980's. 
Several factors may explain this. The main reason is, however, 
that many thermal plants with combination furnaces believe it 
makes good economic sense to burn biofuels. This applies 
particularly where there is plenty of forest raw material. 
Indirectly, it is due to the government's means of control, in 
which biofuels receive favorable tax treatment compared with 
fossil fuels. 
  One fact which is likely to be of significance in the future 
is that there is a large surplus of forest and this surplus is 
growing from year to year. The differences between annual growth 
and the annual amount removed is on the order of 30 million 
m[.sup]3[/]. "Burning" some of the surplus ought to be 
correct from a national economic point of view. 
Swedish Nuclear Waste Technology 
  Background 
  The role of nuclear power in the Swedish energy system was a 
very big political issue during the 1970's and represented one 
of the big controversial issues in the 1976 election movement. 
  In particular the nuclear waste issue was discussed, and not 
only in Sweden but in most of the Western nations where nuclear 
power programs were under way. The strict legislation which was 
enacted in the late 1970's was in many respects a reflection of 
the social debate and the political debate conducted regarding 
nuclear waste. 
  Legislation Involving Waste Issues 
  The nonsocialist three-party government, which was formed 
after the 1976 election and dissolved in 1978 due to 
disagreement over the nuclear power issue, in 1977 submitted 
proposals for special permission to add nuclear fuel to a 
nuclear reactor. In April 1977 the Riksdag adopted this law, the 
so-called Law of Conditions [Nuclear Power Plant Law]. The law 
imposes demands for special permission from the government for 
adding nuclear fuel to a reactor for the first time so that 
nuclear fission can take place. Permission is only granted if 
the reactor's owner has presented an agreement which in a safe 
manner meets the requirement for reprocessing spent nuclear fuel 
and, further, has shown each and every way to permanently store 
both reprocessed and non-reprocessed nuclear fuel in complete 
safety. In connection with the origination of the law of 
conditions, the Swedish nuclear power companies organized the 
so-called KBS (nuclear fuel safety) project, with the task of 
studying and reporting on how to meet the requirements of the 
law. 
  In 1981 the so-called Financing Law came into being, which 
meant that the sharing of responsibility between the nuclear 
power companies and the authorities was fixed as regarded 
planning and implementation and financing of the measures 
required for the safe handling of radioactive waste. The nuclear 
power companies are required to submit plans annually for how 
they intend to implement the required measures. 
  In the Nuclear Technology Law from 1984 the owners of the 
Swedish nuclear power plants are obligated to establish a joint, 
versatile program for the research and development activity and 
other measures which are needed to deal with nuclear waste in a 
safe manner, including the future measures to abolish nuclear 
power. The nuclear power companies pay an annual fee based on 
the electric power delivered. 
  The size of this amount is 1.8-2.0 ore per kWh of produced 
nuclear power, which is the equivalent of 10 percent of 
production costs. A total of more than 15 billion kronor have 
been paid into this fund so far. The balance is today 7 billion 
kronor. These funds are administered by the government, in 
addition to a minor portion intended for waste with low and 
medium radioactivity, which is paid by the nuclear power 
companies. The funds receive additional monies, amounting to 
about 1.5 billion kronor a year. The rate of growth in the funds 
is high. 
  Program for Handling and Storing the Nuclear Waste 
  Research on the handling and storage of nuclear waste began 
in Sweden in 1975, in connection with the establishment of the 
Program Council for Radioactive Waste (Prav). 
  The research was intensified in connection with the law of 
conditions. The KBS project was started by the nuclear power 
companies. The project work was administratively tied to Svensk 
Karnbranslehantering AB (SKB), a company owned by Forsmarks 
Kraftgrupp, Oskarshamns Kraftgrupp, Sydsvenska Varmekraft (owned 
by Sydkraft) and Vattenfall. The KBS project developed two 
permanent storage methods, KBS-1 for vitrified, highly 
radioactive waste from reprocessing (1977) and KBS-2 for 
permanent storage of non-reprocessed nuclear fuel (1978). Both 
of these were presented in the form of reports. 
  The KBS-1 report formed the foundation for applications for 
permits to fuel the Ringhals 3 and 4 reactors and Forsmark 1 and 
2. The government granted permission for fueling in 1979 and 
1980, respectively. The KBS-2 report has not been used in any 
application for permit to fuel. 
  The high cost of reprocessing in combination with low 
uranium 
prices reduced the motive for reprocessing spent nuclear fuel in 
both the short and the medium term. For countries such as 
Sweden, with relatively limited nuclear power programs, an 
"open" nuclear fuel cycle with direct permanent storage, without 
previous reprocessing, therefore seemed the best alternative 
from an economic aspect. 
  In 1983 SKB presented a new report on permanent storage of 
spent nuclear fuel. The report was based on the same method as 
was described in KBS-2, but the new report, KBS-3, is based on 
broader and deeper knowledge bases. 
  The KBS-3 report was the basis for the fuel permissions for 
the Forsmark 3 and Oskarshamn 3 reactors. The government granted 
such permissions according to the new nuclear technology law of 
June 1984. The permission was also founded on a research program 
worked out by SKB in February 1984. 
  The KBS-3 report describes how a system for safe, permanent 
dealing with Swedish nuclear fuel can be designed based on the 
level of knowledge in 1982/83. The report deals with all 
handling, transportation, storage and treatment which is 
necessary for creating safe permanent storage of spent nuclear 
fuel. The government accepted the report after extensive 
opinions had been sought in Sweden and internationally in 1984, 
which meant that it believed the accounting met the safety 
requirements of the nuclear technology law. Since then, SKB has 
conducted broad research on conceivable questions tied to 
geological storage in Sweden. No decision has been made as yet 
about where and precisely how permanent storage of spent nuclear 
fuel is to take place. SKB's planning presumes that the required 
material for making the decision about the most suitable method 
and sites will be available in 1993. The necessary studies are 
calculated to take 2-3 years and will be followed by detailed 
studies up to the turn of the century. After that, the 
suitability of the final site will be confirmed. 
  An important element of this work is the studies and 
analyses 
which have been done since 1986 at a research station built into 
the mountain in the vicinity of the Oskarshamn plant on the 
Simpevarp peninsula, for the purpose of demonstrating 
technology, of studying mountains and describing in calculations 
the various protective functions. 
  The Swedish system is based on intermediate storage of the 
spent fuel for 30-40 years. The advantage of this is that its 
temperature and radioactivity decrease considerably. Today, this 
is done at an intermediate storage facility for spent fuel in 
Oskarshamn, CLAB (Central Storage for Spent Fuel). CLAB consists 
of a protected subterranean site excavated into the mountain, in 
which the spent fuel is handled and stored in water-filled 
basins. The facility has been in operation since 1985 and more 
than 1,500 tons of fuel are stored there today. CLAB has cost 
1.7 billion kronor at today's prices. 
  Operating waste from the nuclear power plants is even today 
permanently stored in a facility for low and medium radioactive 
waste at Forsmark, SFR (Permanent Storage of Radioactive Waste). 
SFR was inaugurated in 1988 and was built under the sea about 60 
meters below the bottom of the sea. The facility consists of a 
number of rock caverns shaped to fit various types of waste. SFR 
has cost 750 million kronor at today's prices. 
  The costs of building CLAB were taken from the money in the 
funds, while SFR has mainly been paid for by the nuclear power 
companies. 
  SKB has developed, planned and built the facilities and 
today 
has the main responsibility for operating them, which is carried 
out under contract by OKG for CLAB and by Vattenfall at Forsmark 
for SFR. 
  SKB is also in charge of the research and development 
activity on permanent storage of the spent fuel. 
  The Nuclear Technology Law obligates the nuclear power 
companies to establish a joint, versatile program for research 
and development involving nuclear waste. SKB has worked out the 
programs which are submitted to the Government Nuclear Fuel 
Board (SKN) and the government every third year beginning in 
1986. 
  SKN originated from PRAV, which was abolished in connection 
with adoption of the financing law in 1981. Further, SKN is the 
authority which is charged with overseeing and monitoring SKB's 
activity in the nuclear waste field. SKB's, and thus the nuclear 
power companies', R&amp;D in the nuclear waste field annually 
amounts to more than 150 million kronor. 
  Today's R&amp;D activity in the waste sector is partly 
aimed at a 
final supplementation of the data base for evaluation of 
long-range safety before choosing the protective system and 
site, partly at a practical reevaluation of the methods for 
detailed studies of the chosen site under realistic conditions. 
The development of methods and access to data for evaluating the 
long-range safety of deep geological storage and data access has 
been brought to a level which enables the start of a 
site-finding process during the 1990's. 
  The Nordic authorities for nuclear safety and radiation 
protection are presently working on developing joint 
recommendations for the design of specific acceptance criteria 
for deep storage for permanent storage of long-lived waste. 
  Internationally, Sweden is well placed as regards handling 
nuclear waste. The completed activities, including projection 
and construction of CLAB, SFR and the transportation system, 
have totalled 8 billion kronor at today's prices since the 
mid-1970's. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  The nuclear waste issue became a major political 
controversial issue during the 1970's. Seen from this 
perspective, the creation of the Law of Conditions was logical. 
  The Law of Conditions, with its demands for absolute safety, 
led to a concentration on redundantly safe systems. From a 
technical and economic aspect it may be discussed whether such a 
development was justified. On the other hand, it was necessary 
to invest in techniques and systems which one believed had the 
confidence of the general public and the politicians. The 
efforts in the area of waste in the late-1970's and 1980's were 
made in this spirit, although there were occasionally loud 
protests among the technicians. 
  Compared to the values involved in the political 
considerations, the costs of investing in extremely high safety 
in the nuclear waste sector have nevertheless been reasonable. 
  Internationally, Sweden has come a long way as regards the 
technology of nuclear waste handling. This is a result, among 
others, of the nation's rigorous legislation, which led to 
intensive research and technology development in the field of 
nuclear waste from 1977 and on, and well-functioning cooperation 
and express willingness to solve problems among the nuclear 
power companies responsible. 
  In the general debate it is often said that the "highest 
possible safety" must be ensured. Strict application of such an 
objective could result in the protective systems never being 
built, since each solution presented can always be made even 
safer. In the nuclear technology law the government has never 
quantified any risk level that could be regarded as acceptable, 
but indicates that storage should take place in a way that is 
acceptable with regard to safety and radiation protection. 
  At present not quite two ore per nuclear kWh produced is set 
aside, which corresponds with a total of about 1.5 billion 
kronor a year. Of these funds, about 1 billion are kept in the 
fund, and the money in the funds will increase rapidly in future 
years. The money is earmarked for its purpose in a detailed 
manner by the financing law. 
  Thus, it is possible to state that technical solutions for 
the permanent storage of nuclear waste have been presented, that 
the establishment of the data material for the choice of site 
and system is almost complete, and that methods for evaluating 
the long-range safety of buried storage are available. It can 
also be stated that society's acceptance requirements are in the 
process of being formalized, so that a process for choice of 
system and site selection can be started during the 1990's. The 
money for this has been set aside in a fund and is added to 
annually in order to pay for the future permanent expansion of 
the necessary facilities. 
<H5>  5. The Development of Heat Pumps in Sweden </H5>
  Introduction and Summary 
  The heat pump had a breakthrough in the late 1970's and 
since 
then has enjoyed rapid spreading across a broad application 
field [.sup]21[/]. The distribution was particularly fast in 
the early 1980's, when certain sub-markets, such as heat pumps 
in large district heating systems, were developed from 
introduction to saturation in just a few years. The majority of 
market segments underwent a very sharp decline in 1985-86. A 
certain recovery, above all in the absolutely lowest efficiency 
segment, has taken place over the last 3-4 years. 
  Heat pumps can be divided into three categories: 


    -  Small heat pumps, mainly for heating homes, 
  -  medium-sized heat pumps for multifamily dwellings, and 
  -  large heat pumps in district heating systems or industry. 

    The largest number of heat pumps is of the small 
type. Large heat pumps are responsible for the completely 
dominating part of the energy production and energy 
saving. 
  The development of various partial markets has differed. 
Small home heat pumps consist of two partial markets, the 
conversion market and the new construction market. The 
conversion market took off in 1979, was at its largest in 1984 
and then disappeared almost completely. The new construction 
market took off in 1980 and since then has had a rather stable 
position of about 50 percent of new production, with a certain 
slump during the period 1986-88. Medium-sized heat pumps never 
achieved the same market penetration, but the market development 
has been relatively stable, with the exception of a slump in the 
mid-1980s. The market for large heat pumps emerged and developed 
strongly during the period 1982-85. Sales peaked in 1986, after 
which the market was in principle saturated, and few large heat 
pumps have been sold since then. 
  Subsidies for R&amp;D on heat pumps has been provided, 
partly by 
way of the energy research program since 1978, and partly 
through Vattenfall's Solar Project during the period 1979-1987. 
The government's and Vattenfall's efforts, respectively, have 
been about equally large (300-400 million kronor each at the 
1989 monetary value). Furthermore, up to and including 1984 
there was a direct government market introduction and investment 
subsidy of a total of 1,202 billion kronor[.sup]22[/] (at 
today's monetary value). The heat pump has also been indirectly 
favored since for new construction it was included in the basic 
loan amount for government loans.[.sup]23[/] 
  The predominant part of the above funding went to small heat 
pumps. Medium-sized heat pumps were mostly covered by the same 
subsidy regulations as small ones, but due to the low market 
penetration the payments were relatively small. Large heat pumps 
did not, with a few exceptions, receive government subsidies. 
  The R&amp;D support which has been given, by the government 
and 
by Vattenfall, has been of limited importance for the 
development of technology. On the other hand, the subsidies were 
important in order to develop know-how, evaluation materials and 
interest in heat pump technology. Vattenfall's solar project, in 
particular, was held up by many experts as important in this 
respect. 
  The investment support is likely to have been of major 
importance for the rapid spread of fluid/water heat pumps in the 
conversion market until 1984. The elimination of the support in 
1985 was also, together with the drop in oil prices and the 
beginnings of market saturation, of crucial importance for the 
very fast decline of the market. 
  In the new construction market for small heat pumps the 
government loans have been of major significance for the 
penetration. This has, in combination with the housing 
manufacturers' desire to reduce the number of housing types, 
been a decisive factor in the equipment of all newly constructed 
small homes with air-to-air heat pumps. 
  For medium-sized heat pumps, the government contributions 
have been of considerably less importance. The information and 
education programs which were developed are likely to have had 
some importance for the quality of installations and maintenance. 
  The breakthrough of large heat pumps was essentially 
market-driven, and government involvement had a marginal 
importance on the development. 
  The Development of the Market 
  Heat pumps can be divided into three size classes, and the 
market development is described in Figures 1-3 [not included]. 
  Since the market development has differed between various 
segments, the four principal segments are discussed here: small 
heat pumps--conversion as well as new production, medium-sized 
heat pumps and large heat pumps. 
<H5>  The Market for Small Heat Pumps: </H5>
  The market for small heat pumps is divided into two segments 
with completely different opportunities, the conversion market 
and the new production market. 
  Up to 1985 the conversion market was most important. Typical 
installations were ground heating facilities for older houses 
with water-based heating systems and relatively large heating 
requirements. After 1985 installations of air-to-air heat pumps 
of up to 3 kW in newly constructed small homes have dominated 
completely until 1989. Thus, about half of all small homes are 
today built with air-to-air heat pumps as standard equipment. In 
individual cases somewhat larger heat pumps of the stone or 
surface earth heating type are also installed. Figure 4 shows 
the number of heat pump installations from 1983 to 1990. 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Figure 4. The Number of Heat Pumps Installed in Sweden                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year                     |Outside/air-to-air       |Fluid/water              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1983                     |10,189                   |5,200                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1984                     |18,249                   |7,803                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1985                     |13,127                   |5,818                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1986                     |7,756                    |2,116                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1988                     |9,554                    |974                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990                     |23,428[.sup]24[/]      |2,279                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: Swedish Heat Pump Association                                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The manufacture and sale of home heat pumps in Sweden was 
established at the end of the 1970's. In the conversion segment 
sales grew slowly in the last years of the 1970's, and in 1979 a 
drastic increase occurred in connection with the second oil 
crisis. The boom continued, stimulated by various types of 
government loans and subsidies, up to and including 1984. 
  The market upturn in some cases led to problems which gave 
the heat pump a bad reputation. Technically, the pumps were 
usually of good quality. The mistakes which were made involved 
chiefly the connection to and cooperation with existing systems 
in small and medium-sized facilities, and with respect to 
maintenance and operation of these installations. 
  The "gold fever" and the subsequent free fall led to may 
players emerging and then disappearing. The companies which were 
the first manufacturers of home heat pumps in Sweden were 
development-oriented large companies in the heating, ventilation 
and sanitary industry [VVS]. Later, businesses oriented toward 
electrical equipment and cooling also got involved in heat 
pumps. They were more intent on assembly and sales. When the 
sales were at their peak and profitability high, there were also 
a number of businesses, such as auto dealers, which did not have 
a past in a related industry. According to estimates by the 
Swedish Heat Pump Association, the industry employed 3,000 
persons in 1983. A year later more than 5,000 persons were 
employed, while at the end of 1985 employment was down to 1,900 
persons. 
  In the new construction market sales took off a year later 
with the 1980 building standard which provided financial 
advantages for energy-saving construction. The market upturn as 
well as the slump in the mid-1980's was less strong. The same 
problems also did not occur with the installations as in the 
conversion segment. This is probably due in part to the easier 
installation, in part to the more professional buyer category. 
<H5>  Medium-Sized Heat Pumps </H5>
  The potential for medium-sized heat pumps in multifamily 
dwellings and premises is larger, in terms of output, than the 
market for small heat pumps; there is the potential for between 
5,000 and 10,000 installations alone outside the district 
heating regions. On the whole, the development within the 
segment has been considerably slower and more stable than in the 
home segment, and neither a crucial breakthrough nor a drastic 
decline have occurred.[.sup]25[/] 
  The customer category in this segment is, unlike the home 
segment, professional building managers. They have had a more 
cautious attitude toward the heat pump. The installation costs 
were regarded as high in comparison with normal building 
maintenance. The economic competitiveness of the heat pumps 
compared with the alternatives was not convincing; there was not 
enough know-how to maintain the heat pumps, and less serious 
suppliers in the mid-1980's gave the heat pump a bad reputation 
among building managers. Also, a direct ban on heat pumps exists 
in some district heating areas. 
  There was no overestablishment on the manufacturing side 
either, such as the one for small heat pumps. One important 
reason for many manufacturers avoiding this segment of the 
market could be that it is split, meaning that a large number of 
sizes are involved, from series-manufactured facilities to 
larger custom-built ones. 
  The future market potential in this segment is still large 
and the development is nowadays, when the technology has 
"matured," likely to rest on the future development of oil 
prices. 
<H5>  Large Heat Pumps </H5>
  The large heat pumps are an example of a very rapid and 
effective introduction and establishment of a technology. Today, 
about 100 large heat pumps have been installed. The majority of 
these were built in the years 1982-1986. After 1986 only a few 
facilities were built. This is in part due to the sharply 
decreasing oil price, but is primarily because the majority of 
potential heat sources have already been exploited. These heat 
pumps provide an important addition to the country's energy 
supply and are responsible for approximately 15 percent of the 
district heat in the country. 
  The rapid introduction of large heat pumps is a result of 
the 
high price of oil, the relatively low price of electricity, well 
developed district heating, good access to lake water and 
purified waste water, and, above all, a highly industrial 
network on the side of both the seller and the buyer. 
Development, manufacture and purchasing have been demanded and 
undertaken by players with a great deal of expertise. 
  There have been few equipment manufacturers. The development 
of the technology took place in cooperation between Sulzer in 
Switzerland and ASEA STAL. The turbo compressor was developed by 
Sulzer, while Stal arranged the greater part of the remaining 
components. In all, ASEA STAL[.sup]26[/] was responsible for 
about 75 percent of the market. From the beginning the 
manufacturers had the know-how to deliver turnkey technology 
with operating guarantees, which is why no significant 
difficulties occurred with the installations, such as those for 
small and medium-sized facilities. 
  On the technology buyer side were municipalities, which 
controlled the heat basis and waste water systems and with a 
professional corps of technicians was rapidly able to see the 
potential of the technology. In several cases there were 
predictions, which turned out to be correct, of repayment 
periods of approximately two years for the facilities. The 
investment decisions were further facilitated by the fact that 
the technology was perceived by local politicians as 
environmentally friendly and energy-saving and in line with the 
national energy policy. 
  The biggest problem with getting the development under way 
seems to have been to demonstrate that the technology functioned 
in practice and was reliable. ASEA STAL undertook this task by 
building a test facility under its own direction in Finspang and 
then a lake-water heat pump for ASEA Ludvika. The next step was 
a full-scale facility in Vasteras, after which ASEA began to 
offer facilities with guarantees to the municipalities and they 
dared put in the orders. 
  The Government Subsidies to the Heat Pump Field 
  Government subsidies for heat pumps have been given in 
various forms since 1975. The main interest in the technology 
field came after the 1979 oil crisis. The subsidy can be divided 
into three parts, one, traditional R&amp;D support, two, the 
occasionally very extensive market introduction and investment 
support, and, three, the major information and education 
activity which existed at times. 
  R&amp;D Support: 
  Altogether, during the period 1975-1990 about 300 million 
kronor (in 1989 prices) from the energy research program was 
invested in R&amp;D involving heat pumps. This can be compared 
with, 
for example, solar energy during the corresponding period, which 
received 1.15 billion kronor. The direct government R&amp;D 
support 
within the framework of the energy research program was thus 
remarkably extensive. The comparison will be wrong, however, 
unless it is also taken into account that during the 1979-1987 
period Vattenfall invested a total of 350 million kronor (475 
million kronor at 1979 prices) in its so-called Solar Project. 
About 80 percent of these funds was spent on heat pump projects. 
The emphasis of the solar project was on building demonstration 
facilities. 
  Vattenfall's effort should be viewed against the background 
of the 1979 parliamentary decision for a strong focus on R&amp;D 
in 
order to make solar energy commercially available for heating 
purposes[.sup]27[/], whereby the state authorities presumed 
that Vattenfall took an active part in the work. 
  Investment Support: 
  The majority of the direct government contributions to the 
heat pump field have been for market introduction and investment 
support. From 1979 to 1983 investment subsidies were granted 
within the so-called energy budgeting program amounting to about 
950 million kronor, administered by the Housing Administration. 
During 1984 STEV [not further identified] and the Housing 
Administration were jointly in charge of the so-called 1984 
Investment Program, Contributions to the Installation of 
Heating, etc., in which 252 million kronor was for heat pump 
installations. 
  The greater part of the government's help to the heat pump 
sector went to small heat pumps. In 1979 the first subsidy for 
installations of home heat pumps was given. It was a maximum of 
3,000 kronor and was replaced in 1981 by the Energy Loan 
Ordinance, which involved a five-year exemption from interest 
for one-third of the overall cost of a heat pump. One year later 
the terms were improved to a 10-year interest-free loan. This 
was in effect until 1984, when it was replaced by a 15 percent 
contribution to installations. After 1985, all direct support 
for installation of home heat pumps was eliminated. 
  Air-to-air heat pumps were not included in the above 
support, 
since they were regarded as competitive anyway. Indirectly, 
however, the new production was supported by the fact that the 
1980 building standard provides advantages for construction with 
low energy requirements, so that heat pumps could be financed 
with interest-guaranteed government loans. 
  Medium-sized heat pumps were largely included in the same 
type of subsidies as the small. Since relatively few such pumps 
were installed, despite the subsidy, only a small proportion of 
the total contribution was for this market segment. 
  Large heat pump installations have mainly been undertaken 
without subsidies. From 1983 to 1984, however, some 
installations received investment contributions from the State 
Energy Board and Vattenfall. 
  Information Activity: 
  In parallel with the R&amp;D and investment support which 
was 
granted, above all BFR, Vattenfall and the VVS- [heating, 
ventilation and sanitary industry] Technical Association took 
initiatives for an education program on the installation and 
maintenance of heat pump systems. The purpose of these programs 
was partly to provide information about the heat pump and partly 
to improve the quality of installations and maintenance, where 
several problems had occurred with small and medium-sized heat 
pumps. 
  These education programs were significant in raising the 
level of know-how in the industry. Unfortunately, a large part 
of the market disappeared at the same time as one began to 
master the technology commercially, which is why it was not 
possible to derive full benefit from these education efforts. 
  During the first half of the 1980's there were also 
municipal 
so-called energy advisers. Providing information about the heat 
pump became a principal task for them, since the investment 
contributions for installation of a heat pump was one of the 
very few concrete measures available. 
  Effects of the Government Support 
  On the technology development side, the government's R&amp;D 
support had a limited impact, according to several studies. It 
was essentially market-driven, although the government's support 
(including Vattenfall's Solar Project) is likely to have further 
accelerated the market introduction. 
  On the other hand, the investment support and information 
activity about heat pumps have been important for the market 
development. This applies particularly to the small heat pumps. 
<H5>  Small Heat Pumps--The Conversion Market </H5>
  In the conversion market the state support has been of 
crucial importance for the rapid breakthrough in the early 
1980's. The support naturally meant that more facilities were 
profitable. Further, the calculations were often based on 
prognoses of an official nature which indicated that the oil 
price would continue to rise by about two percent a year, 
calculated in terms of real monetary value, for the foreseeable 
future. The subsidy also meant that some of the investments were 
moved up (above all in 1984), so that it was possible to take 
advantage of it before it ceased. 
  During the 1970's there were also rapid shifts in attitudes. 
Thus, for some years wood furnaces were sold in large amounts, 
after which came electric cartridges and electric cassettes and 
then gradually heat pumps. These fluctuations were largely due 
to the form of the government's contributions and subsidies. The 
state support meant an approval for private persons that society 
had confidence in the technology. The same happened when the 
subsidy stopped. Many felt that this was because society 
regretted its investment in heat pumps, which is why the 1975 
slump was very steep. 
  The municipal advisers were also important for the major 
success of the heat pump in the conversion market. Through this 
investment support, they had something concrete to offer 
property owners beyond good advice and inspection protocols. 
<H5>  Small Heat Pumps--New Production: </H5>
  In this field as well the government efforts, primarily the 
1980 building standard, have had influence on the market 
penetration. It has been about 50 percent for close to a decade 
now. That the development has been relatively stable can be 
explained by the fact that the market space in the new 
construction segment is not as much as the conversion segment 
governed by the relationship between electricity and oil prices, 
but also by variations in new production and by the interest of 
the professional customer group in standardizing its production. 
The fact that government subsidies were more stable during this 
period, in the form of the state loans, probably also 
contributed to the more stable development. 
<H5>  Medium-Sized Heat Pumps: </H5>
  In general, the same types of support were granted to 
medium-sized heat pumps as to small heat pumps. But this support 
had a considerably lower impact on the development. The 
incentives for the intended customers were usually so minor that 
they were not reinforced by subsidy measures to any significant 
extent. 
  The more professional customer group, compared to the 
conversion market, probably imposed greater economic and 
functional demands on the installations, with the result that 
the state support did not create a corresponding "boom" in this 
segment. When the technology was completed and tested in 
practice, the favorable contributions were no longer available. 
  The government impact which occurred in this segment can 
instead mainly be traced to the education and information 
efforts which were undertaken. These are likely to have had a 
positive influence[.sup]28[/] on both the number of 
installations and the quality of the installations. 
<H5>  Large Heat Pumps: </H5>
  As was mentioned earlier, the market introduction in this 
segment was primarily market-driven. Government efforts 
(including Vattenfall's Solar Project) therefore had no decisive 
effect on the development, other than possibly to speed up the 
introduction somewhat. 
  The government's greatest impact on this development is 
likely to have been through its influence on the oil price 
development. On the international market, the oil price began to 
fall in 1982-83. The effects of this price drop were not noticed 
on the Swedish market until 1985, however, because higher taxes 
and the rising dollar exchange rate compensated for the drop in 
world market price. At the same time the Swedish price of 
electricity fell further during these years in connection with 
more nuclear power reactors entering production. This 
development, in which the state was a principal player, further 
reinforced the competitiveness of big heat pumps, of course, and 
accelerated their market introduction. 
<H5>  6. Energy Consulting at the Regional Development Funds </H5>
  When the government's efforts in the field of energy were 
initiated after the first oil crisis in 1973/74, they were 
intended to reduce the country's dependence on oil. Parts of the 
responsibility for reducing industrial energy consumption fell 
to the National Industry Administration (SIND). To begin with, 
the efforts involved information and advice on energy 
conservation measures to small and medium-sized companies, which 
are a very heterogeneous group. The group includes the nations' 
small enterprises, and it was thought that there was relatively 
little knowledge of rational energy use within the group, which 
is why it was considered essential to inform about energy 
conservation opportunities. 
  The energy consulting began in 1977 and was concluded in 
1987. During this period about 6,500 companies were visited, and 
for more than 3,500 of them a large survey was undertaken, a so- 
called preliminary inventory. SIND's total appropriations during 
the period amounted to 74 million kronor in today's prices. 
Furthermore, Vattenfall contributed 3 million kronor for the 
1986/87 fiscal year. The large allocation of funds took place 
over the period 1981/82 to 1985/86, an average of 12 million 
kronor per fiscal year. 
  The orientation of the activity varied somewhat over this 
period. From having had the character of information-carrier, 
the activity in part changed to include consultation and advice 
aimed at the companies' undertaking energy saving measures and 
thereby becoming more profitable in the long run. After that 
followed a period when the companies were helped to achieve 
energy savings, establish know-how and improve operation and 
maintenance, etc. Toward the end of the period the activity was 
aimed at developing decision materials for energy savings which 
the enterprises themselves can continue. From 1977 to 1984 the 
efforts were mostly aimed at saving oil, and in recent years 
more toward greater electricity efficiency. 
  SIND's participation was of a coordinating nature. The 
actual 
energy consulting was carried out in part by the energy 
consultants of the development funds themselves, in part by 
hired consultants, whereby the efforts were roughly evenly 
distributed between the fund's own energy consultants and hired 
consultants. 
  The activity was primarily free of charge. Certain attempts 
at paying for it with fees were made but did not turn out very 
well, which was mostly because utilization of consultants is low 
within the group of small and medium-sized firms and the cost of 
consulting is considered high. 
  Energy Consultants at the Regional Development 
Funds 
  In 1975 SIND was given the task of providing information 
about energy saving contributions by way of the enterprise 
associations, a predecessor for the regional development funds. 
Funding was allocated for education, information and courses in 
the field of heating. The goal was to reduce oil consumption. 
Over the next two years SIND was charged with providing 
information on the potential for saving energy, principally for 
heating but also process-oriented measures, which could save 
energy. The activity was undertaken in the form of seeking-out 
activity. An actual target group was not defined. The companies 
which were interested got help. 
  In 1977 the enterprise associations' personnel, which often 
consists of energy-and VVS-trained civil engineers, was trained 
in the subject of energy for three days. After that, the right 
to decide applications for energy conservation subsidies of up 
to 50,000 kronor was delegated to the enterprise associations. 
The idea was to achieve smoother handling of energy conservation 
funding. Further, in 1977 tests were started with a "free energy 
consultant" in three provinces. About 1,000 companies in the 
three provinces were given energy consultations of half or one 
day each. The activity was primarily to seek them out. The 
intent was for these firms then to apply for energy conservation 
subsidies and thus carry out energy-saving measures. But only 
about eight percent of the companies visited applied for energy 
conservation subsidies within a year. In 1978 the "free energy 
consultant" activity was expanded to include all provinces. 
  In 1978 an industry-specific energy consultant activity was 
also begun. There was cooperation with STU [Administration for 
Technical Development] and Linkoping Technical College, among 
others. The wood product, rubber and foundry industry were also 
targets, among others. Relatively few companies were visited, 
and the potential for saving energy at the firms visited was 
judged at an average of 20 percent. 
  After 1980 a gradual addition of energy consultants took 
place in all provinces. In this phase the activity was developed 
to include an annual budget of 10-15 million kronor. The 
seeking-out activity continued. Visits were undertaken which 
changed into preliminary inventories as to whether a 
sufficiently large energy saving potential could be found. 
Visits to individual firms were usually carried out at the 
initiative of the individual company. On the other hand, the 
industry-specific surveys were active efforts. 
  The energy consultants also undertook a number of so-called 
special projects, in which it may be questioned in some cases 
whether their tasks were not outside the field. Among other 
things, they participated in introducing solid fuel combustion 
and worked with issues involving mini-power plants and wind 
power. In one example the energy consultant was involved in 
development and installation of a new type of wind power 
generator. 
  Together with external consultants, PC-based program 
software 
has been developed for profitability calculations of energy 
budget measures and the development of certain measuring 
equipment, such as energy data meter for storage of measurement 
data and an air flow meter for low air speeds. 
  It was determined in the 1983/84 budget bill that the 
activity should continue to the same extent as over the past two 
years, but that the appropriations must be reduced. Attempts at 
financing with fees were once again made, which worked poorly, 
in accordance with the previous evaluation. In 1986 the 
appropriations were sharply cut back from 13 million kronor for 
the 1985/86 fiscal year to 4 million kronor for the 1986/87 
fiscal year. Vattenfall contributed 3 million kronor for the 
1986/87 fiscal year within the framework of its Task 2000 
project, which is aimed at making electricity use more efficient 
and reduce the demand for electric power. After that, the 
activity ceased. 
  When the subsidies were removed, the activity largely 
disappeared, and today energy consultants remain only in 
Jonkoping province. Another few are left but they also work with 
other issues. The fact that the activity disappeared so quickly 
was mainly due to two factors: There was no actual market for 
these services, and the energy savings that can be undertaken 
today are primarily for greater efficiency, so that considerably 
larger resources are needed both to survey them and to change 
them. 
  Two independent evaluations of the activity have been made: 
by SIAR [Foundation for Research on Enterprise Administration] 
in 1984 and by AF [Steam Boiler Association] in 1988. Both of 
them are of the opinion that the project was relatively 
successful, but that one should have concentrated on fewer 
companies in a few industries which would have been interesting 
from the aspect of energy. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  The original idea was to provide small and medium-sized 
companies with information about energy-saving measures, 
primarily oil savings. With information at hand, one would then 
act rationally, that is to say undertake measures to save 
energy. This did not happen. The reasons are many. One of them 
is that many small and medium-sized firms regard the cost of 
energy as a "fixed" cost and it rarely exceeds two percent of 
turnover, at a mechanical engineering industry, for example. 
Another aspect is that smaller companies are not always 
organized or receptive to detect and undertake potential 
savings. Further, in many cases these firms have no experience 
with consultants, and a service whose value cannot be 
demonstrated without being able to show concrete proof of 
potential savings must be marketed and sold. 
  Information alone was not sufficient to get the industry to 
save energy, although the information in itself was good. The 
information, combined with a visit or preliminary inventory 
would achieve a good result. It also turned out that simple 
measures with regard to insulation, ventilation, industrial 
gates, etc. achieved considerable savings, primarily oil 
savings. In those cases where larger and more costly measures 
were to be carried out, the result was poorer. 
  The independent evaluation which was made in 1984 judged the 
energy conservation potential in small and medium-sized 
enterprises to be 15-20 percent for measures with a payoff time 
shorter than three years. For the entire target group, it would 
give a possible profitability potential of 5-7 TWh/year. 
Investments with payoff times of up to three years are probably 
too big, if the energy costs are only a few percent of the total 
expenses in a company. 
  A problem with projects of this type is that it is more 
difficult to evaluate them in economic terms, because it is hard 
to measure the effects of undertaken measures. As an information 
campaign for energy-saving, however, the project is likely to 
have been of significance and must be regarded as successful. 
  If this project was merely a link in the government's 
information campaign for energy conservation, the project 
succeeded well. 
  If, on the other hand, the objectives were to achieve 
certain 
results, one should have aimed more at relatively energy- 
intensive industries, which is also the opinion of the 
independent evaluations. The campaigns that were aimed at 
energy-intensive industries showed good results. 
  The accepted view of the energy sector was that the efforts 
were effective. Whether or not the effects corresponded to the 
resources spent cannot be unequivocally answered. On this point 
opinions differ. 
<H5>  7. Efficient Electricity Consumption in the United States </H5>
  Background 
  As early as the 1970's certain U.S. power companies on the 
west coast were forced to rethink their plans for electric power 
production. Increases in demand had previously been met by 
expanding production capacity. In the future, this would not be 
quite as easy. New investments could often become so expensive 
that in the long term it would not be possible to get back the 
actual costs of producing electricity. The future uncertainty in 
the fuel market, primarily the oil market, further reinforced 
that picture. During the period 1975-82 the price of electricity 
grew very sharply, by an average of 15 percent a year in real 
terms. Opinions opposed to new construction of facilities also 
began to grow, and it could be difficult to receive permits for 
new construction. The legislation in the energy-producing field 
in the United States is complex and the market is thus tightly 
regulated. It has also taken a long time to complete and put 
into operation certain of the nuclear power plants, which began 
to be built in the United States in the 1970's. 
  With these assumptions, the power companies asked themselves 
whether it were not possible to influence the demand for 
electric power. This is how the Demand-Side Management concept 
or DSM was born. In Swedish one could translate DSM as 
regulating the demand for electric power. 
  In the 1980's DSM has been further developed and spread to 
the east coast as well. Today there are hundreds of DSM programs 
all across the United States, which in various ways try to 
affect the demand for electric power according to the desired 
profile. The DSM concept is also being developed toward a 
unified view of energy production, in which both economic and 
environmental aspects are illuminated. This further development 
is often called Integrated Resource Planning (IRP). DSM has 
today become generally accepted in the United States and is 
expected to be needed in most states during the 1990's. 
  The Electric Power Research Institute (EPRI), a research 
organization financed by the private power companies in the 
United States, is of the opinion that DSM programs can reduce 
the need for electricity by up to five percent by the year 2000 
and, consequently, carbon dioxide emissions by up to 5-7 
percent. One reason for continued implementation of DMS programs 
in the 1990's is environmental, such as carbon dioxide emissions 
and other emissions with environmental impact. Another reason is 
that many power companies are expected to reach, or have already 
reached, maximum output during peak load, and by reducing the 
peaks there is no need to invest in new power. One thinks in 
terms of "avoided cost." The value of a saved kW in a peak load 
situation can then be great. Yet another aspect is that in many 
cases DSM has turned out to involve lower power costs for the 
customers and it has therefore worked out favorably for 
continued activities. 
  In the 1980's the DSM programs mostly included for example 
energy-saving measures, discounts of various kinds, which are 
aimed at utilizing energy-saving equipment, load control, 
information, marketing and, in certain cases, even more 
far-reaching cooperation between manufacturer and supplier 
regarding energy-efficient equipment and technology. DSM 
programs have occurred in both the housing sector and the 
industrial sector. There has been great inventiveness. 
  The profitability of the DMS projects has varied due, among 
other things, to the fact that they were often undertaken for 
experimental purposes. Figure 1 [not included] shows the 
development of DSM programs from 1977 to 1988. 
  At the end of the 1980's, however, the DSM efforts slackened 
in some states, above all on the west coast. One of the reasons 
was that it has been advantageous to build smaller power plants 
and sell electricity to the regulated power companies, and 
therefore there did not seem to be the same need for greater 
efficiency as before. On the east coast, however, the DSM 
efforts have remained at a high level, since a lack of power has 
threatened the whole time. 
  In the last few years DSM has once again become interesting. 
From 1989 to 1991 the power companies' spending on DSM has grown 
from an average of 1.6 to 2.3 percent of total sales. The 
foremost cause of this is, as was mentioned earlier, 
environmental reasons, the possibility of not having to invest 
in new power and acceptance from the customers. 
  Examples of DSM Programs in the United States 
  Below are given some examples of DSM programs undertaken in 
the United States during the 1970's and 1980's. 
<H5>  Seattle City Light </H5>
  Seattle City Light (SCL) is a "municipal" company, which is 
responsible for the production of electric power and electric 
power distribution in the Seattle area. Its capacity is about 
2,100 MW and sales are about 260 million dollars annually. 
  In the early 1970's, after many years of continuously 
growing 
power consumption, one began to realize that the capacity for 
electricity production would not suffice in the long run. An 
extensive energy planning was begun, with the result, among 
others, that the company declined to participate in a consortium 
for two nuclear reactors. Energy conservation would instead 
replace new power. The target is for 177 MW to be saved by the 
year 2002, which is the equivalent of about eight percent of the 
maximum output. The DSM programs undertaken during the period 
from 1977 to 1988 involved both the housing sector and the 
industrial sector. 
  In the housing sector, nine programs have been implemented 
involving information, energy loans and discounts on 
energy-saving hot water heaters. The load has thereby decreased 
by an average of 12 MW (a drop of about 0.6 percent). The total 
cost amounted to 58 million dollars at today's prices. 
  The programs in the commercial property sector and in the 
industrial sector began later, about 1982-83. A total of 10 
programs have been carried out, mostly involving information. 
The output has dropped by an average of 10 MW (a reduction of 
about 0.5 percent). In all, the cost amounted to 11 million 
dollars at today's prices. 
<H5>  Bonneville Power Administration </H5>
  Bonneville Power Administration (BPA) is a federal 
organization and belongs to the DoE. BPA is in charge of 
electric production and distribution in the states of 
Washington, Oregon, Idaho, parts of Montana and neighboring 
portions of California, Nevada, Utah and Wyoming. Its capacity 
is 23,700 MW and it is largely hydroelectric. 
  In 1980 the BPA was given the task by Congress of using 
energy conservation as a resource. In the 1980's the BPS 
developed several savings programs, covering many sectors, such 
as: 


    -  more effective energy use in industry 
  -  energy-efficient buildings 
  -  demonstration and prototype facilities. 

    In 1989 the energy consumption had dropped nearly two 
percent 
through DSM programs. In the 1980's about 800 million dollars in 
today's prices were spent on energy savings. 
  The cost of a saved kWh was an average of 4 cents/kWh. 
<H5>  New England Electric System </H5>
  New England Electric System (NEES) is responsible for power 
production in certain parts of the New England region and is the 
mother company of three power distribution companies 
(Massachusetts, Narragansett and Granite State Electric). Its 
capacity is about 5,000 MW. 
  In 1987 NEES started DSM programs which were aimed at 
reducing the load by 230 MW by 1992, at a cost of 87 million 
dollars. In 1990 the savings at high load were about 200 MW, a 
cut of about four percent. At NEES as well, it was because the 
capacity began to approach the maximum limit at peak load that 
the DSM programs began to be implemented. In the New England 
area the increase in energy consumption has been strong 
throughout all of the 1980's. This was mainly because of the 
strong expansion of business and industry which has occurred in 
the area. 
  NEES has utilized "least cost planning" to a large extent, 
that is to say the amount that can be saved compared with the 
cost of generating new power. 
  The NEES's 20-year planning, up to the year 2008, includes 
new power production as well as savings according to the least 
cost planning method. The potential for saving is estimated at 
nearly 1,000 MW in 2008, which is the equivalent of about 12 
percent of the total power production. 
  Within the industrial sector, eight programs have been 
carried out, whose primary purpose is energy efficiency with 
better design and construction and more energy-efficient 
buildings, products and systems. Load control has also been 
utilized. 
  In the housing sector, one has primarily aimed for hot water 
heating and electrically heated housing. 
<H5>  Taunton Municipal Lighting Plant </H5>
  The Taunton Municipal Lighting Plant (TMLP) is the 
"municipal" power company in Taunton, Massachusetts. 
  The TMLP's DSM program, which has been under way for a few 
years, is aimed at marketing low-energy light bulbs to the 
household sector which utilize 76 percent less energy and have 
13 times longer life than conventional light bulbs. 
  The consumer rents the low-energy bulbs from TMPL and the 
rent is included in the electric bill. TMPL replaces burned-out 
light bulbs for free. 
  The rent for the low-energy light bulb is set so that an 
average consumer receives a lower monthly electric bill, 
including the rent for the light bulb, compared to the 
electricity cost for a conventional light bulb. 
<H5>  Central Maine Power Company </H5>
  The Central Maine Power Company (CMP) is responsible for 
electricity production and distribution in Maine. 
  The CMP's DSM program is called "Power Partners" and is 
aimed 
at bidding for electric energy. The bidding must save at least 
100,000 kWh/year or reduce the load by 100 kW. The payoff time 
for the bid projects must be at least one year, calculated 
according to a "least cost planning" model. The program has been 
in effect since 1988, and at the end of 1989 there were six 
ongoing "Power Partners," projects that were planned to save 
96,000 MWh/year, which is the equivalent of more than 1 percent 
of the CMP's annual energy sales. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  Since the number of DSM programs in effect in the United 
States in the 1970's and 1980's is very large, it is not always 
possible to find both successful and unsuccessful programs. Many 
of the DSM programs have also been undertaken for experimental 
purposes and are therefore not always relevant to evaluate, at 
least not in terms of profitability. 
  A common denominator for many of the programs undertaken 
during the 1980's, above all, is that the drop in energy use is 
about 1-2 percent and that the peak output can be reduced by 2-3 
percent. The power consumers have also to a large extent 
accepted DSM. The reason for this could be that DSM is marketed 
as a way to reduce costs for the customers, which it has also 
turned out to do in many cases. DSM has also been used as an 
argument in the environmental debate and this has further 
reinforced the acceptance by electricity consumers. The question 
to ask from a Swedish point of view is why there has been so 
relatively little saving, when the expenses for these savings 
have been so large. 
  It should be understood, however, that the U.S. power 
production system is highly limited in output and by trimming 
the output peaks there is no need to invest in new power. By 
applying the "least cost planning" concept the value of a saved 
kWh or a trimmed kW at high load can be relatively large. In 
this way the purpose of the DSM program has probably had an 
impact, at least for some power companies. The equivalent 
calculations could not simply be transferred to the Swedish 
power production system, where maximum output is very rarely 
reached. In Sweden the value of a saved kWh or a trimmed kW at 
high load is thus not worth very much. 
  In general, there is a great deal of wasted energy in the 
United States, and the cuts in energy use which were achieved 
were often relatively simple savings measures, above all in the 
housing sector. Many programs have also been purely information 
campaigns. The customers have also been won over by effective 
"marketing." For the 2000's, savings potentials (or goals) have 
been discussed which far surpass the levels achieved so far. It 
is likely that more radical changes will have to be made then 
than until now, if the stated potentials are to be achieved. 
  In conclusion should be noted that it is not obvious who has 
controlled the development of DSM. Is it the power companies 
themselves who pushed it forward? Is it the complex legislation 
in the country, for which ultimately the politicians are 
responsible, which completely forced DMS onto the power 
companies? What has been the role of the consumers? 
<H3>  8. The Adjustment of the Pulp and Paper Industry to AOX 
Regulations for Organochlorine Compounds </H3>
  Background 
  Ever since the early 1970's there has been awareness in the 
pulp and paper industry of the problem of emission of 
organochlorine compounds from chlorine bleaching at sulfate 
factories. Even the Concession Administration knew about these 
emissions. In the 1970s it was difficult to quantify the 
emission levels, however, partly because there was too little 
knowledge about the actual emissions, and partly because there 
were no good measuring methods. Organochlorine compounds were 
often called just "color." However, the forest industry was 
forced, primarily by the Concession Administration, to work with 
these issues. 
  Since 1957 the forest industry has worked with environmental 
issues within the Forest Industry Foundation for Water and Air 
Protection Research (SSVL), and extensive environmental research 
has been carried out since 1970. The work involved primarily 
specification questions for emissions, biological and ecological 
effects of emission and technology development toward techniques 
with less environmental impact. Questions involving waste water 
from bleaching plants were of central importance during the 
entire period. The forest industry's joint environmental 
research project for the period 1970-1990 involved 445 million 
kronor at today's prices. 
  Measuring Methods for Organochlorine Compounds 
  In the 1970's the emission levels for biochemical and 
chemical oxygen demand (BOD[.sup]7[/], Biological Oxygen 
Demand and COD, Chemical Oxygen Demand) were established. But 
BOD[.sup]7[/] and COD provide no information about which 
individual compounds are included. 
  In the 1980s the focus was on organochlorine compounds. In 
1986 the variable TOCl (Totally Organically Bound Chlorine [Cl]) 
was used for the first time in a permit decision. The TOCl 
method, which is Swedish-developed, does not provide information 
about which individual organochlorine compounds are involved, 
however. 
  In Germany a technique was developed in the 1960's which 
adsorbs chlorinated organic substances on active carbon. The 
method was called AOX (Adsorbable Organic Halogens). AOX 
gradually replaced TOCl in permit decisions in the late 1980s. 
Today, organochlorine compounds are measured, such as kilogram 
of organically bound halogen per ton of bleached pulp (AOX). 
TOCl and AOX have often been treated as equivalent magnitudes. 
However, the AOX method gives 20-30 percent higher values than 
the TOCl method, due to the content of volatile compounds, among 
others. 
  The Development in the Forest Industry With Regard to 
Emissions From Chlorine Bleaching Plants 
  In the 1970's the emission level for conventional chlorine 
gas bleaching could reach 10 kg AOX per ton of pulp. 
  In the early 1970's oxygen bleaching was introduced as an 
entirely new process step. This reduced the chlorine gas 
consumption of the process and also the emission levels of 
organochlorine compounds. Oxygen bleaching was developed as 
early as the 1960s, primarily at MoDo. The technology was 
developed entirely without any government subsidies or other 
means of control. In the 1960's, however, aspects such as energy 
consumption and emissions with impact on the environment played 
a relatively minor role, and there was no major market for this 
process. 
  The Nature Conservancy Board in the early 1970's imposed 
stricter requirements for purification of waste water, but did 
not expressly require the use of oxygen bleaching. One way to 
clean the waste water, although with certain shortcomings, was 
aerated ponds. Initially, the Nature Conservancy Board often 
required aerated ponds. The industry itself came up with the 
counter-proposal of oxygen bleaching. Oxygen bleaching is a part 
of the process and, in addition to reducing the emissions of 
organochlorine compounds, it also cuts operating costs and is 
preferable for this reason. Today, all sulfate factories in the 
country use oxygen bleaching, which is quite unique, from an 
international perspective. Figure 1 [not included] shows 
chlorine consumption from 1970 and on. 
  This has declined after the 1970's, although production of 
bleached pulp has continuously grown. The primary reason for 
this is the introduction of oxygen bleaching. Other process 
improvements and additional purification steps have also 
contributed to a reduction of the emission levels. 
  In the mid-1980's the emission level from a conventional 
chlorine bleaching plant (without oxygen bleaching) was 5-8 kg 
AOX per ton of pulp. With oxygen bleaching, it was reduced to 
3-4 kg AOX per ton of pulp. 
  A continuous reduction of emissions of organochlorine 
compounds, measured in AOX, has taken place over the entire 
period since 1970, see Figure 2 [not included]. 
  In 1987 the forest industry believed that another reduction 
to a level on the order of 2.5 kg AOX per ton of pulp would be 
technically possible in the early 1990's. 
  The government went even further in the 1988 environmental 
bill, however. Here the targets for emissions from bleaching 
plants are stated. The forest industry is to have begun measures 
to reduce the emission levels to 1.5 kg AOX per ton of pulp no 
later than 1992. The goal is then to achieve 0.5 kg of AOX per 
ton of pulp in the early 2000's. 
  The Swedish forest industry agreed with the government and 
authorities that in the long term the emissions must be further 
reduced. What they did not agree on was the rate of reduction 
and the opportunities for influencing the competitor nations. 
The problems of reducing emissions of organochlorine compounds 
are considerable from the aspect of both investments and 
technology. 
  The development has gone faster than what the forest 
industry 
believed in 1987, however. In principle, the technology is ready 
but untested on a large scale. Against that background the 
forest industry did not dare promise to reduce the emission 
levels so drastically over such a short period. 
  In the mid-1980's the environmental debate in society 
intensified. The environmental debate about the forest industry 
in Sweden largely came to involve organochlorine compounds. The 
reason for this was, among other things, the alarming reports 
from the United States about traces of chlorinated dioxins and 
furans from waste dumps. Similar traces were also found in 
connection with pulp factories. It was modern analytic 
technology which made the discovery of this possible. A debate 
about chlorine-bleached pulp products developed. It was possible 
to determine dioxin traces in diapers, for example. The 
so-called "diaper debate" was conducted primarily in the United 
States and Western Europe. When the dioxin debate reached 
Sweden, the forest industry's environmental problems were 
focused on organochlorine compounds. 
  In Sweden there were also traces of chlorinated dioxins 
found 
in some places, for example in crabs outside Varo mill in 
Kattegat. 
  The dioxin debate was one reason to formulate the target for 
sharp reductions of AOX compounds in the 1988 environmental 
bill. The intensified environmental debate also to a large 
extent influenced the content of the environmental bill. 
  In connection with expansion and new investments, 
investments 
have been made in modern environmental equipment and technology, 
or the permits would not have been approved. Due to the rapid 
rate of expansion in the industry throughout the 1980's, it has 
been possible to introduce new technology with less 
environmental impact. The total environment-related investments 
since 1968 amount to more than 12 billion kronor at today's 
prices, which is the equivalent of between 10 and 20 percent of 
total investments. 
  Until today, all the sulfate factories with bleaching 
facilities have been obligated by the Concession Administration 
to reduce their emissions to a level of about 1.5 kg AOX per ton 
of pulp; in some permits the emission levels were somewhat 
higher, in others somewhat lower. Most of the mills today are 
already below, or have proposed measures for reaching levels 
below, 1.5 kg AOX per ton of pulp. 
  Today the forest industry has succeeded, in a very favorable 
way, in reducing the emission level, even below the requirements 
imposed by the authorities. 
  Technological Development of Bleaching Processes 
  The forest industry in principle had two ways to choose in 
order to reduce the environmental impact of the bleaching 
process: keeping the chlorine gas bleaching but rendering the 
organochlorine compounds in the subsequent cleaning step 
harmless, or developing other bleaching and production processes 
in order to eliminate the residual lignin. Combinations of these 
two principles have also occurred. 
  The strategy has primarily been to alter the process itself. 
Some examples of this is the introduction of oxygen bleaching, 
greater use of chlorine dioxide instead of chlorine gas, 
extended delignification in the boiling and the use of 
oxygen/hydrogen peroxide in the alkali stage of the bleaching. 
All of these modifications reduce chlorine gas consumption and 
thus the amount as well as the composition of the emissions. It 
is primarily the chlorinated phenolic compounds with three or 
four chlorine atoms which have disappeared, as well as dioxins. 
Technological breakthroughs have occurred in several fields. 
  In general, the conversion of the bleaching technique has 
had 
a major impact on the energy consumption for producing bleaching 
chemicals. Oxygen, for example, requires less electrical energy, 
while chlorine dioxide requires considerably more electrical 
energy than chlorine gas. 
  Most of the above techniques were in principle ready in the 
late 1980's, but full-scale tests had not been done. The 
industry's joint environmental research intensified in the 
1980's. This work was coordinated and controlled by SSVL. A 
great deal of research and development work was undertaken by 
equipment suppliers and chemical producers in connection with 
the industry. From 1985 to 1990 the SSVL project Environment 90 
was under way. All the environmental programs within the SSVL 
have, since 1970, to a greater or lesser extent, involved bleach 
emissions. Studies of bleaching plant waste occupied a central 
role in Environment 90. 
  Another, not inconsiderable, part is the accumulated 
operational experience which has enabled the processes to 
improve further with respect to emission levels. When the new 
technology has been consolidated, emissions are likely to be yet 
further reduced. 
  Today, AOX levels below 1.5 kg per ton of pulp are not 
considered relevant from an environmental aspect, but must be 
regarded as technology parameters. The remaining chlorine 
compounds contain few chlorine atoms, are broken down relatively 
rapidly and are not regarded as equally dangerous from an 
environmental point of view. Other measurement methods must be 
developed in the 1990's. 
  Summarizing Analysis 
  Strict measures for reducing emissions of organochlorine 
compounds were started as early as the 1970's with the 
introduction of oxygen bleaching on a large scale. The main 
reason for this was the environmental requirements by the 
authorities. A major reduction in organochlorine compounds came 
with the introduction of oxygen bleaching, a decrease of about 
50 percent in comparison with conventional chlorine bleaching. 
  It is interesting to note that out of several different 
possibilities to reduce emissions, the Swedish industry itself 
chose oxygen bleaching. In the case of oxygen bleaching, it was 
also possible to refer to economic reasons. 
  Environmental issues grew in importance in the 1980's. The 
government also established strict environmental goals and set 
up strict environmental requirements. 
  Consequently, the forest industry was forced to introduce 
relatively untested technology on a large scale. The technical 
solutions existed, in principle. In the 1980's the forest 
industry expanded and the mills have made new investments. The 
fact the industry experienced an economic boom has helped the 
forest industry meet the strict requirements imposed on it. When 
they were expanding and making new investments anyway, the 
environment-improving investments were even more justified. 
  The market advantages, which in many cases it has been 
possible to exploit by offering the market non-chlorine 
(ClM[.sup]2[/]) bleached pulp products, have in several cases 
been a motor for the technology and justified the investment in 
new technology. 
  Sweden is far ahead from an international perspective. 
Today, 
this could mean market advantages, both for the paper 
manufacturers and for machine and chemical suppliers and 
consultants. 
  The level of demands in the permit decisions were one reason 
for the introduction of new technology, which was known but 
untested on a large scale. But public influence did not force 
the technology as such. The technology existed. The strict 
environmental goals which were established, and the market's 
demands for alternative, bleached, "environmentally friendly" 
products, were the reasons behind the rapid introduction of the 
technology, however. Aspects which may have reinforced the 
investment in the new technology were that the industry was 
experiencing a boom in which strong expansion was taking place, 
and that was a better justification for environmental 
investments. The conversion has cost a great deal of money, 
however, which it has been difficult to get back in the form of 
higher product prices. 
Bibliography 
<H5>  &gt; Section 2 </H5>
  ABB Flakt, various foundation materials. 
  "Thirty-Fifth Quarterly for the Coal Utilization 
Technologies 
Survey Group Report Summary," Batelle, 1990. 
  "Emissions Improvement for Germany's Power Utilities," Coal 
Trans, Sep/Oct 1991 
  ENERGIEWIRTSCHAFTLICHE TAGESFRAGEN, 1985, Vol 35, Issue 6, 
pp 
655-664: "With Lightning Speed in Search of Solutions". 
  STATT [Swedish Technical-Scientific Attache Activity], 1990: 
"The West German Energy Puzzle." 
  VARMEFORSK, 1990: "Batelle-Coal Application Technology, 
Summary of Quarterly Report No 35." 
  Weidner, Helmut: "Air Pollution Control Strategies and 
Policies in the F.R. Germany, Laws, Regulations, Implementations 
and Principal Shortcomings" (Edition Sigma), 1986 
  ZEITSCHRIFT DER VEREINIGUNG DEUTSCHER ELEKTRIZITAETSWERKE, 
Vol 90, 1991, issue 12, pp 691-706: "Emission Development in the 
Field of Power Supply Companies in the Old Laender in 1989 and 
1990." 
<H5>  Section 3 </H5>
  "Renewable Sources of Energy, a Compilation of Current 
Evaluations," DFE [Delegation for State Energy Research], No 21 
and 22, 1979 
  "Energy Research 1981-84," DFE No 41, 1981. 
  "The Energy Research Program 1978/79-1980/81," DFE No 55, 
1982. 
  "Forest Waste--an Evaluation of Government Support for 
Research and Development," EFN [not further identified] No 19, 
1986. 
  Ministry of Industry: "Financing Energy Technology to 
Replace 
Oil," Ds I, 1979:77. 
  Ministry of Industry: "Program for Oil Replacement," Ds I 
1980:23. 
  Ministry of Industry: "State Support for Oil Replacement," 
Ds 
I 1983:4. 
  Kaijser, Arne, et al.: "Att andra riktning--Villkor for ny 
energiteknik [Changing Direction--Conditions for New Energy 
Technology], 1988. 
  Government bill 1977/78:110: "Guidelines for the Energy 
Policy." 
  Government bill 1978/79:115: "Guidelines for the Energy 
Policy." 
  Government bill 1980/81:90: "Guidelines for the Energy 
Policy." 
  Government bill 1984/85:120: "Guidelines for the Energy 
Policy." 
  "Energy Forest, Conclusions and Proposals From the Swedish 
Energy Forest Program," Government Energy Administration, 1985 
  "The Oil Replacement Program From a Socioeconomic 
Perspective," SIND PM 1983:6. 
<H5>  Section 5 </H5>
  "Solar Heating and Heat Pumps--an Evaluation of the 
Effectiveness of the Government's Energy Research Support," Efn, 
1985. 
  Isacson, O., Ewetz, J. and Lundgren, G.: "What Effect Has 
the 
Government's EFUD Support Had on Industry and the Market for 
Solar Heating, Heat Pumps and Heat Storage?" 1987, BFR Report 
R2:1987. 
  Kaijser, A., Mogren, A and Steen, P.: "Andra 
riktning--Villkor for ny energiteknik" [Changing 
direction--Conditions for new energy technology], Allmanna 
Forlaget, Stockholm, 1988. 
  Vattenfall: "Small Heat Pumps--Experiences From Vattenfall's 
R&amp;D Efforts 1979-1987," 1987. 
  Vattenfall: "Medium-Sized Heat Pumps--Experiences From 
Vattenfall's R&amp;D Efforts 1979-1987," 1987. 
  Vattenfall: "Large Heat Pumps--Experiences From Vattenfall's 
R&amp;D Efforts 1979-1987," 1987. 
  Government Energy Administration: "Heat Pumps--Current 
Changes and Future Prospects," 1987. 
  Fahlen: "The Heat Pump--Important in the Energy System," 
ENERGI &amp; MILJO, No 4, 1991. 
<H5>  Section 7 </H5>
  International Symposium on Environmentally Sound Energy 
Technologies and Their Transfer to Developing Countries and 
European Economies in Transition, 1991. 
  "Integrated Resource Planning as a Mechanism to Acquire 
Environmentally Benign Energy Supplies," (Ron Eachus). 
  STATT: "Demand Side Management--A New View of Electricity 
Consumption," 1990. 
  STATT: "Demand Side Management in the United States," 1991. 
  Vattenfall: "Cooperation: The Key to the Energy Future; 
Vattenfall's Demand Side Management Conference," 1990. 
<H5>  Endnotes </H5>
  1. Just as interesting as studying successful commercial 
projects is to study failed commercial projects. Here concepts 
such as stop factors (or failure factors) are used. There are 
few documented failed projects, however, primarily because 
technology developers or their companies do not want to 
advertise failed projects officially. A study which makes paired 
comparisons between successful and unsuccessful projects is the 
SAPPHO study (Freeman, 1982). 
  2. The direct development cooperation between a technology 
developer and a government buyer in the form of a state-owned 
corporation or such has been very successful historically. As 
examples of such cooperations outside the energy field may be 
mentioned ABB-SJ (trains), Ericsson-Telecommunications Agency 
(telephones), Saab-FMV (aircraft) and Bofors--FMV (weapons). 
  3. This did not mean that they acted as "technical patrons" 
for the industry, which has sometimes been inaccurately 
indicated. The development has been to the advantage of both 
parties. 
  4. Something which, however, was mostly a result of the 
vague 
manner of Swedish energy statistics in comparing electrical and 
thermal energy. 
  5. This trend is thus not limited to energy technology. 
  6. By innovation support in this text we mean all types of 
measures to support the development and use of certain new 
technology. This can also take place for example through 
information campaigns, etc. Support should thus not be 
interpreted as just financial subsidies. 
  7. In Supplement 2 three cases of such public influence are 
described: the German power industry's adjustment to 
SO[.sup]x[/]/NO[.sub]x[/] rules, Swedish nuclear waste 
technology and the adjustment of the pulp and paper industry to 
regulations for emission of organochlorine compounds. 
  8. In our collection of examples there are three cases of 
the 
latter type of means of control: the Swedish development in the 
bioenergy field and the heat pump field, and activities for 
efficient use of electric power in the United States. 
  9. Experiences are given in the collection of examples of 
the 
effort with energy advisers which was undertaken in the early 
1980's. 
  10. This should not be interpreted as criticism of the way 
these activities were conducted by responsible officials. On the 
contrary; these activities were carried out in a professional 
manner. 
  11. In 1979 Defibrator was absorbed into Sunds and Sunds 
changed the name to Sunds Defibrator. 
  12. It should be mentioned that the groundwood process as 
well has developed gradually. By also putting this process under 
pressure, so-called pressure grinding, lignins are plasticized, 
from which a stronger pulp is obtained than in the original 
atmospheric process. The process, developed by Tampella, gives a 
pulp which is used for higher qualities, such as journal paper. 
  13. Stal Laval was a wholly owned subsidiary of ASEA. In 
1984 
it changed its name to ASEA STAL. The development of PFBC was 
done at Stal Laval up to 1983 and after that at the ASEA PFBC 
company, which changed its name to ABB Carbon in 1988. PFBC is 
today carried out at ABB Carbon, which now is a wholly owned 
subsidiary of ABB. 
  14. In 1985 Ericsson's activity was reorganized and Ericsson 
Cables was formed, of which Sieverts Kabelverk was a part. 
Sieverts Kabelverk had long been a wholly owned subsidiary of LM 
Ericsson. 
  15. Each cable usually includes 12 fibers, but up to 36 
fibers can be found today. 
  16. By Germany in this case description is meant the Federal 
Republic, since the description generally deals with the period 
before unification with the GDR. 
  17. More than 80 percent of the nation's power supply is the 
so-called public electricity supply (Oeffentliche 
Elektrizitaetsversorgung). This group includes all enterprises 
which according to the Law on Promotion of the Power Industry 
(Gesetz zur Foerderung der Energiewirtschaft) are obligated to 
deliver power to a third party. Today there are about 1,000 such 
enterprises. The capital funding for the public power industry 
is mainly public (municipal, land or federal). 
  18. The emission limits are based on half-hourly levels, in 
which the limits may never exceed more than 100 percent. In 
Sweden the emission quantities are compared to the amount of 
added fuel. Further, the Swedish limits are average annual 
values. A fair comparison between Swedish and German measurement 
requirements can therefore not be made. Also, power plants with 
an added thermal output of 300 MW are given sealed equipment for 
continuous measurement of emissions. The measurement data are 
monitored and stored by independent monitoring organizations. 
  19. By biofuels are here meant forest fuels, including 
forest 
waste, and cultivated energy forest. Hay and reeds are also 
included, but the addition of these fuels is so limited that 
they are not discussed here. The forest industry's utilization 
of lyes, barks, sawdust, etc. in energy production will also not 
be discussed here, since this deals mainly with conversion from 
oil undertaken without any major government measures. It should 
be noted that the area "bioenergy" also included peat at the 
beginning of the period. When the field of "peat" received its 
own funding in the energy programs, the concept of "biofuels" 
began to apply more to forest fuels. The peat support has been 
about 400 million kronor during the period from 1975 to 1990, a 
large part of which was intended for investment support for 
facilities. Today, however, biofuels and forest fuels are 
equated. 
  20. Of these funds 40 million kronor were for 
production-related projects and 35 million kronor for combustion 
technology, both for forest fuels and peat. 
  21. Heat pumps are not intrinsically new. The first 
medium-sized heat pump was installed as early as 1858 in 
Salzkammergut in Austria in order to reduce the costs of the 
heat needed for salt production. The concept is in principle the 
same as is still used. 
  22. In addition to these funds, a certain amount of 
additional support was given to installation of heat pumps in 
multifamily dwellings, the so-called ROT program. 
  23. The volume of these indirect subsidies is difficult to 
estimate. 
  24. After 1989 a considerable number (10,000 units in 1990) 
of cheap, so-called comfort heat pumps, were sold to homes with 
direct-working electric radiators. Since it provides a very 
small energy saving, but is primarily being bought for reasons 
of comfort, it is doubtful to compare it with the other types of 
heat pumps. The relevance of the figure for 1990 may therefore 
be questioned. 
  25. The development has instead approximately followed the 
development of the price relationship between oil and 
electricity. 
  26. ASEA entered the market by way of an accentuated need 
for 
diversification at the end of the 1970's. The market for 
turbines was eliminated with the collapse of the shipyard 
industry and the limitation of the nuclear power program to 12 
reactors. 
  27. The interest should be viewed in connection with the 
fact 
that the Oil Replacement Delegation, OED, for example, at this 
time estimated the potential for heat pumps to be 55 TWh/year. 
  28. The effect of this type of effort is very difficult to 
evaluate, of course. In the majority of cases it is impossible 
to determine to what extent a certain type of information 
influences the attitude. 

